Thank you. Thank you. Thank you to Vice President Pence. He's a good guy. We've done a great job together. And Merry Christmas, Michigan. Thank you, Michigan. What a victory we had in Michigan. What a victory was that. One of the greats. Was that the greatest evening? But I'm thrilled to be here with thousands of hardworking patriots as we celebrate the miracle of Christmas, the greatness of America and the glory of God. Thank you very much. And did you notice that everybody is saying Merry Christmas again? Did you notice? Saying Merry Christmas. I remember when I first started this beautiful trip, this beautiful journey, I just said to the First Lady, "You are so lucky. I took you on this fantastic journey. It's so much fun. They want to impeach you. They want to do worse than that." By the way, by the way, by the way, it doesn't really feel like we're being impeached. The country is doing better than ever before. We did nothing wrong. We did nothing wrong. And we have tremendous support in the Republican Party like we've never had before. Nobody's ever had this kind of support. But this sacred season, our country is thriving and it's thriving truly like it has never, it has never happened before to the extent what's happening now. And by the way, your state, because of us, not because of local government, but because of us, because of the job that we've done. Because I understand she's not fixing those potholes. That's what the word is. It was all about roads and they want to raise those gasoline taxes on you. We don't want to do that. But she's not fixing the potholes. But Michigan's had the best year it's ever had. Best year it's ever had. And that's because we have auto companies expanding and thriving and they're coming in from Japan and they're coming in from a lot of other places. Look what's happening. And you know, I don't know if you know this, but probably 10 years ago I was honored. I was the Man Of The Year by I think somebody, whoever. I was the Man Of The Year in Michigan. Can you believe it? Long time. And that was long before I ever decided to do this. I was happy. I had a beautiful life. What the hell did I do this for? But look how we're doing. Do we love it? I love it. But anyway, I was the Man Of The Year and probably close to 10 years ago and I came to Michigan. He said, "You're still the Man Of The Year." Thank you. Who said that? Thank you. So I came in and I remember the speech so well. I said, "Why are you allowing them to steal your car companies? Why are you allowing them to go to Mexico and to go from China where they come in from China, they build them in China, they sell them into our country with no tax and you lose your jobs, you lose your factories, the companies leave and you get nothing. Why are they lying?" I asked that a long time ago and we stopped it. We've stopped it. And you see that. And we just made the USMCA. We're getting rid of NAFTA, which I think is the worst trade deal ever. And it's very exciting. It's a great deal. It's a great deal. It's going to stop exactly what we were just talking about. It makes it very, very prohibitive. They can do it, but they've got to pay a hell of a big price to do it. And history has proven that stops them. But we have a great USMCA that we negotiated with Mexico, with Canada. Now, from the standpoint of the farmers, you know what's going on. We had tremendous trade barriers in Canada. We had attacks on dairy products, 297% tariff, nobody talked about it, with Canada. And we had some really bad things with Mexico. We now have a wonderful deal. And if we didn't have a good deal, you know what I would have done what? What? I would have put tariffs on both countries and that would have been it, right? That would have been it. Unfortunately the deal's been sitting with Nancy Pelosi for a long time and what happened? And she had a lot of pressure, especially from manufacturing areas, farm areas, a lot of pressure to sign it. So here's what happens. So I get along with labor. I had a lot of union labor vote for me, tremendous amount of labor. In New York where I come from, we have a lot of unions. And that's okay. That's fine. So we left a little stuff for the union because we figured to get it signed, we'll give a little bit and we did it and we have one great deal. And now you have the Democrats trying to take credit for this deal and that's okay. Whatever it takes. For seven months, it sits. They don't do anything. We give. And by the way, I spoke to the unions the day before I say, "Fellows, you got to get it done." And union labor loves me and I love you too sir. I love you too sir. So we have a great deal with Mexico, with Canada. And it is true. I say it out loud because I say it to them right now. If they ever wanted to break the deal, that's okay. If somebody wants to break a deal with me, you always have to have an alternative, right? And this country, the deals we made, we did a deal with South Korea. That's great. We did a deal with Japan, 40 billion dollar deal with Japan. It was just a little piece of a deal. Okay? That was a piece of a deal. And I said to Japan, "Look, you got to make this deal or we're going to put a 20% tariff on the cars. And that's more money than anything we're talking about." That's all right. That's all right. That's all right. Get her out. Ger her out of here. Oh well. You're about to hear the greatest speech you've ever heard. And that's going to be the publicity because all the fake news back there will say massive riot… Massive riots. Fake news. But seriously, look, look, look, they won't say it. They won't say it, because when we have protesters all in favor, they don't talk about it, but there's a slob. There's a real slob. Wait, wait a minute. She'll get hell when she gets back home with mom. But she made… Look, she screams a little bit. And you know what I like to do? Avoid them. Because I'll tell you the big problem. I could hardly hear her. What happens is all of you people go crazy. Look, look, look, and the place. Okay, so there's one disgusting person who made… Wait, wait, who made a… I wouldn't say this, but made a horrible gesture with the wrong finger right? Now they won't say that, the fake news, they won't say it. If one of us did that, it would be like the biggest story ever. I think it's terrible. And I'll tell you the other thing, I don't know who the security company is, but the police came up, but they want to be so politically correct so they don't grab her wrist lightly and get her out. They say, "Oh, would you please come? Would you please come with me?" Sure. "Ma'am, would you?" And then she gives the guy the finger and he, "Oh, Oh." You got to get a little bit stronger than that, folks. And they… . Making another group of tariffs, seven and a half percent. This gives us a lot of currency to do the phase two deal, which they want to start, but we're taking in billions of dollars and to help the farmers who were targeted, 16 billion and 12 billion the previous year, helps the farmers. So you know what we do, out of that big check that we get, all that money flows into the treasury. Out of the big check, we gave the farmers 16 billion dollars and 12 billion for the previous year. And you know, the incredible thing, and I was with a lot of farmers. I was with a group of 36 farmers at the White House. You know what they said to me? I said, "Don't worry about it. We're going to take care of you guys." And I used a bad word. You know what word I used? We're going to get you a subsidy. And they said this two years ago, I said, "How much were you targeted for?" This was the first year. "12 billion, sir." The second year was 16. They were target. That's what they didn't get from China. So I said, "It's all right, we're going to give you a subsidy of the same and we're going to take it out of the tariffs and we're going to have billions and billions of dollars left over." And they said, "Sir, we don't want money. We just want a level playing field." I've never seen that before. I've never seen that before. So we will have invested in our military, since I'm here, which is less than three years. Our military, by the way, in all due respect to the previous two administrations, our military was depleted. It was depleted. It was in bad shape. We had fighter jets that were 35 years old. We had planes that were 60 years… You heard where the father flew them, the grandfather flew them, and now the young son comes in. We've got the best equipment in the world now. Spent two and a half trillion dollars, made in the USA. Two and a half trillion. We will shortly. That'll be all finished. We're going to have the greatest… Now we have the best planes. We're going to have the best ships. We're building a lot of ships now. We're building the most powerful weapons in the world. Now, we don't want to even talk about it. We never want to use them. But you know, the way we're not going to have to use them is if we have them. We're building submarines, the power of which nobody's ever seen before. Nobody's ever seen before. It's funny, we have these companies come in. I like to make good deals. You like to make good deals. That's what we do, right? So these really countries that come in, prime ministers, presidents, sometimes dictators, those we can't deal with too much. "Sir, we'd like to buy a nuclear submarine." I say, "No thanks." I turn them all down. You have no idea how many people… But we're building some of the… They're the most powerful weapons ever made by man or womankind. I say mankind and womankind. They can definitely fight. They're the real deal. These guys, so good looking. I said, "You could be a movie star. Go to Hollywood." "No sir. I like doing what I'm doing." So I said to these guys, you going to see, just like central casting, I said, I said, "Fellas, how good is this plane?" They said, "Sir, it's great." "Why?" "Because the enemy can't see it." That helps. Stealth. It's actually called super stealth. So I said, "You mean they can't see, so you shoot at them but they can't…" He said, "They have no idea where we are, sir." I said, "That sounds good to me." Nobody does it. Nobody can do it. We have the whole thing and we bought in a lot of those planes, we bought in a lot of great stuff. And I won't tell you the story, but very early on I thought we were going to have a problem someplace, and one of the generals came up to me and said, "Sir, don't go. Don't do it." "Why?" "We don't have the ammunition." And I said two things. I never want to hear a President. Right? We never want to have a President hear that again, nor do we want a President to have to go through the crap that we were going through back then. But, another thing we did, which to me is such an incredible thing to have done. It's such an honor. So our last US Armed Forces, the last branch was the Air Force, right? That was many, many decades ago. We are now building and we have now gotten funding for the sixth branch of the United States Armed Forces, The Space Force. So I'll be able to tell my kids someday and everybody else, "See that Space Force? That was my baby." And you think that was easy? That's not easy. Because you have Democrats that do not like our military. They do not like our military. And we did something yesterday, because for three years I would see people that run… Incredible people, the heads of the Historically Black Colleges and Universities in the country. And every year they'd come in and they'd be looking for help. They needed help and they do need help with it and it's great and they do an incredible job. So many great schools, but they need help. And every year they'd have to come and come. I got to know them actually. I said, "The only bad thing is you won't see me too much anymore." Because we just provided record funding for a nation's Historically Black Colleges and Universities. And it's longterm, they're not going to have to come. So I said, "Look, we could do it where we do it every year or we'll do what we have. What do you want?" They said, "Let us just have it." So we'll miss them. But they are great people. They've done an incredible job. And our extraordinary jobs boom, which created another 266,000 jobs last month, and then you add the undercount from the previous two months, you're close to 300,000 jobs. And they said, if you're a business watcher which I am, I love watching business, but they said they were guessing, could be 70,000, could be 80,000, maybe 90, maybe 110, somebody said. Then the number comes out, 266,000 with an adjustment. Remember about four months ago when we had one little period, right? We had one little period where there was a little downturn. They said, "Oh, Oh, we think we're going into a recession." I said, "Don't worry about it." "We think we're going into a recession." They were willing to lose their wealth. They were willing for this stocks and whatever the hell they own, what do you guys own back there? Let it go. They'll go bust. They don't care. Anything to get rid of us. Not me, us. And you know what? Then all of a sudden, and now for the last couple of weeks, we've set brand new records in the history of the various stock markets. So, as of yesterday, we've had 133 record days in the stock market now, and that's in less than three years. So when I see that I don't care because I don't… I'm not allowed to have stock. I can't have stock. They consider it a conflict of interest and that I can understand. I agree. I can. But you know what? I'll tell you what. What I see, I see tremendous job growth because we're setting records. But you know what I also see? The 401ks where people are up 90%, they're up 97%, they're up 82%. I tell you the story all the time. I mean, I have people coming up to me, and a man came up, a policeman. I've told this story, but I've had many, so many times, but this guy in particular, because it was early and that was a year ago. That was a long time ago. Right now it's much higher than that. But he said, "Sir, I want to thank you. My wife thinks I'm a loser. All my life, we never did well with the 401ks, with stocks. Everything I invested, I'm up 72%, sir. She thinks I'm a financial genius. She's so in love with me. She so in love." He said, "She said, ‘Darling, I think you're one of the greatest investors. Why don't you do this professionally?' And I don't even know what I'm doing, sir. I just have all these stocks." So I just wanted to tell you, I look at a 401k, who has 401ks here? So that's what I see. I don't care about the rich ones. I care about everybody. I care. I care about everybody actually. Ford motor company just announced that it is investing 1.5 billion dollars into auto factories in the Detroit area, creating another 3000 Michigan jobs. And that's on top of the many other investments we've gotten from Japanese companies, car companies, and other companies. But they're all coming in and a lot of them are coming to Michigan. And I say, "Hey, go to Michigan." Sometimes they'll go south and that's okay, whatever. I want them in this country. But ideally I want to fill them up. We're doing so well in Michigan with the auto companies. Now you're back. You're back. So, you're back. Very proud of you. Very proud of you. But while we're creating jobs, fighting for Michigan workers, and achieving numbers that you've never seen before, incredible victories for the American people are happening. The radical left in Congress is consumed with hatred and envy and rage. You see what's going on? I'll tell you, these people are crazy. You ever hear, "It's the economy, stupid." You know that was Clinton's saying. If you have a good economy. I have the greatest economy in the history of this country and nobody talks about it. Nobody talks about it. If you're a Democrat, they say, " Oh, it's the economy…" If the economy's any good. And let me just tell you a little secret. If crooked Hillary would've won, your economy would have crashed. You were going down. The regulations were taking it down. The taxes were taking it down, instead of being up 92% or whatever you're up, a lot, you would have been down, you would have been at less than half. It was crashing. For all those people that would say, "Oh, it's the Obama…" Let me tell you something. You were dying. And if you look at that first period of a couple of months, it was a disaster, but it was heading south. And as sure as you're standing, and I'm sorry we couldn't get you seats, we didn't have any room. And by the way, 20,000 people outside had to leave. You know? It's so cold outside we told them, "Don't worry about a screen, go home, go home and watch." But we had, this is about a 5,500 seat arena. And I said to my people, "Why so small?" Are we spoiled? I watch these guys come in like Biden, he has a big rally and they get 93 people show up. No, it's true. I don't understand it. And did you see the new polls from USA Today came out? I'm killing everybody. And they hate me. USA Today hates me. But there's a poll, we're beating everybody. But, so Biden has this rally, they've got 200 seats, but only a small number of people. So you know what they do? They set up a round table. So think of these people. They come in, they think they're going to listen to the speech, they end up sitting on a round table discussing… They must've been happy, right? We don't have enough room for round tables. I'm sorry folks. No, they set up a round table but I think we're doing great. And how do you beat what we've done? With the economy, with our great vets, with choice. You've finally got choice. They've been trying to get it for almost 50 years. Four more years. Four more years. Four more years. Four more years. Four more years. Four more years. And these people back here? Your seat or stand is better. Right? But you know what? They're going to be much more famous because the cameras can't see you. They can only see them. And the other thing, the cameras, do you ever notice, I go to these stadiums, 25, 30,000 people. They never show the crowd. You know why? Because they don't want to have… If crazy Pocahontas, if crazy Pocahontas goes to the middle of Central Park or whatever. She's in Manhattan. You got me. And people, I mean, I could have, I could have Baron Trump go into Central Park and he'd get a crowd that would be just as… He's 13. He'd get a bigger crowd. But if she has the crowd, "Oh, these crowds are so big." I've had crowds over the last couple of weeks. We went to different Pennsylvania, Florida. But I mean thousands and thousands of people can't get into these NBA arenas, right? Big arenas. And we set records at everyone because we use the floor. Thank you. I appreciate it. But we use the floor, right? The basketball court. So we set records at every arena. They never even mention the crowds. They never mention the crowds. It's sort of amazing. You know what? I don't think we've ever had an empty seat from the time I came down the escalator. That's a long time ago. I don't think we've ever had an empty seat. Now what the crooked media does though, if you got like over here, look how packed it is and there's thousands outside, but I… "Please go home. You're going to catch pneumonia." But here's the thing. If this man and that beautiful woman happened to get up because they want to go to the bathroom, those cameras will turn to those two seats and they'll say "Trump wasn't able to fill up the arena." I always get nervous when I see some… I know they're coming back. Nobody ever leaves our speeches. Because is there a better place to be in the world than a Trump rally? But every time I see a man get up, I see a beautiful woman with a baby and they're getting up. The baby's going crazy and they're getting up. They're going to take it… But I know they're going to be right back. And I say, "Fill those two seats. I don't want them to see it." Because they'll say, "Couldn't fill up the arena." These are truly dishonest people. After three years of sinister witch hunts, hoaxes, scams, tonight the House Democrats are trying to nullify the ballots of tens of millions of patriotic Americans. Capped off with one of the greatest election evenings in history. Was that the greatest? Remember when they all said, remember when they all said, "No, no. You can't win Michigan. You can't." Then I went, I did one in Grand Rapids, right? Grand Rapids. We had 32,000 people that night. It was one o'clock in the morning. That means it was Election Day when I started speaking. Hillary, Barack Obama, Michelle Obama, and Bill Clinton, they did an emergency trip. They did an emergency trip to Michigan at six o'clock. They got here at prime time. They started to speak. She had 500 people. I got here at one o'clock in the morning the next day, which is now Election Day. How many people were there? 32,000 people outside, inside. It was the last speech of Michigan. And they say, "Well, sir, it's very hard to win Michigan." I said, "Why would it be hard?" Here's the beautiful thing. Everything I told you I've done, but much more so. I said I was going to bring car companies back. I said I was going to bring in… I just hope you people know that. I just hope you know it. But I'll never forget that night. And in all fairness to Bill Clinton, he used to be a friend of mine until I ran for office. I like him, I like him. But he told, you know the way they tried to shut him out, right? Because he's a pro. He's an instinct guy, right? He's instinct. He doesn't need… Right? Because he's a pro. He's an instinct guy, right? He's instinct. He doesn't need polling companies. Who the hell wants him? You know, if you want a polling company, pick up the newspaper. The problem is the newspaper polls are more fake than the news they write. They write fake polls. It's true, they write fake polls. You call them suppression polls. You read them and you get depressed, because it looks like you're doing badly. They do that. I think it's almost worse than what they write, and you can't get much worse than what they write. So what happens is Bill Clinton said to Crooked Hillary, his very dishonest wife, Crooked Hillary. Do you think he calls her Crooked Hillary? He might. Maybe he just calls her crooked? He said, "Crooked, I'm telling you. Crooked, I don't like what I'm seeing in Michigan. I don't like what I'm seeing in Wisconsin." He said, "I took the trip to Wisconsin and I'll tell you what, they had those Trump/Pence signs all the way to the convention area, every lawn, every loan. I don't like Wisconsin." And then he said, "Oh, don't worry about it." What the hell does he know? They told him, "What do you know?" Remember, they shut him out at the … They didn't want him talking. He was right. I mean, I don't want to cause any problems in the family, but he was right. But he talked about Wisconsin. Then he talked about Michigan. He said, "Crooked, I'm telling you, Crooked, I don't like what I'm seeing in Michigan. I was in Michigan and I'm telling you, they had those damn signs. I saw some houses where they had four of them on one lawn, and two of them on the car." And he said, "You horrible human being. You'd better start listening to me, because you're going to get your ass whooped? And you know what happened? You know what happened? She didn't listen, fortunately. And she didn't come to Michigan enough. And she didn't come to Wisconsin, I think at all, right? Because her polling data looked good. It looked good to me, too. Every time I went there with these crowds. So we won Wisconsin. We won Michigan and the great Ronna McDaniel … where is Ronna? Where is Ronna? Ronna, she was so horrible. I didn't know her, Ronna McDaniel, and she was so aggressive. She kept calling and said, "Could you please come out to Michigan?" I said, "Who the hell are you?" And I said, "What do you mean, another trip?" So anyway, I made, we had these big crowds. I made it again. Then finally I said, two weeks out, I said, "Ronna, no more. We're going to win it or we're not." "Okay." 00 in the evening for this final deal in Grand Rapids. "Sir, could you come to Michigan tonight?" And I thought, I was just about finished. I went to a last great state, and I said, "It's over." Now I sit back and I watch, and let's see what happens, right? But she said, "Could you come to Michigan?" I said, that is the most aggressive human being I've ever met. And we did it. And we won Michigan. And the word is that we're much higher right now in the polls than we were ever in 2016 in Michigan. You better remember when you walk into … you know, it's November 3rd this time, November 3rd. By the way though, that evening, that incredible evening in November, one of the biggest nights in the history of television. You never hear them say it, so I might as well. That election … and my debates … you see their debates are dying. Who wants to watch Buttigieg, Buttigieg? Buttigieg! You know that you pronounce it they say … I heard some guy saying, "No, no, because it's an unpronounceable name." That's why they call him Mayor Pete, right? Mayor Pete. Mayor Pete. Mayor Pete! I've had you up to here, Mayor Pete. No, Buttigieg is leading. How does … no, you say it this way. You say it … they call him Mayor Pete, because nobody can pronounce his last name. That's the only … people think it says … by the way, you know what? I'm not going to say bad things about him. You know why? I'd love him to win. I thought I knocked off Pocahontas. I did it a year too early, a year too early. I give her credit, she then started to come back. I don't think she's going to make it though. She's gasping. She's gasping for air. But I saw them pronouncing Buttigieg, and they said, "Here's what you do, boot edge edge." Say, "Edge, like the edge of a building. Edge edge," Buttigieg. Alfred E. Newman. You got to be older to know what that means. But congressional Democrats are directly attacking 2.3 million Michigan voters who rose up in 2016, won the state, and now the Democrats are very upset. They want to get Michigan back. They just don't know how to do it, because they didn't do a thing for Michigan. They didn't do anything for Michigan. All they did was take away your companies and let them go to Mexico and other places. You know, I don't know if you know it, Mexico has 32% of your car business. You know that, right? Not because of me. They're not moving. But Mexico has … 32% of our car business moved to Mexico. Can you believe this? Before I got there, but that's what I used to talk about. I said, when I was honored that night, I said, "How do you let this happen? How do you let all these companies leave?" It used to go, … it's probably maybe the single biggest reason I ran for president. It might be the … and I had a lot of them. Immigration, I had a lot of them, but that may be the single biggest. With today's illegal unconstitutional and partisan impeachment, the do nothing Democrats, and they are do nothing … all they want to do is focus on this, what they could be doing … are declaring their deep hatred and disdain for the American voter. This lawless, partisan impeachment is a political suicide march for the Democrat Party. Have you seen my polls in the last four weeks? It's crazy. It's crazy. You know why? Because people, we have an election right down the road. I announced three months ago that I'm running, right? I'll give you a little clue. I announced because I figured once I announce, they'd never impeach, nobody would be so stupid. But they'd been trying to impeach me from day one. They've been trying to impeach me from before I ran, okay? Because if you remember when I ran, I went immediately to number one, never came off number one. We had center stage from day one in the debates. So we had, I don't know, 14, 15 debates. We had a total of 18, actually. People forgot there was one that they never talk about it, but that's okay. But we had 18 people, and I was center stage. And I said, "Wait a minute, this is no good." I want odd numbers, because of your center stage, if you have a 10 that means two people are in the middle. So I said, "Make it 11 or make it nine, or I'm not showing up." And generally they did it, because we were way ahead from the beginning. But I made a lot of great friends out of that group, and many of them are good friends today. Although you wouldn't know it based on the … they say that was the meanest … that was a pretty mean primary, you got to say. Wasn't that fun? I liked it. Through their depraved actions today, Crazy Nancy Pelosi's House Democrats have branded themselves with an eternal mark of shame, and it really is. It's a disgrace. Democrat lawmakers do not believe you have the right to select your own president. They think that the Washington swamp, which we believe it or not, it ain't easy, because they got so much stacked, including these guys. You know what? These guys are apart of the Democrat Party. They are a part of it. You might as well call them Democrats. You know, it's owned by Commicast. They're just as bad as CNN, or they're just as bad as MSNBC. And by the way, CNN and MSNBC, their ratings are down the tubes. It's great. I love it. I love it. But they think the Washington swamp should be able to veto the results of an election. That's what they think. There's never been a time like this. Think of it, you have the greatest economy in the history of the world. Other countries come to see me, all of their leaders, and they say, "Sir, " first thing, "Sir, congratulations on your economy. We're trying to do the same thing. Congratulations, sir." And these guys don't like talking about it. And if they do, they say, "Obama did it. Oh, Obama, Obama." Remember Obama said, "You will never be president. He will never be president?" Then remember he said, "I will consider it a personal front if you allow him to be president?" And then I became president. He wasn't so happy. And in all fairness, he campaigned harder than Crooked Hillary, because he had more strength. I mean, I go to these places, Secret Service, they take me. I haven't seen a lobby in three years. It's true. I go through basements. I pass compactor plants. I know more about compactors from this job. I don't see lobbies. I say "Fellows, you think you could ever maybe take me through a lobby?" "No, sir." But I'll tell you what. I go upstairs, downstairs, all around. They're taking me up three flights, go down one. I said, "Are we almost there?" "Yes, sir, another four flights." And I say, "You think Hillary could do this? I don't think so." They'd bring her back home. She wants to go to sleep. And now I hear she wants to run again. Wouldn't that be great? Oh. Thank you. Thank you. Oh would we love that? You think the Democrats are screwed up? Wait until that happens. Wouldn't that be … Oh, there's my guy. Lock her up. Lock her up. Lock her up. Well look, based on the FBI report, you just saw what happened with the IG, where they came out with the FBI. Based on that, you know what? I never stopped you. But now, think of what they did. Think of what they did. Think of how dishonest it all was. They shouldn't even be allowed to have an impeachment, because it was based on dishonesty. It was based on illegality. She went out, and they paid for a fake dossier. They gave money to foreigners to write a fake dossier, totally disproven, totally fake. The FBI then took that fake dossier and they used it in the FISA Court to get approval to spy on my campaign. And if we were Democrats, they would've been in jail two years ago. It's a disgrace. Think of what they did. So they use this fake dossier, and they brought it before this big deal court. It's a big deal, the FISA Court. And they said this stuff, and they lied about it, because Comey, who's another beauty … did I do a great job when I fired his ass? What a great job. Oh no, they had bad plans. No, I did a great thing. That was like throwing a rock at a hornet's nest. Did that place explode? And then we learned about Lisa Page, and her wonderful lover, Peter Strzok. I love you Lisa. I love you more than anybody in the world. I love you more than anybody in the world. It causes problems with the wife, but we won't talk about that. Those tapes didn't work well. No, how about those statements, right? And then they say, "In all fairness," … I really liked the report, but how does the Inspector General say … because don't forget, he was appointed by Obama. So I'm not knocking him because he gave us a lot of nuggets, but we had a lot of those nuggets. How does the Inspector General say, "You have these horrible … he's going to lose. Isn't he? He's going to lose, or she's going to win 100 million." Did you see all the zeros? It was like … I'm blinking. I says, "I think it's 100." "He's going to lose 100 to one. Isn't he Peter? I love you so much, Peter. I've never loved anyone like you. He's going to lose 100 million to one, Peter, right?" "That's right. He's going to lose 100 million to one." But there's no bias. How about the insurance policy? To me, the greatest. Just in case she loses, we have an insurance policy! We're in the insurance policy right now folks! We've been in it for three years, that's what they meant. I mean the insurance policy is on an artificial respirator, because we're doing awfully well. And I'll tell you something, Rush Limbaugh said it. Sean Hannity said it. Laura Ingram said it. Tucker said it. Ainsley said it, but a lot of people have said it. They said, "There's nobody in the world that could have handled that stuff that happened, and still created one of the greatest economies, and done more than any other president ever before in the first three years." I understand that. I understand that, but it's my life, very unfair to my family. I have to say this very, very unfair to my family. What they put my family through is a disgrace. Me, it's my life. It's fine. I do. But you know what? What they put my family through is a disgrace, and they ought to be ashamed, and we should get apologies all over the place. So yesterday I sent Pelosi a letter denouncing and condemning her party's outrageous abusive power. That's what it is. They have nothing. They're the ones that should be impeached, every one of them. I mean you got this guy, Schiff. He makes up a statement, and he goes in front of Congress where he has immunity, and he makes up a statement from me that's totally fictitious, totally out of thin air. The worst statement I've ever heard. Many people saw it. I had a person two weeks ago that said, "I didn't love the statement you made. I said, "Really? Didn't you read the transcripts?" I always say, "Read the transcript. But didn't you read it" "No, no. I heard it on television. I watched Adam Schiff." He made it up. I then sent him the transcript. He said, "Oh, now I feel better. That's perfect." I call it perfect. He called it perfect. Everyone calls it, if you read it. But here's the thing. He makes up this statement, and it finished. Didn't he have eight quid pro quos? Eight. Could you imagine, you're dealing with a country, and you say eight times that you've got to do something. The first time they say, "Well." The second time they say, "That's strange." Third time they say, "What's wrong?" You said eight times? Eight times. They'd have you arrested. They'd have you put into an insane asylum. But he actually said … I think he said eight, not seven, eight. And then he finished with, "Don't call me, I'll call you." Can you imagine? The President of the United States, "Don't call me, I'll call you." You know what that is? That's a mafia statement, okay? That's the head of the mafia saying, "Don't call me." This guy actually said that, and then he walked away and people became incensed, because they knew that wasn't the people that read the thing. Most people believed him. He's a liar! Because you know, he's a corrupt politician, 100%. No, he's a corrupt … and then I see him. By the way, you ever see this guy? He walks up to the mics. I mean, we're not … all fairness, look, I don't want to be … because with Me Too, I never even think about looks anymore, okay? I don't talk about looks of a male or a female, but in his case, let's just say … the last time I'll ever refer to this. He's not exactly the best looking guy we've ever seen. No, any mic. He walks up to the mic, and he's so just, "This is a sad, sad day for America. Our president is an employee of Russia. I have absolute proof that the president," this is at the beginning, and every week they'd say, "Where's the proof?" "It's coming. It's coming." Then we get the Mueller report, nothing. And I'll tell you what, I know some of the people in this audience. If I spent not $45 million, not 18 Trump haters, I call them the angry Democrats. It was 13, then it went to 18, and then Mueller. Did Muller do a good job? Did he do a good job? No! Boo! How was his performance in front of Congress? Boo! Not the best, but think of this, $45 million they spent. And you know, I heard somebody say, "Well, we got back some of that money." Let me tell you, you cost this country billions, and billions, and billions of dollars in all of the things that didn't get done, in all of the embarrassment to our country. You caused billions and billions of dollars, and it was a hoax. But this guy, Schiff, "I have absolute proof. I have this. I have that, this, that." Anytime he sees a camera and he's stone faced, stone faced. He's a pathological liar. He gets up, and I've never seen anything like it. Even I was saying, "I wonder what he has. What does he have?" He says, "I have absolute," I said, "I haven't spoken to Russia in year. What the hell do I have to do with Russia?" But this guy gets up … oh, I think we have a vote coming in. Haleigh! Wow! Thank you, Haleigh, great job. Wow. The Republican party has never been so affronted, but they've never been so united as they are right now, ever, never. And I know the senators, and they're great guys, and women too. We have some great women. We have great guys. They're great people. They love this country. They're going to do the right thing. They're going to do the right thing. So I said in my letter to Pelosi … I love that. You know, usually there's one, two. The Republicans, look, I've said it for a long time. The Democrats are lousy politicians, they really are. They've got horrible policies, open borders, crime is fine, drugs pouring through. I mean, think of what they do. Sanctuary cities, they love sanctuary cities. They're lousy politicians, but they have one thing … two things. They are vicious. They're the most vicious people. The Republicans aren't as vicious. They may learn to be vicious after going through this, though. But the other thing, the Democrats always stick together. Now think of it, three Democrats went over to our side, no Republicans. It's unheard of. And by the way, this is for a hundred years. I'm not just talking about this little point in time. The Republicans are known as, it's always harder to stick together. These people are great. We have a great Republican Party, and we have to get that change. We have to take back the house. You'll have the greatest healthcare ever if we take … and by the way, we had another victory. The individual mandate, just a little while ago, it came over the wires, it was just upheld. The individual mandate is now gone. The most unpopular part of Obamacare. It was just upheld. So I said in my letter to Pelosi, "By proceeding with your invalid impeachment, you're violating your oath of office. You're breaking your allegiance to the Constitution. You're declaring open war on American democracy. You dare to invoke the founding fathers in pursuit of this election nullification scheme, yet your spiteful actions display unfettered contempt for America's founding, and your egregious conduct." And listen though, it's so true, it threatens to destroy what our founders pledged, and in fact their very lives to build. "You are the ones interfering in America's elections. You are the one subverting America's democracy. We did nothing wrong, nothing whatsoever. This was just an excuse. You are the ones that are obstructing justice. You are the ones bringing pain and suffering to our republic for your own selfish, personal, political and partisan gain." They're bringing pain. The work we could be doing on lowering drug prices, on getting rid of these horrible, horrible situations. You know in the border … the woman is okay? Is she okay? Okay, thank you very much. Thank you. I mean, some of these people are waiting here for three days, right? Thank you. They'll come back. Come back. Merry Christmas! Thank you. Merry Christmas is true. But what they've done with this perversion, it's perversion. And when you watch some of these people get up and speak today, they don't even … "You have violated the Constitution." "Well, what does he done wrong?" "Well, we don't know that." They don't even have any crime. This is the first impeachment where there's no crime. I say, "Tell me what I did, please." "Well, we don't know. You violated the Constitution." You had Turley, who's smart, Alan Dershowitz, these guys. All of them, they said, "There's no crime. There's no crime," right? There's no crime! There's no crime! I'm the first person that ever get impeached, and there's no crime. I feel guilty. You know what they call it? Impeachment light. It's impeachment light. That's why, with Richard Nixon, I just see it as a very dark era, very dark, very … oh, you don't even like to think. I don't know about you, but I'm having a good time, it's crazy. But I also know we have a great group of people behind us in the Republican Party, we really do. Maybe I wouldn't feel the same way, but we have a great group of people behind us. We had in the House, and we have it in the Senate. They're doing a great job, so I'm not worried. I'm not worried, because it's always good when you don't do anything wrong, you get impeached. That may be a record that will last forever. But you know what they have done? They've cheapened the impeachment process. And now anybody that become … this is a sacred position. Anybody that becomes president, I mean, they could have a phone call and they get impeached. So if the Republicans … if you had a Democrat as president, we have a Republican house, they don't like the guy for whatever reason, or the woman, they impeach the person. It's cheapened it. It's exactly what our founding fathers didn't want, and they said it could happen, and it's happened. But I know one thing, Americans will show up by the tens of millions next year to vote Pelosi the hell out of office. But it's so disappointing. I see a woman, Carolyn Maloney. She's a long time, nothing much, believe me. She's a Congresswoman from Manhattan, the east side. I was with her. Her first race, I helped her. She was always so nice, "Oh, thank you, thank you." I made lots of contributions over the years. In New York, if you're not a … it's purely Democrat, especially in Manhattan. So what happens? I make lots of contributions for years, and years, and years. I go run. The first person I see, Carolyn Maloney. I raise my hand to impeach. Well, give me back the damn money that I've been paying her for so many years. Let her pay me back all the money. Let her pay me back all the money. Then you have this Dingell. Dingell, you know Dingell, from Michigan. You know Dingell? You ever hear of her, Michigan? Debbie Dingell, that's a real beauty. So she calls me up like eight months ago. Her husband was here a long time, but I didn't give him the B treatment. I didn't give him the C or the D. I could've. Nobody what is, you know? I gave the A+ treatment. "Take down the flags." "While you're taking them down for ex-Congressman Dingell …" "Oh, okay?" " … do this, do that, do that, rotunda everything." I gave him everything. That's okay. I don't want anything for it. I don't need anything for anything. She calls me up. "It's the nicest thing that's ever happened. Thank you so much. John would be so thrilled. He's looking down. He'd be so thrilled. Thank you so much, sir." I said, "That's okay, don't worry about it." Maybe he's looking up? I don't know. I don't know. Maybe, maybe. But let's assume he's looking down. But I gave him A+, not A, not B+, not B. I gave him the A+, and she called me. She said, "Oh, no." I won't go into the conversation, because it's not fair do that. But all I want to say is, let's put it this way, it was the most profuse thank you that you could ever get on a scale of zero to 10, it was a 10. Okay, so that was what? February or something. Now they talk about this phony impeachment, and she's out there, "Well, we have to look seriously at our president, because he may have violated the Constitution of the United States." Boo! "And I can't be happy with that, because I love our country. I love this, and I love that." She loves everything. I said, "She's a no," okay? No, but I look at her, and she's so sincere, and what happens? "I vote to impeach Trump." And you know what? I didn't say, "Who the hell knew this was even going to come up?" I went through the whole Muller hoax. They did this big report. I was totally exonerated. They didn't even bring it up at the impeachment, because I was totally exonerated. If they saw one little kernel, one little quarter of a sentence … look what they did with one word. Remember this, what did I do? Why did I do? It's us. But they don't say it that way. They say, "I." They read it totally different, schiff and his band of thieves, they read it. Now I say basically, very simple, do us a favor, our country. Do us! Do us! Not me! Our country! And then what do I say? I say, "The United States Attorney General, Attorney General of the United States could speak to you, it would be great," okay? Because it's known for major corruption. In fact, the new leader of Ukraine got in on a construction … on a platform where he looks for all of the problems of dishonesty, and everything that was going on in Ukraine, right? He looked for it, that's how he got into office. He got into office that way. So we take it and they repeat it a thousand times, and they never say with the right … so I go wild, and we start. And the Republicans have got it right. Now we always correct him, but I use the word us. Us is the United States, our country. And then it actually says, I think, "Comma, country," but they don't say that. They say, "Do me a favor." How many times have you heard it? Where they say in a speech? "And then the president said, do me a favor." Well, that's not what I said. I said, "Do us a favor, our country." And then I said, the Attorney General of the United States, I didn't say my campaign- I said the Attorney General of the United States, I didn't say my campaign manager. Okay? I said the attorney … And these people want to impeach the President of the United States for that? Oh, and then what happened? Right? Then what happened? So then, the President of Ukraine, who's a quality person, said there was no pressure exerted whatsoever. That was a killer for the Democrats, right? Then his foreign minister said the same thing. He said there was no pressure exerted whatsoever. There was no pressure. That's a killer. So now did you see what the Democrats did a couple of days ago? They tried to say that he's not a strong person, that he was weak. They used the word weak, that he was weak, and under the power of Trump, he said. Do you know how insulting that is? Anybody that becomes president of a country, and that's a big country and it's a tough country, you got to be tough. He's tough. But so what they're saying now is he was weak because the wording, it just doesn't fit. Okay? These are really dishonest people. And if the press was fair, this thing never would have happened. So the House Democrats are surrendering their majority, their dignity, their reputations. They look like a bunch of fools. And I'll tell you, we have a lot of new stars in the Republican Party, I could read off a list of 20 names. But they're giving up their honor, and they'll receive a big backlash at the box office. When you take a look, that ballot box, that ballot box on November 3rd, I think we're going to have crowds like we've never had. And I'll tell you something, it used to be, they'd always say, "Oh, the Republicans." You know, in 2018, I didn't run. I didn't run, right? They all said, "Oh, we didn't." Well actually, we picked up two seats in the Senate that these guys never talk about. We just approved 171 federal court justices, 171 federal justices, including courts of appeal, 171. We'll be up, probably by the end of the year, to 182, and for that, I thank President Obama. He gave me 142 openings. He gave me 142. I said to him, my people, I got there, because they say the most important thing you could do as a president is judges and Supreme Court. We have two great Supreme Court judges. Right? Two Justices of the Supreme court, Kavanaugh, Gorsuch. Two great men. They're great. And how about the pain that they put Justice Kavanaugh through, right? Over a phony deal, I hate to tell you. Over a phony deal. What a disgrace, what they put that man through and that family through. Just remember it come November. You got to remember, it's a long time. You know, in the life of Trump, 10 months is an eternity. It's a long time. Somebody said, "Congratulations sir, you're going to win." I said, "Don't say that. Just don't talk about it. Let's always pretend you're one point down." Like last time. Going to be close. Nope, it's going to be close. But what they put that man through was horrible, what they put his family through was horrible. And you know, those stories largely have been recanted. And frankly, the ones that didn't recant, I don't know what a Supreme Court judge does, but he should sue them. He should sue them. So we want to take back the House, we'll hold the Senate, and we'll keep the White House. You will have the greatest healthcare. You will continue with the greatest judges. You know, we have judges that are … We just had a great story in the Wall Street Journal. I have to be always very truthful, because if I'm a little bit off, they call me a liar. They'll say, "He gets a Pinocchio," the stupid Washington Post, they have Pinocchio. I mean, even if you're saying things perfectly, it's a Pinocchio. There's nothing you can say where you don't get a Pinocchio. But what happens, what happens is we have Wall Street Journal the other day got the best story. They said, "Whether you like him or not, the job he's done on judges and Supreme Court Justices, but the job he's done on judges is amazing. Say it's the most important thing. See, I don't agree. I say defense is the most, the military is the most. But once you're beyond the military, I mean to me defense is the most important. Because without good defense, maybe we don't need judges so much, right? It's like somebody said, "Well, we violated the budget." I said, "Do me a favor, don't worry about the budget. If we're attacked and aren't doing very well and somebody says, ‘Well, at least we have a good budget,' that doesn't work too well." Right? That doesn't work. So we have great military, we have great judges, we have great everything. Drug prices down. For the first time in 51 years, drug prices came down. And that was with no help from the Democrats. If they helped, because you need their votes, if they helped, I could get those drug prices down 40 and 50%. Okay? And we just approved, and we're approving very soon for the Governor of Florida, Ron DeSantis, where he can buy, he has the right to go, we're giving him the right to go and buy from a foreign country, where the prices for the identical drug, identical drug are 50% less. He's going to do that for the people of Florida. And we're going to do that for your governors if they want to do that. We'll get that down so far. Everyone in America can see straight through the Washington Democrats' phony, dangerous charade. Schiff makes up so many things. Pelosi makes it up, and she backs him up. I saw her on a television show, and George Stephanopoulos, that's another beauty, he said, even he said, he was defending me. I couldn't believe it. He made this statement, "But you know he lied on that. He made up this stuff." "No, he didn't, he didn't." So that means Nancy Pelosi said no, the statement that he made up. But it's all going to end soon, and it's going to come out to a beautiful, great victory for the Republican Party and for this nation. Thank you very much. So that's it. We have the greatest country. We've turned around a ship. We need four more years. If we don't have it … Now, if you want to drive them crazy, we had one group in Pennsylvania, some guy started screaming, " 16 more years." 16. They went crazy. And you know what they don't understand? When I do get out, they're all going to go out of business. They're making more money than they've ever made. That crazy New York Times, one of the worst newspapers in the world, one of the most dishonest newspapers in the history of the world, totally phony. They came out with a story, where it was a great headline for me, and the people that read it, the super radical left, they called and complained so much that they changed the headline and took it from positive to negative on a good story. Can you believe it? No, they're among the most dishonest people. But I'll never forget, before I took that great escalator ride down with our First Lady … Our First Lady is doing a great job, great job. I said, "First Lady, you're so lucky I took you on this journey, this wonderful, beautiful journey." And it is. You know why it's a wonderful, beautiful journey? Because look at, what we're accomplishing is unbelievable. It's unprecedented. It is unprecedented what we're accomplishing. "You're so lucky," I said it to all my people. I have great people in the back. I say, "You folks are so lucky I took you on this. You could be home right now, relaxing." But I'd rather be here, frankly, than any place. These rallies are great. They're inspiring. You are inspiring. And you know, it's funny, we're not even into election season. Yeah, it's a long way away. We're not even in it. And yet, I think the enthusiasm right now is greater than it was even before the 2016 election. Does that make any sense? I think a lot of it has to do with a witch hunt. A lot of it has to do with the phony, witch hunt because you're smart people. You're the elite. They're not the elite. You're the elite. You're the elite. You do better than they do. They talk about it, don't you hate it? "Well, the elite … " Oh really? I went to better schools. Many of you went to better schools. We won't talk about homes, even though your homes are nicer. We won't talk about jobs. You see the jobs reports? You see what's happening? Do you see where wages are going up? You know, when I first started, when I was here, one of my first speeches, I was talking that people made more money, that was four years ago, so it was 20 years before that, so that's 24, 25 years ago. They made more money 24 years ago than they were making when I got elected president. And they worked one job versus two or three jobs. Now it's going up beautifully and we want that, the salaries. And you know, the number one group of people that are going up is the blue collar worker. It's percentage, the best. The blue collar worker. They had two and three jobs. The blue collar worker is going up the most. Anyway, so you know what else? The thing I'm happiest about, African American unemployment, the lowest in the history of our country. African American. Remember I used to say, you remember, look at, you. Are you the greatest guy? Everyone thinks, do I pay? I'm telling you, I have a group of African American guys, and gals by the way, that follow me around and they think I pay them, and I don't. I love them, they love me. They come. How many rallies have you come to? A lot. They're great people, just great. Thank you. I don't even know who the hell he is. Is that right? I don't know him, but I like him. I see him at so many rallies. I appreciate it. You and your group, they're great people. Thank you. So you're obviously doing well if you can travel around like that, right? Ah, he knows. I appreciate it, I really do. I think it's fantastic. Thank you. Thank you. But think of this, African-American unemployment is the lowest it's ever been in the history of our country. Their poverty levels, they had a horrible poverty level, in the negative sense, now their poverty levels are the best they've ever been in the history of our country. Same with Hispanic Americans, the best unemployment numbers and employment numbers. And the same with Asians, the best unemployment. And women, I'm sorry, 71 years, best in 71 years. I've let the women down! But I think within another couple of months, you'll be historical. So only 71 years best. The best in 71 years. But what we're doing has been an incredible thing. It's an incredible thing. When I'm on the debate stage with one of these characters, and they try and say negative stuff, I'll just say, "Well, here's the story. In the history of our country, this group is doing the best, and that group is doing the best, and the women are doing the best, and everybody's doing. And frankly, you know what it is? The whole country's doing the best. Okay? The whole country is doing the best." So we have records and everything, and yet they're trying to, and they really are, I've never seen anything like it, they're accusing me, really, of doing what Joe Biden … Biden admitted what he did. How about this? They protect him. Did you see the crummy debate? Those debates are so boring. They're dying in the ratings. They're dying, they're dying. " While it's totally unsupported!" What's unsupported? He's on tape saying that he's holding back $1 billion from Ukraine unless you change the prosecutor. How about that question? I won't say who answered, because you know I'm not, I actually used to like the guy, he was a nice guy to me, but now I don't like him so much, but that's okay. But he goes, "While it's totally unsubstantiated, and while we beg your mercy that we're asking you even to bring up this question, but President Trump said you refused to give $1 billion of taxpayer money to Ukraine unless they get the prosecutor to stop looking at your son and your son's company." And Sleepy Joe gives a sleepy answer, and that's the end of it. That's it. Then whenever I bring it up, do you ever notice they always use, " While these charges are totally unsubstantiated"? He's on tape! If that were me, it's the electric chair. They would bring the electric chair back. No, the guy's on tape, and they always say it's unsubstantiated. "It is not supported by fact," one of them the other day, they finally changed the word. "It is supported by fact." No, it's supported by tape. No, it's unbelievable. In many ways, I'd like to have him win because number one, he's going to have to eventually answer that question, and number … She said he doesn't know where he is. That's the other problem. Now, I've been doing this for a long time, and I have much bigger crowds than anybody's ever had in history. By the way, do you know what? I say it against the fake news, because you know what they're going to say. Every stadium is packed. I give my people one instruction, get the largest stadium you can get. Now, that's why I was a little surprised. But in Battle Creek, you don't have that many, right? Not too many stadiums. But I wanted to be here. You know why I wanted to be here? First of all the crowd is incredible. The crowd outside. But let me tell you. No, you know why I wanted to be here? Because we have a lot of choices, but I wanted to be here because this area supported me so overwhelmingly, and I said, "I want to be there." Pretty simple, pretty simple. Pretty simple. I wanted to be here for that reason, and I just want to say thank you, because I'll tell you what, you came in … I don't know, I didn't get 100%, but we got a damn good percentage, right? We got a damn good percentage. So it's really thrilling to be here. But we're joined tonight by many terrific Republican leaders. Your Michigan House Speaker, Lee Chatfield. Where's Lee? Lee, come up if you want. Come on, what the hell, we have nothing else to do. Should we get him up? Yes. Come up Lee, come up Lee, get up here. Come on up, Lee. Republican Party Chairwoman, Ronna McDaniel, who I spoke to. And the bottom line on the end of her story, so when I won I said, "Who's going to head up the RNC?" I said, "I got to get that woman from Michigan." Remember they were all saying, "You can't win Michigan"? Now we're going to win it by so much, you better remember all those. Every time a car plant opens, please think about Trump. Come on up here, Lee. Michigan GOP Chairwoman, Laura Cox. Thank you. Hate to tell you, but all your congressmen, you know where they are right now. Your congressmen, all of your Congresspeople, men, wonderful people, they're at a place called Congress right now. They're doing an unbelievable job of supporting your President and supporting you. They had a choice, "Sir, should we leave and be there?" I said, "Don't leave. Stay right where you are." That's why we got that vote. That's some vote, right Lee? The Chairman of the Woman's Workers and Workers for Trump, and a proud union autoworker, Terry Bowman, who's been so terrific. Thank you, Terry. Come on up. And while Democrats are obsessed with impeachment, we're focused on jobs, jobs, jobs. This group, local leaders. And all your Washington folks, they are right where they have to be in Washington tonight. Thank you. Thank you. Great job. Thank you very much. We've eliminated more job-killing regulations than any administration in the history of our country, whether it's four years or eight years, or in one case, much more than eight years. In a period of two and a half years, we have eliminated more regulations than any other president, by far. You're saving almost $3,000 a year because of regulation cuts. Total income gains for median households will reach $10,000 a family. I'll give you a couple of quick numbers. So under President Bush, for eight years, you saved $450, meaning you took in 450 bucks. Okay, fine. Under President Obama, you took in $975. Under President Trump, including the energy savings, and the regulation savings, and the tax cut savings, it's more than $10,000 in less than three years. Pretty good, right? So for two eight-years, you had a 400, 450, and a 975. That's eight years. 450. In less than three years, you had more than $10,000. That goes right into your pockets. It's one of the reasons our economy is doing well, because, as they say, the consumer is doing better than they've ever done. And that's great, that's what we wanted. We've ended the war on American energy, and the United States is now the number one producer of oil and natural gas on planet earth. And these maniacs want to close it up. How about going to Texas? You know Beto? What? Remember what he said, I said, "Oh, this guy's a loser. You know a salesman, like if you're a great salesman, you never talk that you're a great salesman. You don't walk in and say, "Well, I'm a great salesman. I can sell … " Any guy that does that, they're no good. It's those quiet type that get you. You know, the ones that don't talk. So Beto, when he first got in, remember this clown? He gets in, no, no, he gets in. "I was made for this job, to run for president." After about two weeks, they killed him. He was gone. But you remember, he was against the Bible, he was against religion, he was against guns, and he was against oil and gas. And he comes from Texas. I said, that's a platform. Think of it. He's against religion, he's against guns, and against oil and gas. Think of it. I don't like to bring it up because he's gone zone, but he comes from Texas. I said, "Abraham Lincoln can't win in Texas with that platform." But they are, all of them, they want to close up your energy. It's a big deal. They want to close up your steel mills. They don't want your steel mills. Look at what I've done for steel. I mean, the steel is back. We taxed all of the dump steel coming in from China and other places, and your steel mills that are doing great, they're expanding all over the country. And they were going to be out of business within two years. The way they were going, they were gone. United States Steel is spending now billions of dollars on expansions. Every major Democrat running for president has pledged to eliminate gas powered automobiles and destroy the U.S. auto industry forever. And you know why? Because they have these maniacs that say you got to go all electric. I want to have an alternative, a big alternative. You're going to always have the alternative. And a lot of people don't know of the electric can ever catch the gas, you know? And by the way, there'll be different forms of energy coming along. But they want to close them up, and we're not closing them up. We're going to have lots of alternatives so that you can have it from a pricing, you can have it for a lot of different reasons. We're even bringing back the old light bulb. You heard about that, right? The old light bulb, which is better. I say, "Why do I always look so orange?" You know why? Because of the new light, they're terrible. You look terrible. They cost you many, many times more, like four or five times more. And you know they're considered hazardous waste. When a light bulb is out, you've got to bring it to a dump. So let's say, over here in Battle Creek, where's your nearest dump? Okay, that's what, a couple of hundred miles away. So every time you lose … drive a couple of hundred miles, right? I said, "How many people do that?" Nobody. What do they do? They throw it in the garbage. But you know what it is, because it's all gas. It's much more expensive, four or five times more. And I came into office, I did a lot of this. Sinks, showers, all of this stuff, I did a lot of it. No water comes out. You have areas where there's so much water, you don't know what to do with it. You turn on the shower, you're not allowed to have any water anymore. I mean, we do a lot of it. Dishwashers, we did the dishwasher, right? You press it. Remember the dishwasher, you'd press it, boom, there'd be like an explosion, five minutes later you open it up, the steam pours out, the dishes. Now you press it 12 times, the women tell me, "Again." You know, they give you four drops of water, and they're in places where there's so much water, they don't know what to do with it. So we just came out with a reg on dishwashers. We're going back to the old. By the way, by the time they press it 10 times, you spend more on water, and electric. Don't forget, the whole thing is worse because you're spending all that money on electric. So we're bringing back standards that are great, and better machinery that you can have the water again, right? But with the light bulb, I said, "What's going on with the light bulbs? A lot of people are complaining about the cost." So I had a couple of experts come in, I said, "Tell me, what gives a better light?" "Well, we liked the old light bulb better." I said, "I like it better." And so what I did is you can have either one. If you want to buy the newer kind, you can. And if you want to look very handsome or beautiful by buying the older kind, like I do. So we're bringing back the old light bulb. So it's a much less expensive, it probably gives a better light. But whatever it is, and you'll be able to spend a lot less money for a light bulb. I mean, it sounds like little, but it's big stuff. Okay? It's big stuff, and we're doing it with a lot of other things, our dishwashers. And you know, I won't tell you one of the things, because every time I tell you, they do a big number on it. You know the one I'm talking about, right? Sinks, right? Showers. And what goes with a sink and a shower? 10 times, right? 10 times. Not me, of course, not me, but you, him. But I never mention that, because one time I mentioned all three, I said, "Sinks, showers, and toilets." The headline was, "Trump with the toilets, toilets." That's all they want. They don't even mention it. So I didn't mention that, okay? I go off the record. But you know what? It's terrible. You want to wash your hands, you turn on the sink, no water comes out. So you leave the water going 10 times as long, it's the same thing. You have a shower, drip. It's no good for me. For me. You know the one thing that came out really good about being in this business? They always used to say I wore a hairpiece. It's okay. I know people wear hairpieces. But they always used to say. They don't say that anymore because I have been through the worst storms. If you wear one of those suckers, you got to give it up fast because within two weeks they got you. You look handsome, don't worry about it. But in the last two decades before my election, we lost one in five auto manufacturing jobs in this country. The people are trying to impeach us for doing all of the things that they've wanted to do for so many years. And that's why it doesn't work. We look so forward to taking it on, and it is all about cleaning the swamp, draining the swamp, and we have a very, very big, bad, dangerous swamp. Okay, that's enough of that. That's enough. So among the very first acts that I did was to stop the deal that would have dealt a death blow to the U.S. auto industry. I withdrew from the horrible Trans Pacific Partnership. That would have ended your auto industry. A lot of people don't know that, but I do. Remember TPP? We were basically ceding our auto industry to these countries that were just going to rip us off. The people that made these trade deals, it's like, where do they come? Like the one in Korea, that was a Hillary Clinton special. She said, "This will produce 250,000 new jobs." And I said, "Well, what happened?" He said, "Well, she was right." Except it was for South Korea, not for us. No, it's true. It produced 250,000 jobs for South Korea. These deals were so bad. But now they're getting really good, and some of them are getting great, and over a period of time they are going to be phenomenal. Wait till you see the numbers that start coming out of this country over a short period of time. But we have to go through a little pain, because we have to do it, and then they all say, "We're going to withdraw," and then I say, "You can withdraw, I don't care. We're putting tariffs on your country." Then they say, "We'd love to make a deal, sir." The new USMCA has powerful protections to keep auto manufacturing jobs right here in Michigan where they belong. Since the election, we've created 41,000 brand new motor vehicle and parts jobs, manufacturing jobs. Remember the statement by President Obama? "You'd have to wave a magic wand." Remember the magic wand? Because manufacturing … And I said, "You know, that sounds strange. What do you do if you don't have manufacturing? How do you make things?" Right? Manufacturing jobs won't happen. Well, we've got 600,000 manufacturing jobs, and you're going to see a big, big increase. The truth is, we need more people. You know what? We need more people. We need more people coming into the country, and they're going to come in, and they're going to come in through merit, and they're going to love our country, and they're going to respect our country, and they're going to work. We do need more people. They're opening these massive, Foxconn in Wisconsin, they're opening these massive plants and it's hard to get people. We want people coming in, but they have to come in, only they have to come in through merit. Fiat-Chrysler recently announced a $4.5 billion investment in Michigan, including the first new auto plant in Detroit in more than a generation. And General Motors recently announced a $300 million investment at its Orion Assembly Plant right here in Michigan. Come on, General Motors, let's go. General Motors gave us a little hard time with one building. I wasn't happy about that. That was the only building I had a problem within the whole car industry, right? Right? You know the one I'm talking about. I didn't like that. Anyway, but they're spending money, you know, what can I tell you? But these companies are coming in, a lot of the foreign companies are coming because they have to. I say, "You have to, or we're not trading with you anymore." Because we had such big deficits with these countries. With Japan, we had a $68 billion deficit. I said, Shinzo, he's great Prime Minister of Japan. But he said, "But nobody has ever asked us to do this." I said, "I'm asking you." They are building many, many plants. They're building many plants now in the United States, the Japanese. And after years of rebuilding foreign nations, we are finally rebuilding our nation. Is that okay? We were surrounded with globalists. You know, they think it's okay. You open a plant in some country that you never heard of, they make your product, they send it. In the meantime, they close all their factories here. We're not doing that anymore. Those are globalists. They think it's wonderful to have deficits. I don't. They think it's great. It's a great thing to have deficits. No, those are globalists. The globalists are passe.  our first duty and our one true allegiance is to you, the American people, before anybody else. We must care for our own- We must care for our own citizens first Democrat immigration policies are resulting in brutal assaults and wicked murders against innocent Americans. I don't even know what's happening. It's terrible. And we've moved out thousands and thousands of MS13 thugs out of our country. And we have agreements now with Guatemala, Honduras, El Salvador. They didn't use to take them back. If we had a murderer, then we should get them the hell out. We don't really want them in our prisons and take care of them for 50, 60 years. We want to bring them back. They wouldn't take them. The planes used to go around and around, don't land, don't land. With us, they land. We worked out deals with every one of them. We stopped giving them all the aid. We're giving them all this money and then they said, "We're not going to let you land. We're not going to let you take them back." I said, "That's okay. 500 million, we were giving them. I said, now we give them $5 we give them nothing. All of a sudden they said, "We would love to have them back." We would love it. It's wonderful to have them back. In June, two illegal aliens in Sandusky, Michigan were convicted of sadistically beating and stabbing a woman to death with a kitchen knife. Then, they hid her body in a water drain. A criminal alien with two previous deportations was just arrested in Michigan and convicted of brutally beating and strangling to death, a single mother of five young children. It's happening all the time. Far left politicians support deadly sanctuary cities, which deliberately release dangerous, violent criminal aliens out of the jails and directly onto your streets. We had a great election in North Carolina recently, two great congressmen got elected, you don't hear about it, when they win, you don't ever hear about it, just a few months ago. Two great people and they got elected and they got elected because I went in and said, "Talk about the fact that you have sanctuary cities" and they had some horrible crimes happening from those sanctuary cities. Soon as I mentioned that, boom, they went up like rocket ships and they won their elections and it was great. Great thing. The sanctuary cities are a disaster and let me tell you, the people of California, they don't like sanctuary cities either. They're stuck with them because they have crazy politicians. Earlier this year, authorities in the sanctuary jurisdiction of Kent County, Michigan, anybody know Kent County? Released an illegal alien charged with assault with intent to murder after he repeatedly and viciously stabbed a man in the head with a broken bottle. They let him go to roam free in Michigan communities. If you want to end sanctuary cities in Michigan, if you want to protect your families from criminal aliens, if you want to have a safe life, frankly, it's so crazy what they're doing. You wouldn't even believe it. You have only one choice in 2020, you must vote Republican. Thank you. I'm surprised. As you know, you do have sanctuary cities in Michigan. I was almost surprised to hear it, but you have them. It's one of those progressive things? They think they're doing a wonderful favor for the world. And now we're getting these prosecutors that, you murder somebody, they give you two months, they fight that you don't even have to go to jail. What's going on is crazy. Thanks to our tireless efforts to secure the border, illegal crossings are down 75% since may and we've ended catch and release. We've ended it. We could've ended it so easily. It's called the loophole. You catch him and then you release him into a country. That's what you had to do by law. And if you don't do that, they arrest the border patrol people. You believe this? The border patrol people were in more danger than the criminal aliens coming in and some of these people are not good people. These are the people because look, when you have a caravan of eight or 10,000 people, a lot of those people, do you think that Guatemala, Honduras, El Salvador, do you think they're sending us their finest? I don't think so. Alright. How about the lottery? That was a Schumer deal. Chuck Schumer, crying Chuck, crying Chuck Schumer. I used to be a big contributor to him, he used to kiss my ass, Chuck Schumer. He'd do anything. He would've done anything for me. Anything I asked him, get Schumer on the phone, "You do this, you do that. You get him on the phone, that son of a bitch." He would have done, I didn't need anything, but he would have done anything. Now it's like, "The prisoner has not acted-". Give me a break. Give me a break. Find out how much money did I give a raise to Chuck Schumer and Chuck, give all that money back please. Carolyn Maloney, give that money back. Every penny should come back. They act so pompous. They act so righteous. They're not righteous. They're not righteous. They're bad people. The far left Democrats have never been more extreme than they are now. Democrats are pushing a socialist takeover of healthcare that will take away your coverage and take away your doctor. 180 million people are going to lose. A lot of people here now have healthcare finally under us that's phenomenal. And that's what you want. They want to take it away, 180. They want you to go to a hospital ward someplace and sit there all night. I don't think so. Not in this group. And you know what? Some people, it's good so people, but can you imagine? They want to take away 180 million people, great, private, highly negotiated healthcare where you have your own doctor. Remember Obama? 28 times, "You can have your doctor, you can have your plan." Didn't work out that way, did it? I think we should impeach him for that. Let's impeach him, for that, for the IRS scandal, for the guns. Remember the guns, he was giving them to anybody that wanted them. He gave guns to the worst people in the world and then they didn't have them registered, right? Not to good. Impeach him. Why didn't the Republicans impeach him? Those were really, how about giving around $1.8 billion in cash? How about that? By the way, I ended the Iran nuclear deal. I hope you happy, much different country. But how about giving Iran $1.8 billion in cash. Many big planes going over to Iran, loaded up to the ceiling with cash. You know what $1.8 billion, you ever see like at a casino, $1 million wrapped up? It's a big pile of stuff, that's a million. Now multiply it, $1.8 billion in cash he gave. So, why is he allow to do that? Did anybody try to impeach him for that? Everybody knew it was wrong. Republicans will strongly protect patients with preexisting conditions and we will protect your preexisting physicians. Virtually every top Democrat also now supports late term abortion, ripping babies straight from the mother's womb, right up until the moment of birth. Right? That is why I've asked Congress to prohibit extreme late term abortion because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift of God. Democrats are now the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late term abortion, socialism, and blatant corruption. And that's what it is. The Republican party is the party of the American worker, the American family, and the American dream. And that's really what it is. We're also the party of the great Abraham Lincoln. A lot of people forget that, but we have to bring it up. To protect the health and safety of our citizens, we awarded $100 million to improve water infrastructure in Flint. How badly was Flint? Who were the geniuses that did that to you? You have clean water coming into Flint. They had to pay a very tiny little fee. So instead, they go into this horrible, horrible, really polluted water and the water comes out of there. They spend hundreds of millions of dollars to save like a couple of bucks, and the water was so terrible and it hurt the people. It hurt the people. But we're getting it fixed. And I know your previous governor was a Republican, but I was not a big fan of his. I was not, but I'm not a big fan of the one that can't fix the potholes either. We're committed to ensuring America has the cleanest air in the cleanest water on planet earth, and that's what it's about. It's about clean air and it's about clean, beautiful water. And it's about keeping our industry, not closing it because of the ridiculous Paris Climate Accord. How's Paris doing? I don't think too well. How's Paris doing with the yellow vests? The yellow vests? You know why? Because they raise gasoline prices so they could send them money all over the world to countries that the people in France never heard of. It's not working out too well. We're lowering prices. We're lowering taxes. We're making it possible. I mean, look at gas prices now. Look at gas prices. I recognize Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. And we also recognize Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. Big deal. For years, you watched as your politicians apologized. Member, "I would like to apologize. I would like to apologize." Nah, we don't apologize. Now you have a president who is standing up for America and we are standing up for the great people of Michigan. You're getting your auto industry back. At stake in our present battle is the survival of the American nation. If you want your children to grow up, a land of safety, it's really, we want a land of safety, justice. Well, I don't know. When I look at those FBI reports we got out, we got to clean up a lot. What they've done to hurt people, what they've done to hurt with Comey and these horrible people, what they've done to hurt people. I think one of the best things I did as president, a lot of people would say, "With all what we've done for the economy and," but one of the best things is firing James Comey's ass out of there. Boy, those reports are kept. Did you see the other day? "Well, ah, ah." First time now he said, in other words, he's 50% there folks. He's hit the golden pond. Anyway, so what we're doing is, we're doing things that are going to make our victory, it's like a tree. We need that extra four years. We've done so much, even Right to Try. You know Right to Try? People were traveling, they're terminally ill, they're traveling all over the world. We have the best medical in the world, the best doctors, the best labs, best hospital. They're traveling all over the world, to try and get, because it takes years to get something approved. And I said, "Wait a minute folks, why aren't we doing this?" And they've been trying to do it for 49 years. They couldn't get it done. Not that easy. The drug companies didn't want the liability, the country didn't want the liability, the insurance companies didn't want the liability. I said, "Here's what we do. We'll sign an agreement with the people where you're exculpated from all liability." "Huh? That's a good idea." And it's a very strong agreement so we can't get sued. But I said, "Listen, they were worried they're going to hurt people." I said, "These people are terminally ill. They're terminally ill, and so we do it now." Nine months ago, all the legislators at the 49 years, so if somebody's sick, they don't have to go to Asia, they're have to go to Europe. Or if you're poor, you go home and you die. Now what happens? Very simple. You sign that document, they work it out. You wouldn't believe how many lives are being saved. It's incredible. It's incredible. I'm very proud of it, Right to Try. I hope you don't need it. You don't want it. You don't want it. Okay? But if you do, it's there. With your help, we will lift millions of more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence and poverty to prosperity. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a fair, safe, sane, and lawful system of immigration. We will enact the greatest trade deals ever made. They'll result in more products, proudly stamped with that beautiful phrase, made in the USA. We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine. What we're doing is unbelievable. We're so far ahead of everybody. What we've done in the last three years with the FDA and even the speed of what we're doing, it would take 12, 13, 14 years to get things approved. It's down to a much smaller number, but we're finding new cures for childhood cancer and we are ending the AIDS epidemic in America. We've started the process. Who would've thought that? In 10 years, it's a 10 year process, we will have ended the AIDS epidemic in America and it could have been been started before I came to office. It was just wasted time. We will defend privacy, free speech, free assembly, religious liberty, and the right to keep and bear arms. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the sacred values that bind us together as one America. We support, protect and defend the constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. They're incredible, and that includes ICE. You know how tough these people are? These are great patriots. They love our country. Even the sheriffs alone for, some of the people that they're dealing with. These guys walk into the golem's nest and in some cases they just swing it out. They can have it. They love it. These are great. If we didn't have them, and I told you before, they're taking out bad, bad, bad people by the thousands, especially MS13 gang members. Who's going to do that? Who's going to do that? Anybody in the front row? I don't know. What about you? You're a tough guy. You might do it. You could do it. I don't know. You might, yeah, you can. What you like? We're going to recruit you. I think you could handle yourself. Now, these are tough people, right? You got to be tough. Then they get accused, they're too tough. Oh, they're too tough. You have some of these guys. They knife people. They don't even need a gun because it's more painful. They knife the two young girls, 16 years old. Beautiful. They cut them up into pieces because it was more painful than shooting them. These are animals. And then Nancy Pelosi said, I shouldn't use the term animal. And by the way, she ought to go home and take care of her district where the homeless is all over the place and the tents and the filth and the garbage is a eroding right into the Pacific ocean and into their beaches. She ought to go and take care of her district in San. Do you see what's going on? And it rains and it's filth and it's needles and it's drugs and it's, you know what. It's everything and it goes right into those storm sewers. Storm, not sanitary, storm and it goes right out into the Pacific ocean into the beaches and we fine Los Angeles and San Francisco, but we've just sent them a tremendous dollar fine for what they're doing. And Nancy Pelosi is playing games. She ought to go home and take care of the homeless and take care of the filth and everything. San Francisco was the most beautiful city. When you look at what's happened with the tents all over the place, where the police officers are getting sick just from walking the beat, they're getting sick. Diseases are coming back that this world hasn't seen for 30, 40, 50 years. It's a disgrace. She ought to get back and take care of her district instead of wasting time on this nonsense. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government bureaucracy are the true American way. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag. And we live by the words of our national motto and it's always going to be up there. They want to take everything down. They don't want Thomas Jefferson anymore. They don't want anything. That's a terrible thing and we fight for it, now. We fight. These words will never be taken off. I don't care where I am. If I'm up there, if I'm down here, I don't know, but we'll be fighting. We'll never take these words off, in God we trust. We stand on the shoulders of generations of Michigan Patriots who gave their blood, sweat and tears for this beloved nation. This is the state where Henry Ford invented the assembly line. It's the place where General Motors, Chrysler and Kellogg transformed the nation. It gave us Motown, the Mustang and the might of the American Midwest. This is the American mid west. And Michigan is the state where generations of strong, tough and proud American workers made this into the greatest and most powerful nation in the history of the world. And we are making it bigger, better and stronger than ever before, by far. Loyal citizens like you help build this country. And together, we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you. The American people, the Democrats took the people of Michigan for granted, but with us, you will never be forgotten again. The forgotten men and women of this country will never, ever be forgotten again. And I'm fighting for you. And I love doing it with everything that I have. And I will never, ever stop. And you know that. I will say I could have a much easier life. Some people say, "Why is he doing it?" You know why I'm doing it because we're doing the thing and look what we're doing is we're bringing back our country again. We're respected again, we're respected again. We are so respected, you don't even know how respected. I went to NATO where we were being ripped off because the other countries, you have 29 countries, and the other countries weren't paying their bills. They were delinquent in real estate. I noticed people are using that word. I've been using it for the last year. It's like a real estate trend. That's when they don't pay their rent, right? Well, they weren't paying and you have to see this chart, until I got there. They got to pay and they said, "Well, does that mean you won't protect us?" I said, "You don't want the answer to that question." Over the last, and the Secretary General Stoltenberg, over the last period of just two years, I raised, not from us, nothing from us, $130 billion, but that's nothing and over a short period of time they will be paying $530 billion more. All of those countries. My biggest fan in the world is Secretary General Stoltenberg of NATO. He says, "I never thought this could." I'm telling you, if you look, it's like 15 years just down. President Obama would go there, make a speech, "I'd like to thank everybody for being here. Thanks. Look, great job. Sayonara. Goodbye." Bush, they all did. Nobody ever asked for money. We were spending for 100% of NATO. We're protecting Europe. They rip us off on trade, right? They rip us off like crazy. We lose hundreds of billions of dollars on trade. We're changing that, but it's a long time. It's been going on a long time. They don't take your product. They don't take your cars. They don't take your farm product. They don't take your medical machines. We do a big business. They sell us. We don't sell them because they put restrictions. We have better equipment than them, but they make it so that our equipment doesn't qualify. It's called artificial barriers or non-monetary barriers. It's brutal what they do. I'm telling you, they're as bad as China, just smaller. They are as bad as China, just smaller and now China's doing great. We're very happy, but we have to do something with that. We have to take care of our people. We can't be ripped off by these countries, so NATO is ripping us off militarily, but now they're starting to pay big money and that's good. We want to help them. We want to be there with them, but they have to pay. They have to pay. $530 billion and the fake news doesn't even want to talk about it. They don't want to talk about it. They talk about other things. They don't want to talk about that. When you'd get a chance though, just a couple of weeks, maybe you could say over a short period of time, NATO countries will be paying $530 billion more. More, not total. More. How's that? Good. That's not too bad. Nobody else could do that, I guarantee. I won't tell you what took place in those closed door meetings. Some of them don't like me. They like Obama. Germany likes Obama. A lot of these countries, France, they like Obama. It's embarrassing. In France, President Obama is more popular than President Trump. Well, I should be. I just taxed their wine and champagne coming into our country because they're ripping us off on the internet. Okay. If I ever become more popular, that means I'm not doing my job. You should say he's out. It's true. I could be loved in Germany. I could be loved in Germany. Oh, they'd love me. My father came from Germany, parents and I could be loved in Germany. They'd like me so much, but then I'm not doing my job for you. Have to do it. Have to do it. With your help, your devotion, your drive, we're going to keep on working. We're going to keep on fighting. We are going to keep on winning, winning, winning because we are one movement, one people, one family and one glorious nation, under God. America is thriving like never before. And ladies and gentlemen of Michigan, the best is yet to come. Great state. Great state. You better remember all those jobs in a year from now, I tell you. I'll say, "That state let me down." I don't think that's going to happen. I'm hearing very good thing. You know the interesting thing, before it was like a promise. I said I'm going to bring car back. I'm going to bring this. I'm going to be pres, it was all like, it's good. You believed me, I was successful, all this, but now we've done it. We have done more than I promised, no politics. I promised, we've done more than we promised. No politician I think, has ever done that. Together we will make America wealthy again. We will make America strong again. We will make America proud again. We will make America safe again and we will make America great again. Thank you. Thank you, Michigan. Thank you.There's a lot of people. That's great. Thank you very much. Thank you very much. That's a big group of people. This is on fast notice, too. Thank you. But I'm thrilled to be here with the beautiful, great, hardworking people of this incredible state. You're really hardworking American patriots. That's what you are, and a lot of people haven't been treated right until I came along. We've done a lot of work and a lot of good work, and you had your best year ever last year. The state had the best year you've ever had. 46 days from now, we're going to win Minnesota, and we're going to win four more years in the White House. One of the most vital issues in this election is the subject of refugees. You know it. You know it perhaps better than almost anybody. Lots of luck. You're having a good time with the refugees. That's good. We want to have Omar. He said Omar. That's a beauty. How the hell did she win the election? How did she win? It's unbelievable. Every family in Minnesota needs to know about sleepy Joe Biden's extreme plan to flood your state with an influx of refugees from Somalia, from other places all over the planet. Well, that's what's happened, and you like Omar a lot, don't you? Biden has promised a 700% increase in the manifesto with Bernie, right? A 700% increase in the importation of refugees from the most dangerous places in the world, including Yemen, Syria, and Somalia. Congratulations, Minnesota. A 700% increase. Good luck, Minnesota. Enjoy yourselves, because if I'm not here, if I don't win, I don't know where I'm going to be. But maybe I'll come over to see Mike. I'll come and see Mike. Your state will be overrun and destroyed, and Biden and the radical Left win. That's what's going to happen. I've been watching it for years. They haven't treated you right. They have not treated Minnesota right. Thank you. I'll tell you, these hangers are great. Remember this. It's a friendly protest. Please remember this is not a rally. You're not allowed to have political rallies of any kind. You're not allowed to go to church. You're not allowed to do anything. The only thing you're allowed to do is run wild through the streets, burn down storefronts, blow up stores, and kill people, because that's considered a protest, and that, they allow you to have. You don't have to wear masks at protests. So I said, "We can't have a rally. The most we can have is ten people. But why don't we just call it a protest?", because this is a protest. It's a protest against stupidity. Speaking about stupidity, sleepy Joe will turn Minnesota into a refugee camp. Think of it. 700% increase. So you're not happy now? Look at that guy over there. He's not too thrilled when he hears this. 700% increase is what they have in the manifesto. Now, maybe they don't honor it, but I would say they'll go substantially higher than that number. Biden will overwhelm your children's schools, overcrowd their classrooms, and inundate your hospitals. That's what'll happen. Biden has even pledged to terminate our travel ban to jihadist regions, jihadist regions. They've already been doing that to you, haven't they? Opening the flood gates to radical Islamic terrorists. My administration's keeping terrorists, extremists, and criminals the hell out of our country. We don't want them. We don't want them. We've got enough of them. We've got enough of them. Just today, we deported, as you know very well, dozens of Somali nationals charged or convicted with very grave crimes, including rape, assault, robbery, terrorism, and murder, of course. These hardened criminals are back in their country, where they do all the complaining they want, and your children are much safer as a result. Thank you, President Trump. Thank you. If it were up to Biden, and it's not. It's the people that's around him. They are seriously radical Left Democrats, and they're very dangerous. The offenders are very dangerous, and they'd be running all over your state. Only by voting for me are you going to say … But I hate to say this, and get it with your iron ore. I did it with some other things, and I'll do it for you again. I'll do it for you again. But if you vote for me, I'm the difference, and I'm the wall. You know the wall that we're building on the southern border? I'm your wall between the American Dream and chaos. Joe Biden is wholly owned and controlled by the left wing mob. He has no clue where he is. This is not a sharp guy. Years ago, I said to a certain senator who I was very friendly with, a Democrat, "Who's the dumbest senator? Who's the smartest senator?" He gave me a name for the smartest. I said, "Who's the dumbest?" "Oh, Joe Biden. You didn't know that?" That was 25 years ago. That was in prime time. This is no longer prime time for sleepy Joe. They do disinformation. They make things up, and they make commercials. They make things up. I've never seen anything like it. Everything, they make up. First of all, I'm the one protecting your Social Security. They say, "Trump" … Remember four years ago, they used to say, "Oh, Trump will get rid of Social" … I have protected your Social Security. They're going to destroy your Social Security. Remember? Did you ever hear of a man, Fiorello La Guardia? Did you ever? I don't think that happened with him. New York, I don't think it happened with Rudy Giuliani, did it? What a great job Rudy did. You realize Rudy's just now really being appreciated. People forgot how good he was as a man. He was a great mayor. We polled it. I'd go down about 22 points. They want to poll everything nowadays. I don't believe in polls. They poll everything. But Ali Velshi, I don't know anything about the guy, but I know he was standing there. This is really quite a good scene. It's a friendly protest. Everyone's acting … and behind him, the entire city was burning. It's one of the great pictures of all time. The entire city was burning down. That was your city, and it's a shame it took so long, but the governor finally did it at least. If you take a look at Portland, the governor can't quite do it. She can't get there. I speak to her all the time. "Come on, Governor. I can straighten out Portland. Give me less than an hour. Just let us have it for" … because the state has to ask for it. They have to request. It's a shame. It's such a shame. But in your case, we went, and all of a sudden, it was really … That was going to be a bad night, too, right? Remember that, about seven o'clock? Then you see this guy walked out with about a $250,000 outfit on. That's because it had more computers and this and that. Got the tear gas deal. He's got the whole deal, pepper spray, got everything, the finest outfit you can buy. Believe me. We just paid for them, and they were very expensive. So we see one, the helmet. How about the helmet with the goggles? You can see at night. You can see at day. You can see whenever the hell you want. So there's one. I said, "Oh, that's only one guy." Then you see another three, then four. Then you see another ten. They were just getting out of the buses, coming from very friendly territory. He got hit on the knee with a canister of tear gas, and he went down. He was down. "My knee, my knee." Nobody cared. These guys didn't care. They moved them aside, and they just walked right to … It was the most beautiful thing, and that would be it. But so they had four or five lines. Then they had lines of different … Everybody did the same thing. Did they ever even move one step back? I don't think so, right? It was just a slow walk right forward. Then they just started walking faster, faster, faster, put a lot of guys in jail, Tom, right? Put a lot of guys … Great Congressman, by the way. Put a lot of guys in jail. Great. Not good. Great. They put a lot of guys in jail that night, Tom, and that was the end of it. I don't think he had any problem after that. If you had any flare-ups, we'll send them in again. But that's all you do. These are Democrat-run disasters. Look at Chicago. Look at Portland. Look at you with Minneapolis. These are disasters. By the way, are they still trying to get rid of your police force in Minneapolis? That's what I heard. See, they never learn. They never learn. They don't … You've got a lot of people here. That's a lot of people. I actually like these. We have the arenas. We've always filled them up. It's been great, and the arenas are good, but usually you have to travel 45 minutes. This thing, you have a hangar. The plane becomes your backstop, right? It's like your curtain. It's a curtain. You get a free curtain. We're outside, which actually makes people happy. It even makes the people that sometimes not everybody here likes happy, because outside is better. It's better, and we're rounding the turn on COVID, by the way. Our vaccines are coming. A lot of things are happening. We're rounding the turn. We've done a great job. We've done a phenomenal job. We don't get credit for that, but we'll discuss that in a minute. But when you look at it, when you look at it, our country is amazing. It's an amazing country. We love this country, and we're not going to let radical Left socialist/communists take over our country. Okay? They use the word socialist, and socialists aren't great. But communists are a hell of a lot worse, and that's where we'd be headed. We're standing in the way of them, this group of people. But you have a lot of groups of people just like this, every place we go. Last night, you know where we were. You saw that it was all over the place, right? That's a big state. That's a great state. Then I see the fake polls. I just saw a poll here, Minnesota. I'm down nine. I don't think so. I mean, I just don't think so. I don't think so, right? I don't think so. It's the craziest thing I've ever seen. This is the craziest thing I've seen. President Trump is down nine in Minnesota. Now I just saw another plane. See the plane? The good thing about these beautiful Air Force Ones, right? That's the smaller version of Air Force One. I think you had a little bit short runway. So they take the smaller to save about $12. No, they took the smaller one. But the great thing about those beautiful planes, they have more televisions than any plane in history. We have televisions in the closet, on the ceilings, on the floors. I've never seen them on the … We have them all over the place, and I'm just coming out. They said, "There he is." They said, "It's a smattering of people." They called it a smattering. They always do that. Yet Biden with the circles, right? The little circles. He's got like four people in a circle. You know why he does the circles? Because he can't draw a crowd. So they put a circle, like he's supposed to … He's trying to be legitimate. He's going to go by the science. He always says science. He doesn't know what the word science is. So to have these four or five circles, they put people, that way he doesn't have to be embarrassed when he goes to a high school gymnasium and he has 40, 50 people. They had one not so long ago, and you saw this. He couldn't draw a crowd. It was a big thing. It was his opening or something. Couldn't draw a crowd. So they made it a round table. So he went in. They only had like 32 people. They said, "This is very embarrassing," one of his people, and that's what they do. They're good. Some of the people surrounding him, they'll say anything and do anything. They said, "Let's not make it a speech. There's nobody here. Let's make it a round table." So these people are sitting at a table. They had no idea, and most of them didn't know anything about politics. They didn't even know why they were there. Now they're sitting on a round table, and they're on television. But that's what it is. But they say we had a smattering of people. Yes, smattering of about what? 15,000 people in about two days' notice. This doesn't include the 10,000 people, Mike, that they turned away. I hate that they turned them away. You'd think with an airport, you wouldn't have to turn anybody away, but they have a certain amount. Then sometimes you have Democrats running an airport, and they don't like all these people here. That's true. They don't like it. But if we're up to Biden, your state would be in ruins. Just take a look at what they've done, and I'm going to hit it hard. They make phony commercials about me, and it gives me the right. How about the worst one of all, the worst I've ever seen? Standing on a grave of a fallen soldier, and then they had some guy, a source said … There's no source. The source doesn't exist. They make it up, and then they take it. It's called disinformation. You're not supposed to do that. I'm not even sure if he knows. He's too weak to understand, and he's still weak to control his people. But it allows me to say whatever I want about this guy. The truth is, he's not fit to be your President. He's not mentally fit. If Biden's elected, extremists, like representative Ilhan Omar … Whatever happened to her? You had a great writer who has just made a living off writing about her. She's done so many criminal acts. Isn't it damn disgraceful that she gets away with it? I have to say to myself, I say, "How the hell did she get away with that? If we do one" … Look at General Flynn. He didn't even lie. They said he didn't lie, right? He's gone through hell. He's gone through hell. This guy wrote page after page of criminal acts. Well, let's see what happens. Who the hell knows? But between her and how about AOC? AOC- AOC is running a campaign against the guy that was supposed to be speaker of the house. Right? Joe Crowley. I knew him a little bit. I asked him once I said, "Are you campaigning against this maniac?" He said, "No, she's just a young girl. No problem." I called him on election night. Nah, I was going to, I was going to say, "How did that work out, Joe? That didn't work." He was going to be Speaker Of The House. He's got a certain talent. But you know she had no money, nothing. And all of a sudden she had $2,000,000 and she spent the $2,000,000 all over the place. Her and her boyfriend. Whatever happened to her? Can you imagine if I'd do that? You have to look at that. She spent the $2,000,000 and big story. But that was it. That's one quick story. Oh man. Probably the guy who wrote the story, lost his job at the New York Times. Right? He's now unemployed, but there's a big story. She spent $2,000,000 on bullshit. If a Republican did that they'd be in jail. You know that. It's a different standard and it's a disgrace. And our guys better get on the ball. Look, let me tell you how about yesterday. They were talking about Russia, Russia, Russia. Again, here we go with the Russia. There's never been anybody so tough on Russia with the sanctions. Remember Obama would send pillows. I sent tank busters right to Ukraine. I'm the one that exposed the pipeline with Germany. Germany pays them billions and billions of dollars. And then we're supposed to protect Germany from Russia. I said, "How does that work? How does that work? You're spending billions of dollars for energy to Russia." It's all okay. I'm the one that exposed it. What I've done … Hey, they don't want me to go. But if you look, they don't want me to win. Russia doesn't want … Maybe North Korea does because I actually have a very good relationship with him. And speaking of North Korea and you know, it's okay to have really. You don't have to go to wars. We don't have to lose our great soldiers. It's good. If I got along with Putin. Somebody said "He gets along well with Putin." I'm saying to myself, "But isn't that sort of a good thing? Is that bad." "He gets along with Putin. That's a bad thing." But you saw the head of the FBI yesterday started going Russia. Russia is looking at our election. Russia. Here we go again. Russia, Russia, Russia. I said, "What about China? What about North Korea? What about Iran? What about … " They don't mention anybody else. The narrative seems to be Russia. Millions of phone calls made not one to Russia. Millions of phone calls received not one to Russia. Then he goes, "Russia, Russia." Then they asked him about Antifa. What do you think about Antifa? "Well, it's an ideology." I said, "No, it's not. It's a bunch of thugs and anarchists that are being funded by somebody and find out who the somebody is." It's unbelievable. Unbelievable when you look at this stuff. But seriously, take a look at the AOC. I call it AOC plus three. Her three people that she tells what to do. And $2,000,000. Dresses, rent, other things. You're not supposed to do that. Mr. Congressman, are you allowed to do that Sir? You don't do that. You don't buy dresses do you? If he does that's the end of his career right? No. But it's terrible. Right John? It's terrible. Will prosecute him. I mean, why not? I don't understand it. I'll tell you what. One friend of mine, very sophisticated guy, very successful guy called me up. He says, "You know. From the day you came down the escalator with our great First Lady, our future First Lady." He said "From that day the people love her. She gave a great speech at the Republican National Convention at The White House. She gave a great speech." But said "From the day you came down the escalator with our First Lady. From the single day you've been under investigation. You've been under investigation by sleazebags. People that now we caught, cleaned up their phones." You're not allowed to do that. Right Mr.. Congressman? My great hockey player. You're the greatest. Right? But you're not allowed to do that. You know? We want their phones. "Oh, here they are. Oh, by the way, they happen to be totally deleted." Like Hillary with the 33,000 emails she deleted. If she is, she's not getting her money worth. Her yoga lessons and her daughter's wedding. Right? So it was about the wedding and the yoga lessons. So I said, "Okay, let's give her five or six each." What do you think, Mike? Five or six each. Five for the wedding. Make it 30. Make it a hundred. Make it a thousand. A thousand for the wedding. And for the yoga, let's give her 200. Okay. What about all those thousands and thousands of emails. Probably classified. So Congress … So forget about it. Let's assume they're gone because she deleted them and then she acid washed them. And then she hit her phones with a hammer. I get rid of phones. I've never hit him with a hammer. Not even as President. I say, "Yeah. Throw the phone away." No, no. I've never hit a phone. Has anybody ever gotten rid of your phone and taken a hammer and wiped the hell out of it? I don't think so. So she gets a subpoena from the U S Congress. Not in a lawsuit against some guy that hates you and you're fighting and you're fighting or something. By the way you do that, you've got problems in court, big problems. But she gets a subpoena from Congress. U.S. subpoena, the most important subpoena you can get. They get the subpoena. And after she gets the subpoena, by a few days everything is deleted. Her phones are busted up and cleaned and wiped. And everything's gone. And nothing happens to her. Forget about what was on. Now think of how angry it makes me when I see it. Now how angry? Could you imagine if I'd do that it's a whole different ball game. Know how angry it makes me when I see it. And we had an attorney general that didn't have a clue. That was my fault. I was loyal to somebody. Endorsed me early. You know whey he endorsed me? Because I went to Mobile, Alabama. We had 55,000 people show up at a stadium. He said, "I'd like to endorse you." Then after we won, he said, "I'd love to be attorney general." And I said, "No, I don't think so." But after four or five times asking, I'm a loyal person and I did it. The mistakes sometimes you make is because of loyalty, but that's okay. But allowed her to get away with that is a disgrace. Maybe there's something they can do. So forget about looking for the emails. And they are available. And I guarantee they're in the State Department. I guarantee you they're in the state department that ought to damn well find them. They're being protected in the State Department. But forget about that. Almost as good is the fact that you're not allowed to do what she did and her lawyers should pay, Kendall should pay, equal consequence. Equal consequence. Equal. But that's the way it is. But we are making a lot of progress if you see what's going on. I said to myself, "I'm going to stay uninvolved. I don't have to. Chief Law Enforcement Officer, can you believe it? But I think it's better if I stay uninvolved." And I have stayed uninvolved and we do have an excellent Attorney General. Bill Barr. And I'll be honest, he's a smart guy. I think he's getting tougher and tougher and tougher every day. I think he's not going to put up with this stuff. I don't think. And you know he's got a lot of people that are deep staters, whatever you want to call them. They fight him at every turn. They fight him, fight him, fight him. But he's getting tougher and tougher. I watched over the last three days, I'm saying, "Wow, that's sort of what we're all waiting for. Right?" But she deletes her emails. AOC gets rid of $2,000, 000. Gets rid of it. Nothing happens. Nothing happens. And then she goes around and calls us all like what the hell are we? And she controls Nancy Pelosi. Actually Nancy Pelosi would love to get rid of her I think. How about Pelosi? Pelosi goes out and says, "You know. I think I have my hair done." So she goes out and she goes into this beauty parlor. I told the story in Wisconsin last night. By the way, we had that great crowd in Wisconsin. You have a feeling about places. You know the problem with Minnesota is that I think since 1972, this hasn't been won by a Republican. So, you're a little behind the eight ball when you hear that. Right? I mean, I can understand. And Wisconsin rarely. But I won Wisconsin. Unlike Minnesota thank you very much. Thank you very much, Tom. Thank you. Unlike Minnesota. But it's my fault. So I had one speech left. It started at one in the morning. I went to Michigan, we won Michigan. That was another one. Great state. We brought back so many auto companies into Michigan. We brought them back. But I had one. It was already voting day. It was election day. Because by the time I got there it was just scheduled. Had I made that one damn stop to your state we would have won Minnesota. I lost by what? A half a point. Half a point. But I get off the plane and they said, "He's in Minnesota. He's down nine." The recent poll. Down nine. I believe it's a suppression poll. And you know, I have an instinct about things pretty much. Somebody said "Trump has the greatest political instincts of the last 100 years." One of my enemies said that. And I said, "No, I don't." I don't believe I do. I think I have lousy political instincts." But what am I going to tell you? Let me just say they said that. And I was very impressed by the statement. In fact, I went to my wife I said, "You know, they say I have the greatest political instincts in over a hundred years." And I said, "But I don't believe it. I don't." I don't want to be Beto. Remember Beto? "I was born to run for president." That was the end of his career. Beto O'Rourke who's in charge of guns. By the way, he's going to take your guns away. You know that, right? Biden. Sleepy Joe. Sleepy Joe is going to take your guns away. Remember Beto on the cover of a really crummy magazine. I won't mention the name. They've got a lot of bad magazines out there. The good news is most of them are dying. If not all of them. But Beto O'Rourke, he did the story and he was going to defeat Ted Cruz. He was going to do all these things. Ted beat him. And I helped a lot too. I was with Ted all the way. And I think Ted's appreciated it. But I even said, "I'm putting Ted Cruz as one of the people for the Supreme Court." Right? And you know why I did it? You know why I did it? Because I wanted to make sure that I had somebody on a list we had about 45 unbelievable people, unbelievable. The smartest, the best. The absolute creme de la creme, right? The best minds in the country. Conservative. They believe in the constitution. Little things like that. But I said, "You know. I have to have somebody that we're going to make sure we get approved." And the only one I could think of is Ted, because he's going to get 50 Republican votes and he's going to get 50 Democrat votes. They'll do anything to get them out of the Senate. Right? So anyway, but just to finish, there's no way that I'm nine points down. I look at a crowd. So they say instinct, right? So I look at a crowd and whether I have good instinct or not, this is not the crowd of somebody that's going to finish second in the state to a Sleepy Joe. Finish second to a guy that cannot put two sentences together. Now it is an ideology. It doesn't matter. I could put that broken piece of wood right there. I could put that out. And it's the same thing as Joe. It's just an ideology. It's just an idea. Now, historically, we have the biggest gap in enthusiasm of any campaign that they've ever opposed. You heard that. Like 36 points. In other words, they've got no enthusiasm for him. I have tremendous enthusiasm as we can tell. But he does have enthusiasm to beat Trump. His only enthusiasm is put anybody in there. Right? Put anybody in there. He does have enthusiasm to beat Trump. Nothing for him, but to beat Trump. Okay. But historically that never wins. When somebody has to rely on winning because of somebody as opposed to winning because people love you, people respect you … And Sean Hannity did something the other night. He said to this man, "If you owned a McDonald's hamburger stand in a reasonably busy area, would you have Joe Biden running that stand?" The answer is no. He doesn't have the energy. He doesn't. So he can't run the country. No, seriously. I thought it was good. I never thought of it. You wouldn't have him running your business. You wouldn't have him running a McDonald's. I have to say or a Wendy's. I have a friend he owns Wendy's. He always gets up. Ken, you haven't mentioned Wendy's? Okay. But you know you wouldn't do it because he couldn't do it. And yet he's running for the presidency. He's got no energy. I made a comment that somebody had low energy. That was the end of his political career. But Joe's energy is far lower. It's far lower. No, it's far lower than Jeb. Jeb was on the low side. But Joe, he's off the scale. Right? Joe's got nothing going. Today Biden delivered remarks, barely, to a union after spending 47 years giving their jobs to China and foreign countries in exchange for campaign cash. How about his statement? Hey, we talk about AOC being crooked. She's a hundred percent crooked. Okay. But were talking about that. Look at Omar. She came in here. Did she marry her brother? Where's that writer? That writer should be given the Pulitzer prize. He never will be. He should be though. You know the amazing thing, all of these writers, New York Times, Washington Post, right? Russia, Russia, Russia. Trump. Russia, Russia, Russia. I had 19 people. All brilliant. All radical left. All Hillary people. Actually not even a never Trumper from Bush. Okay. All Hillary Clinton people mostly, almost everyone. They were all Democrats. How about this? You're being investigated by 19 Democrats that are smart people. Okay? Smart people. So my friend says, "You know, you are the most honest person in the world. And you've taken three years of total investigation." You don't think they've gone over my taxes. They went over at the biggest tax firm in the country. The most prestigious. They went over everything. They spend 48 million as it comes out now. It's about $48,000,000 investigating me before I won and after I won. And we caught them spying on my campaign. That's what they were really doing. And now with the phones, I think there's like 22 or 24 people. You heard this one? They said, "No, no, no. We made a mistake when we deleted our phone." You know what they had to do to make that mistake? Like 19 different formulas. Right? I don't even know how you delete a phone. I didn't know you could do it. But they all made the exact same mistake. That's not good. That's not good. So let's see what happens to them. It's a criminal act you know that, right? It's a criminal act. It's criminal. Weissman's a bad guy. Put a lot of people in jail that shouldn't be in jail, Weissman. He's a bad guy. He's on CNN all the time or MSNBC which I call it MSDNC. Because it's the same thing. Owned by a company called Concast. Did anyone ever hear … With an N, not an M. Con like a con job. Concast. They a fortune on public relations. Comcast has delivered you the news, all the news. And they spend a fortune. And then I go up and make one speech and I call them Concast And that's the end of the PR for the year. They are a bad group of people. They're sick. I mean, they're sick people. They're sick and evil people and they want bad things for our country and they don't report the news. You know, in the old days, when you used public airways free, you had to get a license. I keep saying, "If they're reporting fake news, how come they can keep getting a license?" Whether it's ABC, whether it's NBC, CBS, or of course, CNN. Which is I mean one of the great jokes of all time, CNN. Or MSDNC. But they're cable so I guess there's a different standard. But when you're using the public airwaves free. Okay? Free. Aren't you supposed to get licensed? So I asked my people that. I ask a couple of guys and I never really get an answer. I just want to know a simple question. Do you have to report the truth when you using free airwaves and making a fortune with commercials and everything else. And I never get the right answer because there are people down deep. It's crazy. But we're getting down to all of it. A lot of progress has been made. I think you're starting to see it. We're trying to beat a terrible group of deep state people. You know I came to Washington … Think of it, think of it. I came to Washington and I had 24 years of putting people in office. And then you can probably add another four to that. And another four to that. I had many, many years, decades of people putting … So I came. Been to Washington I guess 17 times I never stayed over. Right? Never slept over. I was there 17 times. But we're riding down the beautiful Pennsylvania Avenue. And I look outside at those police. I love our police. We've got to treat our police better. I had everything. I had police. I had military. I had soldiers. I had everything you could possibly have. You never saw so much how power and strength and beauty. The beauty. And they were so proud. They're all saluting, they're so proud. They're happy to have gotten rid of that crowd that was there before us. They're proud. They're great. The police. You know, every single police force I think endorsed me. I got the one yesterday from Chicago. That's not easy. Chicago endorsed me. New York's finest endorsed me. Florida. Ohio. I mean, everybody. I don't know that he's gotten one vote. Then he says he can't mention the words law and order. Can you believe it? And then I get to the most beautiful house in the world. I can have Mar-a-Largo and all of them. But I'll tell you The White House is still The White House, no matter how you do it. And I get to this gorgeous, beautiful place. And I'm up at the incredible suite level and there's Abraham Lincoln's suite. It's called the Lincoln bedroom. Remember Clinton used to lease it out to people for money. They never change do they. Remember when Barbara Streisand, she's another beauty, by the way. But remember Barbara Streisand used to stay in that suite? Which was the only problem I had with it. But tell me … No, but I do like her voice. I do. I really do. Some of them I don't like even their voices. But she used to stay there. And I'm standing in the Lincoln bedroom. The history of the whole thing. The bed, the desk, the Gettysburg address, the beautiful four score and seven years ago. This beautiful Gettysburg address. He wrote it there. And also on his carriage ride up to Gettysburg. He delivered the Gettysburg address and they say the only one that got worse press than I did was Abraham Lincoln. Did anyone ever hear that? And I said, "No way they got worse. Maybe he got bad. But no way he gets worse." Now people are starting to say, "It's probably true. I think you've got the worst." Now they used to say, "No, no." Newt Gingrich, great guy. He said, "Nope, Abraham Lincoln got the worst press. They were worse to him than anybody. He was a very depressed person. His wife was very depressed." It was a depressed kind of a thing. He's in a war, he's in a revolution. And he was getting beaten a lot by Robert E. Lee. They want to rip his statue down all over the place. But Robert E. Lee whether you like statues or not, they don't rip statues down anymore. I signed a law. 10 years in jail if they rip them down. But Robert E. Lee won many, many battles in a row and it was supposed to be over in one day. It was supposed to end immediately because the North was too powerful for the South. But it just shows when you have leaders, when you have a great general. And Robert E. Lee, he would have won except for Gettysburg. And that was because his general was killed who's going to lead Gettysburg. Never fight uphill, me boys. Never fight uphill. He heard they were going up hill. Stop them, stop them. But we had no cell phones in that day, right? Congressmen? No cell phones. So they sent the horses to stop him. Stop him. But it was too late. They fought uphill and they got slaughtered. That's what happened. But Robert E. Lee these were incredible things. But I hope you appreciate that we had a period of time when they were ripping down all of the statues and monuments. And I said to my people four months ago, I said, "This is crazy. These people." And they don't even know. They started ripping down Abraham Lincoln. When they hit Lincoln I said, "Wait a minute. This is the man. And you can't do …" Then they hit George Washington, Thomas Jefferson. They hit everybody. They even had Gandhi. All Gandhi wanted was one thing. Peace. May we have peace. Rip down the statue we don't like it. I don't think they have any idea what they're doing. I think they're just a bunch of thugs. Okay? You want to know that? I think they are a bunch of thugs. They were going to March on Washington and they were going to rip down a statue of Abraham Lincoln. You know the exact statute. Its up very nicely. Up now. And by the way, they can take them down legally. They go through Congress as a way of doing it. But they didn't want to do it that way. And they were marching on Washington. And I said, "Do we have any laws about this?" They said, "No, sir." Now in Congress, the way it is now, the most you get is about a $10 fine. You rip down a $5 million statue and you got a $10 fine. Right? It's different world. That's when it was strong and they had laws. But we told and found this old act. And the old act said, if you rip down a monument or a statue, you get 10 years in prison. They call it prison, not jail, which sounds even worse. I said, "Bring that sucker up immediately to the Oval Office because there are a lot of people coming to Washington." They were going to March on the Jefferson Memorial. Do you believe that? The Jefferson Memorial. We grow up … The Jefferson Memorial. They were going to March on the Jefferson Memorial. They were going to do damage to our beautiful Jefferson Memorial after Thomas Jefferson. And I did predict that. A friend of mine said, "You know, two years ago you said, next will be Robert E. Lee and then comes Washington. And Jefferson and Lincoln. They'd never stop. The only thing they understand is strength. Remember that." They don't understand weakness. There's nothing you can do. These really stupid heads of these corporations that give hundreds of millions of dollars. It's like blackmail money, right? But these stupid people that run, they get $40,000,000 a year and they're weak. Okay, they're weak. But these people, they're anarchists and the only thing they understand is strength. So I said, "Let me see this document." I said, "Wow, this is a very strong document." And Derek is here. One of my attorneys, he did a great job. I don't know where the hell Derek is. He's around here. Actually he's heard this before though. Not quite. You're getting a very unique speech tonight. You know? I mean unlike Joe, I haven't even looked at the teleprompter. This guy will "Move it up. Move it up. I can't see. Move it up." I haven't looked at it. The poor teleprompter guy he's sitting there "What do we do? We're on line two of the teleprompter." He said, "What do we do?" No, unlike Joe, I have not looked at the teleprompter. Oh, that poor Joe. You know what's the worst part about him looking at the teleprompter? The worst part is that means that the fake news media is giving him the questions. Right? Like Donna Brazil, who was brilliantly hired by Fox. Fox has changed a little bit. Ladies and gentlemen, Donna Brazil, who was fired by CNN because she cheated and she gave crooked Hillary the questions to the debate. How would you like to be me? They give her questions to the debate. And I still won the debate and she had all the questions. Think of it. How do you do that? Donna Brazil is, ladies and gentlemen, she's going to work for Fox. Oh, that's great. That's big difference. Big difference between four years ago and now. A lot of things have changed. But I'll tell you what's changed is the fact that we have more enthusiasm now than we did four years ago. It's amazing right? But just to get back to the others. So I signed that wonderful executive order instituting this really tough law. And it says 10 years. It doesn't say, you get 10 years, but you can take it down to three weeks. It says 10 years. So these guys had just gotten there. I had a news conference because I had to let them know about it. Right? We've got many people in jail right now from before nobody even talked about taking statues down. No, but I looked at the Andrew Jackson right? With the ropes. And I'll tell you, the police did a great job. And Mark Meadows did a great job. He said, "Charge." They charged. And they took these guys out and they were fairly tough. But the police were much tougher. DC police. They did a great job. They were watching and they weren't able to do anything. Mark Meadows said "Charge." It was like from 200 years ago it was crazy. They charged and they'd beat the hell out of these guys. Or you wouldn't have that great statue on the horse of a great general. He was a great general. And he was a very good president. At least a good president. But he was a great general. The battle of New Orleans. Right? He went to jail too. We had all the evidence we needed. Thank you for that. I want to thank you fake news. We called the fake news. We said "Can we just have that please?" When they said, no, we just said, "We'll take it off TiVo. That's okay. Don't worry about it." One of the greatest inventions in history. Tivo better than television because television is useless without it. So, we signed it. And all of a sudden these same guys who were watching it, they left. Nobody showed up the next day. They're going to have 25,000 people. They had 24 people, 5 of them were brought to prison. Okay. And the next day they said, "Well, we were going to save it for Saturday night." And Saturday night nobody showed up. And nobody has showed up in four months to take down a statue. It's true. Because you know why? They look and they say, "I want to take down that statue. I'm going to take down that statue. That statue's coming down." And then somebody says, "You know it's 10 years in jail." They go, "That's too much. I'm getting out of here." It's true. Ten years is not acceptable, Mike. Right? Ten years is a lot to rip down a statue, have a little fun, especially when they have no idea what they're ripping down. But we have an idea what they're ripping down. They're ripping down in many cases, greatness. They're ripping down our past. They're ripping down our history. And that's where these guys begin. They take away your history. You look at the Middle East, you look all over. Look what ISIS did. Look what all of them do. They go down and they rip. They go into museums and they break everything and they rip everything. They want to take away your past. They're not taking away the past of the United States of America. Not as long as I'm here. What do you want? Do you want me to go back on teleprompter anybody? Okay. Here's the question. My poor guy must be having a fit. He's over there. He's so good at this stuff. He's on line three. … Good at this stuff. He's on line three. He said, "Sir, should I use turn the sucker off? Would you rather go teleprompter or freelance?" Isn't it nice when you have the option because you have this and you have the option to go either? See, Joe doesn't have the option. He doesn't have the option. But if Biden wins, China wins, and it's very simple. It's very simple. By contrast, I rescued the Minnesota Iron Range, I did that. Just so you know, O-Biden. I call him O-Biden, it's too long to say Obama and Biden, so I just go, O-Biden, because I don't care about… Everyone said, "Oh no, he's in trouble. Obama's now campaigning." Hey, he campaigned last time harder than Hillary. I said, "No, I want him to campaign because he brings out the base." He brings out our base. And I'm only here because of him and Joe. I'm only here because of him. I could right now be having a very beautiful life of luxury, and here I am at the hangar in Minnesota with 15 or 20 or 25,000 people. And thousands of people that couldn't get in, and I'm working my ass off. I could be at home having a good time, wonderful time. But the one thing I said is- We want trump. We want Trump. We want Trump. But I say this. I say this look, I could be home. So home was New York. I had to bail out because it was too crazy, everything has fallen apart. But home, it's so sad what the democrats have done to our great New York. Between a governor and a mayor, the crime is through the roof, the corruption is incredible, it's a sad thing that's happened to New York. Hopefully it'll come back by somebody. Somebody will go in there and do like a Rudy. You know when Rudy took over, it was so bad and they were looking for somebody and they thought he was the guy because he was a tough guy. But somebody has to go in and clean it up. This mayor, he let go of a billion dollars worth of police. He actually believed the nonsense about defunding the police. And they're all going to do it. They're all going to do it. And New York people are going to do it. I'm being totally serious now. You've got to go out and you've got to vote for Trump. You got to break this spell from 1972. You saw Kenosha. What we did for other places, you saw the Kenosha, and that was gone. That was all gone. That place was gone. We sent in the troops, it was incredible what we did, and they did it on day three. Day three is better than two weeks later, like in Minneapolis. But they did it, and we've done a great job and the people of that great state, they understand it, and I just hope the people of your state of Minnesota understand it because we don't have too many more chances with this stuff. We really don't. We don't have the luxury of sitting back and saying, "Let's have four years of this maniac, vice president that he picked who treated him worse than any other person. That's why I say the one person that he won't pick… My great instincts, right? The one person he won't pick is Kamala because she called him a racist, she tried to me-too him. He was me-too'd. "I've just been me-too'd Darling, what does that mean?" But they tried to me-too him. And she was the one that brought it up. Remember Tara? She was the one that brought it up, and then he goes, "Ladies and gentlemen, I'd like to pick… Wait a minute, let me get her name here. How do you pronounce it? It's with a comma, like a comma, right? Like a comma." Remember he couldn't pronounce her name? He was saying her name wrong, and she had to interrupt him. No, my name is Kamala. Like comma. I remember that. Like a comma. H1N1, that's right, Joe. Remember that Joe, H1N1. And how bad did he do in that though? How about that? How bad did he do? So come to think of it, he's out there now today. It was pathetic. By the way, did you see the Anderson Cooper thing last night? You have to watch. I don't want to watch, but I have an obligation. I'm competing against somebody. You don't want to compete and say, "I'm not going to watch my competition, who wouldn't?" It's boring, but I got to watch. And he got through it. He met a couple of really… The chicken thing was bad. He said chicken many, many times, and it was a little strange that I thought it was over and he pulled it back. He was able to pull it back. But Anderson is a… And he interviewed me, he's tough. You know, he can be tough, nothing against him. He could be very tough, but last night he was in rare form. He was, "Thank you very much for being here, Mr. Vice President, are you enjoying the run?" And compare that with my shot, where they asked me about doing ABC with George Stephanopoulos. I think it was great. I think it worked out great. You know what I call it? Debate prep. I call that free debate prep. But you know it's nasty, it's a little nasty that people… and I didn't say, "No, you got to change the rules. No, give me the questions. I want to use a teleprompter to answer." How about that though? Mr. Vice President, I'd like to know your feeling on nuclear warfare and how does that relate to China and Russia and where are they in the race? Well, you can't have this as your president. I don't care. Forget about me. You can't do this. The importance and the power of this position are too great. You can't do it. I've learned a lot as president. But one thing I learned is that President Xi of China is sharp. You ever see him standing with the two million men walking in front, everybody's the same height, they're wearing hats, everyone's like a pool table, right? And he's standing there by himself, and he's looking like he's not playing games. There's no games, he's sharp as you can be. And I had a great relationship, but now I feel differently. We made a great trade deal, and now I feel differently. But he's a sharp as you can be. Putin as sharp as you can be. Kim Jong Un, we would have been in a war with North Korea 100%. I asked Obama, "Did you ever call him?" He said that was the toughest problem we had. And we get along. Remember about a month ago, two months ago, they broke into the demilitarized zone and they said, "Oh, he's going to attack." I said, "No, he's not. Don't worry about it." I got to know him very well. We have a good relationship. People said, "He has a good relationship with Kim Jong Un, that's terrible." I said, "No, that's good." But you remember it was going to be a nuclear war, and I got along with him. Then they said, "Trump made a terrible deal. He's given so much to North Korea." What did I give? I was at like a semi debate with his idiot, a reporter. "He's given a lot to North Korea." "What did I give?" "I don't know." Sanctions, sanctions. You took away. No, I didn't. Actually, I increased the sanctions very substantially. What did you give? What did I give? Tell me. So after about four days they couldn't ask because I gave nothing except I gave heart because I don't want to see people killed on their side either. I don't want to see people killed. We'd win that. We'd win them all. We have the greatest weapons right now ever conceived by man. We've rebuilt our military to a level that nobody ever thought possible. And then the fake news. And I said that a couple of weeks ago, remember I said, "We have created the most powerful weapons known to man." It's true. We have weapons that are so advanced that President Xi, Putin, everybody, we're the envy of the world. But they don't know quite what we have, but they know we have stuff that they never even heard of before. And some schmuck back there said, "I think he's given away classified information." Now, all I'm doing is telling the world, we have the most powerful weapons in the world. I'm not even saying what kind. You don't even want to know about it. And God help us if we ever have to use them. But we have the most powerful weapons ever conceived by man. They have the missile, the super-duper, hydro sonic, I call it the super-duper, it goes five times faster than a normal missile, right? We have one goes much faster than that. But Russia got that information from the Obama administration. Russia stole that information. You knew that. Russia got the information and they built it. But we have now one that's much faster than that. That's like a slow missile. That's like considered a slow missile. But I said it was incredible. Two weeks ago I said, "We have the finest, the best, the most incredible, sadly, the most deadly, and we never want to use it, but we have the greatest weapons ever in history by a factor of 10, by a factor of 10." And they went crazy. "He's given away classified." These people are sick. All I'm doing is saying that we rebuilt our military $2.5 trillion all built in the USA, every single ounce of it. We have fighter jet, F-35 that are so good, you can't see it. And I went to see the program, and I met some of the pilots and these guys are better looking than Tom Cruise. They're tougher. They're stronger. They're bigger. They're more powerful. They're smarter. And I like Tom cruise by the way, because you can't get much better than Top Gun, right? Great movie. You can't get better. I like Tom cruise. But these guys are better looking than Tom. They got that crew cut, they got the crap under their eyes, they got the whole deal. They're smart as hell. So I said, "So captain, let me ask you, how good is the F-35?" "They're really good Sir, best plane we've ever had all great." I said, "How do you compare that with what Russia has?" "Well, ours is better for a specific reason, Sir. You can't see it." "What does that mean?" "Well, when we fight, they cannot see us, that we are so stealth." Now that doesn't mean in three years that it won't be obsolete because that's what happens. That's the problem with that business. You come up with a new computer and two weeks later it's obsolete. That's why I always like real estate, and grab a piece of real estate. But no, it's true. I wouldn't be good in that business. You get to work, work, work, and then you're starting the next one because the last one is gone. That's why I always talk about walls and wheels. When the Democrats were saying, "Walls are old fashioned." Well, they're right about that. But they work. Remember that? All we had to go through in Congress? And that wall is going up, think of that. We're building 10 miles a week, 10 miles a week of the top. And our numbers on the border are the best they've ever been. The best they've ever been. Well, we're building 10 miles of wall a week. We're up to about 330 miles, and we'll have it finished very soon, and it's having a tremendous impact on drugs. It's having a tremendous impact on all of the different things. Human trafficking in women. It's not even children. They're trafficking women, it's because of the internet. You think of that as almost an ancient kind of a crime, right? But it's not. It's a very modern crime and it's an unbelievably profitable crime. They're trafficking women, little bit children, but mostly women. Where they'll put three or four women in the back in the trunk of a car and they'll go through the border. They can't do it anymore. And we're catching them. We have people that do nothing but look for the traffickers. To me, the traffickers are the biggest scum of the world. And thank heavens for ICE, and thank heavens for border patrol because these people do a job that you don't want. I know Mike doesn't want it. You wouldn't even be good at it, Mike, he'll do a commercial about it. That's what he'll do. Does he have the longest commercials in history? I say, Mike Lindell. I say, Mike, the pillow man. I say, Mike is the single greatest purchaser of commercials in history. I want him to buy my commercials. I say, "You know, we spent $20 million, I sell like two commercials." He spends $2 and he's got the whole day on Fox. I said, let Mike buy our commercials. Will you? I don't know what the hell you do, but whatever it is, you better tell me the secret. Greatest purchaser of commercials. But we have done some job with that. And the traffickers and drugs are way down. Now we got upset with the pandemic, but I watched Biden today talking about, "If only Trump moved one week sooner. One week." So let's go, ready? So, you know he was against the ban, right? Because he didn't think we had a problem. So he was against the ban. He didn't know that China was heavily infected. He doesn't even know where China is, in my opinion. But he was against the ban. These guys write stuff out for him, and he tries to read it. Doesn't do well with it. So he was against it, but now his new thing is, if only I moved one week earlier, but I was earlier than everybody. If you think about it. I had nice guy, Dr. Fauci, I had another nice, got a lot of doctors. They were all telling me, "No, no, you don't have to do that." Tom knows that very well. "You don't have to do that, Sir. You don't have to do that. You don't have to do that at all." And one of those things, I was very early and I banned and everybody admits that had I not banned highly infected Wuhan province, right? Highly infected, we would have had hundreds of thousands of more deaths. And then you had the chart. I put it up yesterday, I'm doing these news conferences. We're finally getting the word across that we did a great job, but I'm doing news conferences now every day. I call them the highly rated news conferences. And I go before these crazy people, they're screaming like maniacs. It's not the way they treat Sleepy Joe. He'd melt. If they ever did a number on, this guy would be there he'd be laying on the floor crying, "Get me out of here, Darling. Where is my wife? Get me out of here, please, Darling. They're so nasty to me today. What happened?" We go through it every single day. But you think about it, and he said, "If only Trump moved faster," but he's the one that two months later called me xenophobic, and he called me a racist because I was banning China, which was heavily infected. And then he said, "Don't ban Europe." Well, I looked at Italy, big problem. I love Italy. I love the people of Italy, but they were heavily infected. France, I looked at France, I looked at Spain, they even had spikes recently. Did you see? And we're doing great. We're rounding it with or without, but we're going to have with, but you know, with his better, but with or without, we're rounding that corner, and we're rounding it fast and they don't want to give us any credit because they want to keep this up 'til November 4th. And on November 4th, the press will probably say, let's say something stupid happened. The press will say, "I got to admit he did a damn good job." And the other clown will be in office. We did a thing called price transparency. I signed it. It's effective, also very complicated. It's on your medical. And we did price transparency. It's the biggest thing. It's bigger than healthcare. Where you see your prices. You can go now to hospitals, you can price operations, you can price everything. It's a massive thing. The man who did it… And I took a lot of heat, and I'm doing favorite nations drugs, meaning whatever the lowest in the world is, we have to pay the same. That's the good news. The bad news is the drug companies, the doctors everybody's angry at me. Actually under price transparency, the good hospitals and the good doctors benefit tremendously, but the bad ones don't, and you have price transparency. And it goes into effect on January 1st. Could you imagine if this sleepy guy gets in and they say like, February, March, April something. They say unbelievable what happened to prices, it's dropping like crazy. And they'll say, what a job he's doing this president? And I'm the one that signed it. I said, could you put it into effect but statutorily? It has to mature, mature, mature. So the earliest I could get is January 1st. It's like crazy. You know another one? I'll give you another one. I'll give you another one. So Air Force One, so that's the 757, but they have a 747, which is the big Air Force One. I think that just disrespected the people of Minnesota today, they gave us the little one. No, actually it's because of the runway. In fact, when we landed, they said, "Sir, we have a very short runway, could you please hold on? I said, "I trust these pilots." By the way, these pilots are the best pilots. When you fly the president of the United States. Wait a minute, he's waving from the window. When you fly the president of the United States, you are the best flyer. They take the best air force guys, they take the best Marines in the helicopters, Marine One. But when you're flying these planes, you can land that sucker, you have no problem. There's no, mishits. There's no, "Let's go around. I can't quite make it, Sir." These guys are phenomenal. You've got to see what they look like. Everyone's in perfect shape. I look at him, central casting, every one of them they're great. Thank you fellas. Thank you. But I'll tell you a little story. So Air Force One is a very old plane. It's beautiful, but it's an old 747, right? It's 31 years old and other people didn't want to do it, but it was time to get a new one. It was time. You got to get a new plane. And actually Air Force One, I'll give you a little secret, it's actually two planes. They get two. It's a hell of a way to travel. If one's not working perfect, you use the other one. But they get two. So Air Force One, they negotiated a price and they had it down for $5.7 billion, that was not sounds expensive, and it's ridiculous, but that was done by the Obama administration. It was done by the Obama administration. And that's okay. But no administration Obama, Bush, they didn't want to do it because it sounds luxury. But at some point you got to buy a plane for the country. And these Arab countries would have their beautiful 747, 800s, 900s pour in, and they were gorgeous. And believe it or not, the new plane is a much bigger plane. Much bigger wingspan, it's a much more beautiful plane, it's modern. I think of a 31 years old, Air Force One is 31 years old, the main Air Force One, not this. This is a great plane, but the big one 31 years old. So you're representing the country, but they didn't want to do it because it shows luxury for two planes, in all fairness. Now it's very technical, there's a lot of stuff. I won't talk about it because I don't want to give away any classified information. Just trust me, some more sophisticated sucker you've ever seen in your life. I think you're getting into a plane that cost 5.7 billion. Right? But it's the most sophisticated, two planes. So I said, "How much is it? A general came, and an air force general, great guy, handsome guy. They're all so good looking these people. I said, "So general, what are we paying? What's the price?" " Sir, it's $5.7 million and we're ready to go, Sir, could you sign it?" It sounds like a lot of money to me, General, 5.7 million for two airplanes. Can we get a better price?" "No, sir. This was negotiated by the Obama administration. The Obama administration. This was negotiated, Sir, by Barack Hussein Obama." And I said, "Oh, that's good. It sounds very high. So here's what I'm going to do. Tell Boeing we're not taking the plane. We have no interest in, it's too much." This is what I did. By the way, this is one of many stories. Isn't this better than going and saying, "I saved your Iron Range?" And I say, "But please remember I did this too." And I can do away with this stuff, but I did this too. Please remember that because I have all this list of incredible things I've done for Minnesota, I won't even touch it because frankly I'm tired of repeating what I've done for all these different states. I mean, I did all this stuff and then I hear I'm nine down. I don't believe it by the way, suppression. So I said to the general, I said, "General, 5.7 billion, not million, billion. That sounds very high to me general. I bought a lot of planes in my life and a lot of helicopters. I know a lot about it. How could it be five?" "Sir, that's the best price they could get. We only have one day to do it." I said, "Cancel it General. Cancel the order." It was signed actually. "Yes, Sir." I said, "Do you have the right to cancel it?" "Yes, sir. I do." We negotiated a great deal. I said, "Oh good. Cancel it." "Yes, sir. I'm pleased to tell you something, Sir. We have a breakup fee. We made a great deal, Sir." I said, "You did? Oh, you have a breakup fee. You mean you can't just cancel it for nothing? Then cancel it. You don't have to pay a breakup fee. I know about breakup fees." "No, Sir, we have a breakup fee." "Okay. How much is it?" "Sir, we can break it up for $250 million." I said, "Wait a minute. So you mean to tell me that to cancel the order costs $250 million?" In other words, we give them $250 million, we get nothing. I said, "General, don't cancel the order. Just tell him I'm very unhappy." This is what these guys. They're good businessmen, by the way. These guys, right here, Mike, they might be better than you. I don't even know. He may be the next governor. Mike Landell, maybe you should run. You should run. He is my complete and total investment. You should run. He'd be a hell of a governor. At least, you know one thing. Minnesota would be well promoted. Mike, run for governor, please. So he says, "It's $250 million. It's 250, Sir, I'm so proud of that." I said, "You may be proud, but I'm not." So I said, "General, don't give them notice because I don't want to write a check for 250 and getting nothing. I don't think I could explain that to the American public. So tell them you're really unhappy, we're not going to make the deal, but just do it verbally." And, "Yes, sir." And then I spoke to the head of Boeing, a very nice guy. They had some rough times since then. They had a couple of really bad things happen. Terrible, really terrible. This was early on before the problems that they had. But he is, he's a high quality guy. And I said to him, "Dennis, we have to start it with a… It's got to have a three on the front of it." What do I know? I just know that if they're 5.7, and if I do something with a three. He said, "No, I can bring it down to 5.5 billion." So I say, "Well, that's not bad. I save $200 million in about a minute and a half phone call. So so far I'm not good, but it's not good enough. I'm not happy." I said, "No, we got to really think about canceling it." And I can't go to Airbus, which is made in Europe. It's a little hard, I got to go to their competitor. I can't say I'm going to buy the Air Force One from a European company that doesn't work too well. My only option was to say, "Look, I just don't want to just put it aside." He calls me up a few days later. "Well, we can do a little bit better than that." I said, "Dennis, has to have a three in front of it, Dennis." Got to have a three. Like a three, three anything, but got to have a three in front of it. So he said, "No, no, no." After one month, we signed a contract for $3.9 billion. Same exact one. Actually slightly better, we got an extra generator. And then Boeing came to me, and I love to negotiate. I do. Got that from my father. My father was a good negotiator and I love to negotiate. So they came to me, "Sir, we can put an extra stairway." This is the big 747. And remember this is a big, much bigger than the old 747. "Sir, it gets very windy up there. I noticed that your hair's blown all over the place. But we can buy a stairwell for the plane. And it comes under, it's like a corkscrew right at the bottom of the plane." You're very high off the ground, big, big thing. "And it opens up, and if it's raining or windy, you're covered, Sir, because it's under the plane. You're totally sheltered." I said, "That sounds great. So it's a corkscrew stairwell." I said, "How much is that general?" "50." I said, "50, what a deal, So for $50,000 I can get a stairway?" "No, sir. $50 million." I said, "Forget about the stairwell. Forget it." He said 50. I really thought he meant $50,000. So these are just some little stories. I guess I must like Minnesota to go on one of these deals. But boy, did you get your money's worth tonight? Is anybody having a bad time? Did you get your money's worth? Because you've heard the other one. We've done this, and we've cut your taxes, and we built up the military bigger and better. And we're the number one in history in regulation cuts, which is the biggest thing. And the judges, which we've done at a level like nobody's ever done, everything we've done. Nobody has done more in three and a half years, no administration three and a half. Those first three and a half years, nobody even comes close. And you know, it's a funny thing. I say it all the time. I've been saying it for a long time and the fake news, nobody even questions me about it. And you know if I was wrong, they would, but they can't question me because when you see right to try, we took care of our vets. We just got a 91% approval rating from the vets 91. It's never happened before. We got choice approved, we got accountability approved, drugs are way down. We've got a little setback with this whole situation where these shutdowns cause a lot of problems with drugs, a lot of everything, but drugs were way down. We had our best year in the history of our country last year. And we're going to have a better year coming up. That's why you have an obligation to vote for the guy that got you there. And remember this, and I really appreciate this, thank you. But I appreciate this because nine democrat mayors of cities in the Iron Range have endorsed me over Sleepy Joe. What do you like better? Sleepy Joe or Slow Joe? What's better? Let's do a poll. We do a poll. We do a poll. I do free falls. You know, these polls, they charge you a fortune for this stuff. They interviewed three people and then they charge you a million dollars. We interviewed 233 people, I got thousands of people at least for free. What do you like better as nickname? Slow Joe or Sleepy Joe? So let's go. Wait, Slow Joe first. Okay? So just scream if you like it. So you have a choice, Slow Joe, they're both very appropriate. Slow Joe or Sleepy Joe, ready? Slow Joe. I think we're going to have a winner here. Sleepy Joe based steel, real crap. It wasn't that, but when you think of it, they wrote it out. You didn't have environmentally the right. Somebody said, "Oh, well he got a bit because he was good with negotiating with these other countries." It wasn't that. I opened it up. I signed an order. I signed an executive order because Obama took your Iron Range and Biden took your Iron Range away. And I'll never forget. The day I did it, and Tom was there, a man, I don't know who he is, he's probably in this massive audience, but he came up to me and he was a rough guy and he never cried in his life, including at childbirth. He didn't cry at childbirth, but he was crying. And he said, "Sir, you gave our life back to us because Obama took our heart out when he closed up the Iron Range." He said you gave our heart back. It's true. So I just want to thank those cities. When a democrat mayor, and we have now a lot of… Now we have additional. So these are democrat politicians and two weeks ago they endorsed us, and it's a great thing. We're finding that all over the country. Democrats for Trump. Politicians that got elected as democrats, I don't think they changed their party affiliation, but they endorsed Trump. They're all in the Iron Range area. And Larry Cuffe is here. Larry Cuffe. Where's Larry? Where is he? Larry, how are you? Why did you do that, Larry? That's so nice. I appreciate it. Boy, are you good. I wish you had a mic. He said, "Because you're the best candidate we could ever…" I love this guy. Said you're the best candidate we could ever hope for. Thank you Larry, that's beautiful. I appreciate it. We'll do a good job. We're not going to let you down. And they're doing a good job over there. So dig in, dig in, dig we must, right? It's all going because of me. That's cool, man. Thank you. No, he signed an executive order shutting it down. Just shutting it down. And I hear it's got the best iron ore anywhere in the world. That's what I hear. The quality is the best. … or anywhere in the world. That's what I hear. The quality is the best. And it's like an unlimited amount. I'm talking about a little, this is a massive operation with thousands of people and everything else. And for me, it was very easy. Andrea Zupancich, where is she? Where's Andrea? Thank you very much. That's really nice. I'm glad that at least you got a good location, right? That's great. I appreciate it very much. You're all friends I guess. Chris Vreeland, where's Chris? Chris Vreeland. Chris? Where's Chris? The mayor? Thank you, Chris. Thank you, Chris. Thank you very much. Kathy Brandau. Kathy Brandau. Thank you, Kathy. I hope you're having a good time tonight. We're not going to let you down. You know that. We're open. That sucker is open. We're not closing it. Well, think of this though. If Biden gets in, it's closed. He said he's going to close it. How about this guy? No fracking. You're not going to frack. Onstage with all these crazy people and they don't want any energy. They think everything's going to run by wind, which costs you a fortune, about 20 times more than what we have and doesn't work. But think of it, all of these people… And they say, "What about fracking? Fracking is the modern technology. And so they all said, "No, no, we're all against… everyone's against fracking. What about you?" Yes, I'm against it too. Now he's against it for months. He gets it, now he's in favor of it. But he's sort of grandfathering it. You know, it's a very weak… Well, I like to grandfather fracking. If I'm a fracker, I don't want to be grandfather. I want to have it or not have it, right? He wants to grandfather fracking. Always go with their first statement, okay? So I was in Texas two weeks ago, we had crowds. Mike, we had crowds that went from the airplane to the well, to the drilling well, where we went to see a well. And we saved the industry because I got Russia and Saudi Arabia to cut back 10 million barrels. It actually was probably 18. Ended up being, I think, 18.5 million barrels. And it saved the industry. And yet you're still paying very low gasoline prices at the pump, but we saved 10 million jobs. But I'm in Texas, and let me tell you, Texas appreciated it because that industry was in deep trouble because all of a sudden with the pandemic, there was no demand. There was nobody driving, there was no demand. Nobody ever saw anything like it. So I'm in Texas and I said to the crowd, it was a great crowd, and we must have had a hundred thousand people on the road, on the highways and roadways waving. And they had the most beautiful Trump flags. I wanted to stop, "Where did you buy that flag?" The most beautiful flags of me and our great vice president. Is Mike Pence doing a good job by the way? He did such a great… he worked 29 hours a day. I mean, this guy works day and night. He worked not the 24. He worked 24 plus least five, okay. This man is a worker and he's a wonderful human being. And when they try it, a guy like Biden that can't carry his jockstrap. When Biden goes, "Oh, they should have closed one week earlier", and here's the guy that said I made a mistake when I banned China that nothing's going to happen. It's so phony. This politics is a very phony business. I haven't been doing it long. I told one of the senators that came in, he came into my office there, " I've been doing this for 30 years. I've won many elections, I've only lost twice in my life. I've been a Senator for a long time. I know what I'm doing, sir". I said, "Yeah, and I've done it for four years. And I've only won one election, but it's for the president of the United States." I remember a certain man on television that didn't like me too much. He said, "They put together the greatest field ever assembled, the Republicans, remember? 17 plus me. They put together the greatest field of talent ever assembled. I hear Trump wants to come in. He's not going to do it number one. Number two, if he does, he's just doing it for fun and he'll be out by September and then he'll go about leading his life, but he's not going to do it. But we don't really need him because this is the greatest single assemblage of talent ever assembled for one party." The greatest talent he's ever seen. And then I did it and just week after week, one out, two out, three out, four out. And then we've done changes. Oh, he said, "He can't do it because he doesn't have any experience." But I actually do on the other side. I contributed to politics. I always found it very interesting. So in a certain way, I had a lot of experience probably. Maybe I had too much experience. That's why I can tell you about AOC. Check out the $2 million please, check it out, check it out. Check out Omar, check out Omar, get to that great writer, he should get… Oh, so the New York Times won all these Pulitzer prizes, right? I was going to tell you before. All these Pulitzer prizes, these people, and they all got it wrong, right? They got for Russia, Russia, Russia. We give the Pulitzer prize. I won't use names. I won't use names, but we give the Pulitzer prize to the New York Times. They got it wrong. We give the Pulitzer prize to the Washington Post and all of these real sleazebags. I have to be honest with you. Very dishonest people, very dishonest. I call it the Amazon Washington Post. He uses that as his lobbyist because he owns the Washington Post. He gets crap that other people wouldn't get, okay. That means it's a lobby. It's a lobbyist deal. But they got the prize, right? They got the Pulitzer prize. All the guys that got it right, that really got it right, they all got it wrong, totally wrong. And they should return the Pulitzer prize. And Pulitzer association, the committee should ask for those prizes back. They got it all wrong. They were a hundred percent wrong. There was no collusion. They couldn't believe. Remember the day when it was announced after three years, there is no collusion. I could have told them that a day one, they could have saved 48 million dollars. They got the Pulitzer. And then you take guys so many, so many. Solomon, Sara Carter, Bongino. How about Dan Bongino? So many, so talented guys. How about that great gentlemen who wrote The Witch Hunt? Remember that? That was the first, right? You know what I'm talking about. He's fantastic. All great. These people should have won the Pulitzer prize. Now I would say Sean Hannity and Lou Dobbs and Laura and Tucker. In all fairness, Tucker was very good. Tucker was great, but these are all people that got it right. Now they don't do I guess the Pulitzer prize for that stuff, but they probably should. But these guys all got it right. And all they did was get a lot of money because they're very successful, and that's okay I guess. But they should give the Pulitzer prize to the people that got it right and they should withdraw from all of those writers, many of whom are back there right now, all of those writers, they should do that. And a candidate for Congress, Michelle Fischbach, who's supposed to be fantastic. And Michelle has my complete and total endorsement. But Jason, you're in good shape, wow. You're in better shape than these Congressman Jase. By the way, Jason is fantastic and he's doing a fantastic… Where's Michelle? Is she there? Be careful. It's not worth the broken legs. Look at her. Oh, she's a warrior, I can tell. Come on up. But thanks, Michelle. And they have my complete endorsement. They're great people. They love your state. They love our country. So just in conclusion, I want to say that over the next four years, we will make America into the manufacturing superpower of the world. And we will end our reliance on China once and for all. We will make our medical supplies right here in the United States. And you probably heard me today. It used to be Puerto Rico did tremendous dollars in medical supplies. And then what happened? They made a lot, they did a good job, and Obama Biden destroyed it. They took away the incentive, all of the taxes. And they took away the incentive and Puerto Rico went down a long way. We'll get some of that back to Puerto Rico and we'll get it back for us. Take it away from China. You heard that, yes? They took it away. And then people automatically vote. It's like a habit. Will I vote for the Democrat? The Democrat was so bad to you. And how bad were the Democrats to Israel? We did Jerusalem, right? We broke up the Iran deal, right? And then they vote for a Democrat. It's out of habit, but I think the habits, we're breaking those habits very quickly. But we've helped Puerto Rico and we've really helped… If you look at what we've done for Israel, it's been incredible. They say nobody's done more. And it's my honor. But we'll hire more police, increase penalties for assaults on law enforcement, and we will ban deadly sanctuary cities, which are a disaster. We'll appoint tough on crime prosecutors. We will nominate judges and justices who interpret the constitution as written. We will ensure equal justice for citizens of every race, color, religion, and creed. We will defend the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. And that's why the Supreme court is so important. The next president will get one, two, three, or four Supreme court justices. I had two. Many presidents have had none. They've had none because they're there for a long time. They tend to be appointed young. They're there for a long time. But the next one we'll have anywhere from one to four. Think of that. That will totally change when you talk about life, when you talk about second amendment, when you talk about things that are so important to you. You're going to be stuck for 40 years, 35 years, a long time. So this is going to be the most important election, in my opinion, in the history of our country. You got to get it right. Because if you don't get it right, we will not have a country anymore. You're not going to have a country. Not as we know it. You won't have a country anymore. We will uphold religious liberty, free speech, and the right to keep and bear arms. We will strike down terrorists who threaten our citizens and we will keep America out of these ridiculous, horrible, endless foreign wars. Countries you've never heard of. Coming home. We will maintain America's unrivaled military mind, and we will ensure peace through strength. This is what we have now. Peace through strength. Remember what I told you about those weapons, we don't want to use ever, we don't want to use those weapons. We will end surprise medical billing, require price transparency, January 1st. He doesn't even have to do anything now. I'll be so angry if he… They'll say, "What a job he's done on transparency, can you believe it?" And he won't even know what transparency is. And it's complex. And further reduce health insurance premiums and the cost of prescription drugs. We've done that already. We will strongly protect Medicare and social security, and we will always protect patients with preexisting conditions. America will land the first woman on the moon and the United States will be the first nation to land an astronaut on Mars. And we brought NASA back. NASA, when I got in three and a half years ago, grass was growing through the cracks of the runway. It was over, it was closed. It was nothing. Now it's the number one space center in the entire world by a factor of five. We will stop the radical indoctrination of our students and restore patriotic education to our schools. We will. We will teach our children to love our country, honor our history, and always respect our great American flag. And we will live by the timeless words of our national motto, in God we trust. You know that the Democrat national convention and the pledge of allegiance at a caucus, two of them, not one. I heard the first one, I said, "Oh, they must've made a mistake." They left under God out of the pledge of allegiance. Yeah, yeah, yeah. Now they then said, "Oh, well we didn't mean that." They meant it. That's what they're going to do. They're going to take God out of it. Just like I was saying before, Texas, they don't want God, they don't want oil, they don't want guns. I don't think they're going to do too well in Texas. Do you agree with that? I don't think they're going to do too well in Minnesota either. No, but could you imagine you're campaigning, and it doesn't play too well here, but could you imagine you're in Texas and you have a guy say, "No oil, no God, no guns. Oh, I think I'm going to vote for Joe Biden, everybody." And then they say, "Texas is in play, it's a very close…" I have a friend in Texas. He said, "I think you're winning by 15 points." These people are crazy. Texas is in play. They don't want to let you have oil. Think of it. It's unbelievable. Texas is in play. That's the fake news back there. They said it last time too. Remember? Texas, when they say in play, that means it's too close to call. It's in play. Too close. We've heard that for a long time, in play, right? Too close to call. And they said it four years ago, "Texas is in play. This could be a terrible defeat, losing Texas. Big state, great state. This would be a tremendous defeat." And they said it about Ohio too. I think we won by like nine points. Right? They said Ohio is in play. Utah's in play. We won by a lot. Remember we beat a guy named McMuffin. Remember the guy? He was going to take the state of Utah. And then he was going to be able to negotiate. But that didn't work out. He came in third. Even Hillary beat him. But they said Texas is in play. And I'd go around telling my people, "Damn it, Texas is in play, how the hell? Every time I go there, I have 35,000 people at the stadium, how could it possibly be in play?" They said it's in play. My people would say, "I don't think so." And we had a big Texas rancher. He was on one of the shows. He was wearing a big, beautiful hat. I wish I could wear those hots. It wouldn't work for me too well. I don't think it works for me, right? But it worked for him. And he said, "I don't know too much about a lot, but I know one thing. Texas is not in play. And this guy is going to win Texas by a hell of a lot of votes." And that's what happened that night, the night of the election. The night of the election, they called the results. I've been listening for six months, "Texas is so close, we can't even imagine it it's so close. This is big." And they only call the election immediately if you win in a landslide, it's got to be tremendous. And they said, "Texas has closed its doors. Ladies and gentlemen, Donald Trump has won the state of Texas." They didn't even say the polls were closed. They forgot to say the polls were closed. I wanted to say. I said, "How come I won?" I called my people, "How could I have won? It was so close they called it before they even said the doors closed." And I heard from the governor of Texas, great guy, Greg Abbott. I said, "How are we doing compared to four years ago?" We did great four years ago, big, big win. He said, "Sir, you're doing much better." But these guys keep saying it's in play. It's the same way that I'm down nine points in Minnesota. If I lose Minnesota, if I lose Minnesota, Jason, I'm going to blame Jason if I lose. Boy, we almost had it last time. But we did the right thing. We went to Michigan, we won Michigan, first time in many, many years, that Michigan was won. It's a great state. For years you had a president who apologized for America. And now you have a president who is standing up for America and standing up for Minnesota. So get your friends, get your family, get your neighbors, get your coworkers, and get out and vote. And you know it's starting today in Minnesota. That's why I'm here. It started today. Go out of here. You know what? If they're closed, what the hell time is it now? If they're closed, just stand in line like you do. People were here two days ago trying to get in here. It's crazy. So do the same thing at the voting booth, please. From St. Paul to St. Cloud, from Rochester to Duluth, and from Minneapolis, thank God we still have Minneapolis, to right here, right here with all of you great people, this state was pioneered by men and women who braved the wilderness and the winters to build a better life for themselves and for their families. They were tough and they were strong. You have good genes. You know that, right? You have good genes. A lot of it's about the genes, isn't it? Don't you believe? The resource theory you think was so different? You have good genes in Minnesota. They didn't have a lot of money. They didn't have a lot of luxury, but they had grit, they had faith, and they had each other. That's what you have now. You have each other. They were miners and lumberjacks, fishermen and farmers, shipbuilders and shopkeepers. But they all had one thing in common. They loved their families, they loved their countries, and they loved their God. Proud citizens like you helped build this country. And together we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people. With your help, your devotion and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we're going to keep on fighting, and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. And don't forget, you went through years where you weren't winning, right? Years and years, they closed down. Even with Obama, he closed that iron. I think he just wanted to get even with you, I don't know. He wasn't good. Not a good… We've knocked out about 84% of the things he did. Then you say, "I wonder if he likes me?" But you're getting used to winning and you're going to see winning like you've never seen before. You had your best year and you're going to win so much. You've heard this, right? I haven't said it in a long time because we've been doing a lot of winning, but you're going to win so much. And you're going to send Jason to the US Senate. And you're going to keep winning and winning and winning. You're going to win on trade, you're going to win on the military. You're going to win on everything you touch. Minnesota is going to keep on winning and you're going to get tired of winning because Minnesota doesn't want to win all the time. Your football team is going to win in the big 10 they say, right? No, we are going to keep on winning in Minnesota. And you're going to get so tired you're going to say, "Jason, Jason, please, please Jason, go to the president. See him in the oval office. Stop him from winning. We're winning too much in Minnesota. We can't stand it. Jason, please, please Jason. Stop him from winning so much for Minnesota. We can't take it. We're not used to it because we went through years and years and years where it was tough", right? The mayors know that. That's why they all endorsed the president. And I'm going to look at Jason, I'm going to say, "No, Jason, I'm sorry. The people of Minnesota want to win, you're wrong, Jason. They want to win. We're going to keep on going, Jason, we're going to keep on winning. And they're going to be happy as hell, Jason." Get Jason in, he's a great guy. By the way, you have a Senator that he's running against. I won't even mention names. She does nothing, nothing. Nobody even knows who the hell she is. She goes to a meeting the other day, everyone's trying to figure out who is she? This guy… he even looks the role. Central casting, right? If you can get the look for free, that's good too. Right? But he's going to be fantastic. Tremendous guy, really successful. And he loves your state and he loves our country. So Jason, please knock them out. Knock them out. But you're going to win. We're one movement. We're one people, one family, and one glorious nation under God. And together with the incredible people of Minnesota, and you know what's going to be operating at strength? Because I owe it to these incredible mayors that were so nice to me. That was such a nice thing. And I didn't politick you at all. I never politicked you. I said how nice. And it's happening with so many other things. We have other endorsements from police forces that I never asked and all of a sudden they're coming from very hostile territory. So I just appreciate your being here. And I'm saying this for you and I'm saying it for all of you. Okay. Thank you. We will make America wealthy again. We will make America strong again. We will make America proud again. We will make America safe again. And we will make America great again. Thank you Minnesota, thank you.Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. All I can say is that the fake news just doesn't get it, do they? They don't get it. They just don't get it. Hello Charleston, and I'm thrilled to be back in the great state of South Carolina with thousands of hardworking American Patriots who believe in faith, family, God, and country. Thank you. It's a phenomenal crowd, only topped by the number of people outside that didn't get in. If anybody would like to give up where you're standing or your seat, please raise your hand. All right. Then let's begin, right? Thank you all very much though. This is great. No, they don't get it. Down the road, they have a rally for one of the people that are going to be running tomorrow. They're trying to get to a hundred, but they're not going to make it. So I think they're going to set up a round table. Well, that's what they do. So people want to go to a rally, they end up sitting at a round table talking about their definition of impeachment. Crazy. No, it's crazy. Crazy! It's a crazy deal. No, the fake news media, they've been trying to figure this out for years. They still don't get it though. They don't get it. Look at all of those cameras. Look at all of those cameras. That's a lot of cameras. That's a lot of cameras, Lindsey and Tim, that's a lot of… They heard you guys were here. They heard Tim was here and that Lindsey was here and that… And they said, "We're not going to attend that rally," but when we heard those two guys plus our great congressmen, they're here, great congressmen. But this is an incredible time for our nation. We're thrilled to be in the midst of what we call the Great American Comeback and that's what it is. Jobs are booming, incomes are soaring, factories are returning, poverty is plummeting, confidence is surging, and we have completely rebuilt the awesome power of the United States military. Our country is stronger than ever before. We are stronger, we are better, but while we are building a great future, the radical left Democrats in Washington are trying to burn it all down. They have spent the last three years, and I can even go further than that, three years since the election, but we go before the election, working to erase your ballots and overthrow our democracy. But with your help, we have exposed the far left's corruption and defeated their sinister schemes and let's see what happens in the coming months. Let's watch. Let's just watch. Very dishonest people. Now the Democrats are politicizing the coronavirus, you know that right? Coronavirus, they're politicizing it. We did one of the great jobs. You say, "How's President Trump doing?" They go, "Oh, not good, not good." They have no clue. They don't have any clue. They can't even count their votes in Iowa. They can't even count. No, they can't. They can't count their votes. One of my people came up to me and said, "Mr. President, they tried to beat you on Russia, Russia, Russia." That didn't work out too well. They couldn't do it. They tried the impeachment hoax. That was on a perfect conversation. They tried anything. They tried it over and over. They'd been doing it since you got in. It's all turning. They lost. It's all turning. Think of it. Think of it. And this is their new hoax. But we did something that's been pretty amazing. We have 15 people in this massive country and because of the fact that we went early. We went early, we could have had a lot more than that. We're doing great. Our country is doing so great. We are so unified. We are so unified. The Republican party has never ever been unified like it is now. There has never been a movement in the history of our country like we have now. Never been a movement. So a statistic that we want to talk about, go ahead. Say USA. It's okay. USA. So a number that nobody heard of, that I heard of recently and I was shocked to hear it, 35,000 people on average die each year from the flu. Did anyone know that? 35,000, that's a lot of people. It could go to 100,000, it could be 27,000. They say usually a minimum of 27, goes up to 100,000 people a year die. And so far we have lost nobody to coronavirus in the United States. Nobody. And it doesn't mean we won't and we are totally prepared. It doesn't mean we won't, but think of it. You hear 35 and 40,000 people and we've lost nobody and you wonder the press is in hysteria mode. CNN fake news and the camera just went off, the camera. The camera just went off. Turn it back on. Hey, by the way, hold it. Look at this, and honestly, all events are like this. It's about us. It's all about us. I wish they'd take the camera, show the arena please. They never do. They never do. They never do it. They never show the arena. You can hear it because when you hear it, that's not 200 people. That's not a hundred people. That's thousands and thousands of people including people outside. You can hear it. They always show my face. See that face? They show my face. I want them to show the arena, not my face, right? How many have you been to? How many rallies have you gone? Practically every one. Can you believe it? I'm sure your husbands are thrilled, right? They're thrilled. Where are you going tonight? I'm going to another Trump rally. Cool. Number 114. What do your husbands say about that? This group up here. She said, "We don't care." Thank you. Thank you. Democrats will only say horrible things even though they know we're doing a great job. We're doing a great job with what we have to work with. It's incredible. The Democrats want us to fail so badly. Even if their actions, and you take a look, hurt the people of this country, they'll hurt the people themselves, their wealth, their everything. They're willing to hurt our country in order to say bad, even if they know it's not so. We made an unbelievable deal with Mexico, with Canada, with China, with South Korea, with Japan. And if you put a microphone with these people back there like the Academy Awards used to be, not anymore. Best movie of the year. It's made in South Korea. What's that all about? I'm waiting to see the best movie of the year- And it's made… He said, "It's garbage." Only in South Carolina can you say that. Only in South Carolina. You're going to get us in trouble. No, I'm just repeating what he said for the fake news. No, but seriously the Academy Awards has gone way, way down in ratings. Do you know why? Because they started attacking us and we don't believe in it anymore. That's why. No, but they had the best movie of the year made in South Korea. They make enough stuff for us, right? And they're good. They're our friends. Take advantage of us, that's okay. Not so much anymore. We are really, you take a look, magnificently organized with the best professionals in the world. We're prepared for the absolute worst. You have to be prepared for the worst, but hopefully it will all amount to very little. That's why I tell you when we have the flu with 35,000 people and this one we have to take it very, very seriously. That's what we're doing. We are preparing for the worst. My administration has taken the most aggressive action in modern history to prevent the spread of this illness in the United States. We are ready. We are ready. Totally ready. On January 31st, I ordered the suspension of foreign nationals who have recently been in China from entering the United States. An action which the Democrats loudly criticized and protested and now everybody's complimenting me saying, "Thank you very much. You were 100% correct." Could've been a whole different story. But I say, so let's get this right. A virus starts in China, bleeds its way into various countries all around the world, doesn't spread widely at all in the United States because of the early actions that myself and my administration took against a lot of other wishes, and the Democrats' single talking point, and you see it, is that it's Donald Trump's fault, right? It's Donald Trump's fault. No, just things that happened. But you know what this does show you? Things happen. Whoever thought of this two weeks ago? Who would've thought this could be going on four weeks ago? You wouldn't. But things happen in life and you have to be prepared and you have to be flexible and you have to be able to go out and get it. And my guys that we have the best professionals in the world, the best in the world and we are so ready. At the same time that I initiated the first federally mandated quarantine in over 50 years. We had a quarantine some people. They weren't happy, they weren't happy about it. I want to tell you there are a lot of people that not so happy, but after two weeks they got happy. You know who got happy? The people around them got happy. That's who got happy. I also created a White House virus task force. It's a big thing, a virus task force. I requested 2.5 billion dollars to ensure we have the resources we need. The Democrats said, "That's terrible. He's doing the wrong thing. He needs eight and a half billion, not two and a half." I've never had that before. I ask for two and a half, they want to give me eight and a half, so I said, "I'll take it." Does that make me a bad… I'll take it. I'll take it. I never had that before. I never had it. We want two and a half million. That's plenty. We demand you take eight and a half. He doesn't know what he's doing. We want eight and a half. These people are crazy. We must understand that border security is also health security. And you've all seen the wall has gone up like magic. It's gone up like magic. You think that was an easy one? That was not an easy one. It's going up great and we're up now 132 miles and this is the exact wall that border security, water, everything. This is everything they wanted, 132 miles already. We'll have 500 miles built by very early next year sometime. One of the reasons the numbers are so good. We will do everything in our power to keep the infection and those carrying the infection from entering our country. We have no choice. Whether it's the virus that we're talking about or many other public health threats, the Democrat policy of open borders is a direct threat to the health and wellbeing of all Americans. Now you see it with the coronavirus, you see it. You see it with the coronavirus. You see that. When you have this virus or any other virus or any other problem coming in, it's not the only thing that comes in through the border. And we're setting records now at the border. We're setting records. And now just using this, so important, right? So important. I'm doing well in the polls despite the worst fake news and worst presidential harassment in the history of the United States. We've got phenomenal numbers. No, it's true. The worst presidential harassment in history. We had a great event yesterday, an event that was so beautiful, young African American leaders. One of the things I asked them, and I've been thinking about this for a long time… And great people, great people. Some of them are here tonight. Do you like the name African American or Black? And they said, "Black!" all at the same time. No, true. I tell you. Because you say, "African American or Black?" And they said almost immediately, "Black." But we had an incredible group of people and what happened is NBC… It was such a love fest. It was so incredible. It went on for 45 minutes. It was a love fest. It was incredible. NBC turned down… There they are right there. They turned down… Comcast, which owns NBC… Actually NBC, I think, we call it MSDNC, right? MSDNC. But NBC I think is worse than CNN. I actually do. And Comcast, a company that spends millions and millions of dollars on their image… I'll do everything possible to destroy their image because they are terrible. They are terrible. They're a terrible group of people. And they paid me a fortune for years for the Apprentice. They paid me a fortune. And when I left the show, it was doing great. When I left the show, 14 seasons, think of that, they got a big movie star. I won't tell you his name. Nobody would know. Actually nobody will know his name because he was on for such a short period of time. But the show went down the tubes very quickly after they had Trump. But the country in five years from now, of course you want to upset them, five years or nine years or 13 years. Or 18 years! 10 more years. Nah. Oh, they go crazy when you say it. When you say to them five more years, so it's five, but you then say maybe nine, maybe 13, maybe 17, maybe 21, or not, maybe 21. Let's do this. Let's term limit ourselves at 25 years. No more than 25 years. No more. Okay. They'll pass something in the Senate. Tim, pass it in the Senate with Lindsey, a 25 year term limit please. 07. While the extreme left has been wasting America's time with these vile hoaxes, we've been killing terrorists, creating jobs, raising wages, enacting fair trade deals, securing our border, and lifting up citizens of every race, religion, color, and creed. We added another 225,000 jobs last month alone. And that makes seven million jobs since our election, seven million. The unemployment rate in the great state of South Carolina. You ever hear of that place? Now Sleepy Joe would say, "The unemployment rate in the great state of Ohio…" No, no. You're in South Carolina. Joe! Joe, you're in South Carolina. Come up. You ever see the guy with the note, "No, no, it's South Carolina! It's not Ohio." Okay. Then he goes, "All right, Iowa. Did you say Iowa?" No. No. They did that seven times. If I did that once, it would be the end of the road, right? Be the end of the road. They'd say Trump has lost it. They like to say that anyway, I guess though. These people are bad people. Now, Sleepy Joe. Well, he's running tomorrow. No, but could you imagine if I said just a small fraction of the mistakes he makes, which are unbelievable? Every speech. I actually said the other night, I was watching him when he said about half the population wiped out with guns. I said, "That's a horrible thing. That's the end of his evening. That's the end of his political career." And then after the debate, they're revealing him and they said, "Joe Biden had a great night last night." I don't get it, Tim. The unemployment rate here in South Carolina has fallen to 2.3%, the lowest rate in your state's history. The lowest rate in all of America. It's the lowest rate in all of America. I said to a friend of mine, a Democrat, "How's the race going tomorrow? Who's going to win?" And he says, "Mr. President…" No, it's very interesting. He said something. This guy's a real political pro too, in all fairness, even though he's a Democrat. But I said, "Who's going to win?" He said, "Honestly, sir, it doesn't matter. You are so far ahead in South Carolina that it's meaningless." Meaningless. That's what they say. And in North Carolina too. In North Carolina, bunch of losers. The good citizens of South Carolina have had a front row seat to the extremism of the Democrat candidates. Whether it's this character that nobody ever heard of him. I'd never heard it. I thought I knew all the wealthy people. This guy Tom, Mr. Impeachment, how did that work out, Tom Hey, he spent millions and millions of dollars in Iowa, right? Millions. He got less than 1%. He got one third of 1%. I wrote a little note. Did you see it? It said, "Tom, it's not so easy doing what I did. Is it?" Not so easy. Not so easy. All you have to do is ask Mini Mike. He's in there for a fortune. He wished he never started. Mini Mike, he wished he never started. He said, "Well, Trump can do it. I'm going to do it too." Unfortunately it's not working out too well. Was that the worst debate performance in history? They had a big audience. Everybody wanted to see whether or not he was good at what we're supposed to be doing up here. He turned out to be a total catastrophe. 35 million people, can you believe that? That's a big audience. Very big. And what a killer. But this guy Steyer, he spends all this money. He's not that wealthy. He spends all of this money and you shouldn't waste your vote on him tomorrow. I have to be honest. By the way, are the Republicans allowed to vote anyway even though… Are you ready? You ready? Let's do it together. I assume this is okay from a campaign finance standpoint, I assume. Lindsey, Tim, our great congressmen, are we allowed to do this? So am I allowed to request… First we- Congressman, are we allowed to do this? Am I allowed to request … First, we have to figure out who would be the weakest candidate against President Trump. And then if it's legal, I always say if it's permissible by law, because they have so many little booby traps, but they only like getting the Republicans. Democrats skirt, right? But we'll see what happens about that. The Democrats. But let me ask you this. Lindsey, Tim, you're pros. These are two of the greatest guys I know. So let me ask you this. So I don't know what the record attendance is in this arena, but I was told that we broke it by a lot. And you got the people outside. Are we allowed to tell them who we would like them to vote for? Because you're allowed to skip. All right, so wait a minute, let's do a poll. We do this for the fake news back there. Ready? Who would be the best candidate for us? Not for them. We're ready. Ready? So let's go through them just quickly. We won't include Steyer because he's a loser. He's out, okay? We won't include him. Who would be the best? This is a real poll. This isn't one of those fake polls taken by … In all fairness, I love you, Fox, taken by Fox, the worst pollster. This guy … this pollster hates Trump's guts. I was losing the last election by a fortune. They said, "He did great with women." Everything was wrong. And they never replaced this guy. But watch this. You ready? So first we'll go … let's say sleepy Joe, right? Right? Then we'll go crazy Bernie. Then we'll go mini Mike. I think he's out of it. Should we include mini Mike or not? Mini Mike is gone. Mini Mike is gone. I think he's gone. He doesn't have a chance. So let's not talk … and he's not in your election anyways, so let's forget. So mini Mike, I hear mini Mike, by the way, has left. He's basically given up. That's what I hear. He gave up. He gave up. Now, I hope what I just said keeps him in. You know, he's the kind of a guy, he'll stay in because, "I don't want to be wrong." Mike, it's time to go home. Go home, Mike, and enjoy your life. Go home and spend some money on something horrible to people. They said, "She's not dumb, but she's just damn mean. We can't vote for her." She's a mean one. She is mean. So Pocahontas, should we leave her in or out? How about Klobuchar? Not going to happen. So really we're down to two candidates, right? Sleepy Joe Biden and crazy Bernie. So this is a poll. I guarantee you this. As much as they hate me, they hate me. They're going to put this all over the place. We have a poll of like 30,000 people inside and out. They're doing it outside, too. We have a poll. Are you ready? Who do I … So in other words, who's the weaker of the two? I'm not interested in who does better. No, no. I'm not interested … wait. Ready? In other words, who do I want to run against? Meaning … very simple. We put it into nice, simple language. Who the hell is easier to beat? So who is easier for us? Not me. For us to beat. Ready? Crazy Bernie? Or sleepy Joe? I don't know. I think maybe a crazy Bernie has it a little bit. Once more just quick. Ready? He said, "It doesn't matter, you'll beat them all." I hope so. I hope so. So who is easier to beat, crazy Bernie or sleepy Joe? They think Bernie's easier to beat. They think Bernie's easier to beat. So whether it's Bernie Sanders' plan to eliminate private healthcare, Elizabeth Warren's plan. I told you that I had more Indian blood in me than her, even though I have none. I have none. Zero. I have none. I have none. I said I have more Indian blood in me than she has. And she choked. She said, "I'm going to show. I'm going to show." She hired this company and they went out and did a blood test. 1,024th, right? So that means I probably one somewhere down the line a million years ago. I'm telling you, that was horrible. She choked. We don't want a person to win that chokes. We don't want to choke artist, right? One thing you will say about me, I'm not a choker. With all these people for years, they're after me years. We can't have chokers. We can't have chokers as your president. So Elizabeth Warren's plan to eliminate America's borders. That's what she would … or mini Mike's plan to eliminate your Second Amendment and take away your guns. How about that? Mini Mike wants to take away your guns. The insanity of the Democrat party is why millions of registered Democrat voters are joining our movement. They are joining our great new Republican party. This November, we are going to take back the House. We are going to hold the Senate, and we are going to keep the White House. I wonder what they say when they go down the road and they see these groups of 200 people. Seriously. I wonder what they say. They never talk about it. They'll say, "Joe Biden had a fabulous crowd today." Fabulous. So fabulous that there's like five people. And they'll leave and they'll say, "President Trump had a smattering of applause." Smattering. They use the word smattering a lot. This is not … let's let them hear it. This is not a … this is a big … this is not a smattering. It's not a smattering. Turn the cameras. That's not a smattering. That is not a smattering. I hate it. They say Donald Trump … In India, I hate to say this to you, but … so they actually have 129,000 seat stadium. Did you see it? The place was packed, and they did better than most. They gave me credit for 100,000. That was not bad. It's 129. The stadium holds 100. They had a field that's about three times … it's cricket. It's the biggest stadium. And they had 129. I was with the Prime Minister of India, Modi. Great guy, loved by the people of India. And we had an amazing thing. And I went in, and here's the problem. This is a big crowd. And normally I like talking about my crowds because I get the crowds like nobody, but I just got back from 140 or 50 or 60,000 people and now I'm coming here. What does this place hold, 15? It's hard to be enthused. You understand that? I may never be excited again about a crowd after going to India. Think of this, they have 1.5 billion people. We have 350, so we're doing pretty well, I'll tell you what, but I love this crowd, and I love that crowd too. Tell you they have a great love for … They have a great love. They have a great leader, and they have a great love for the people of this country. That was really a worthwhile trip. With us tonight are both of your incredible US Senators. Two incredible friends, two warriors. Senator Lindsey Graham and Senator Tim Scott, come up here. And by the way, Tim's incredible mother is right here in the front row. As they're doing that, they got this big … I was going to almost do a poll on the two of them, but we're not doing that. But Lindsey is a true fighter for South Carolina. Loves your state. And as chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee … you know that, right? He's the chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee. So important. So important. Senator Graham has been leading the charge to help us confirm a record number of judges to uphold the Constitution as written. Lindsey was amazing, you remember, for Justice Brett Kavanaugh? Remember how badly he … Great job, Lindsey. Great job, man. Thank you. Senator Scott is a leading superstar. He's a superstar. But he is a leader in lowering healthcare costs like nobody has done it. People don't know, but in the last year, prescription drug prices came down for the first time in 51 years. And that was with no Democrat help. If we had the help, we could lower it by 50%. But we'll get their help. One of these days, they're going to get smart. Senator Scott provides world class care for our veterans. What he's done for our veterans is incredible. And bringing investment to distressed communities across our country through opportunity zones, including 135 right here in South Carolina. That's what it is. Tim Scott came to my office with an idea. He said, "Opportunity zone." I said, "Tim, what the hell is that?" What is it? Right, Tim? And he went through a whole big thing and I said, "This maybe could work," and we tried it. It is an incredible success, and what he's done for this country is incredible. It's incredible. Lindsey. We'll start with Lindsey. Say a few words, please. Thank you. Well, that was quite a display, wasn't it? Now there's a lot of love in this room. A lot of people say to me, friends of mine, they've very successful. They'll say, "How do you speak in front of 25,000 people and 10,000 people and all of this?" You know why? There's such love in the room it's easy. No, it's true. There is such … I explained, they don't understand it, because they're not for doing that, but I say there is such unbelievable love in the room that it's easy to do. Very easy. Right? It's sort of easy to do. We're also thrilled to be joined by many more great leaders from across the state. And some of you maybe know I liked this guy for a long time, Governor Henry McMaster. Come up, Henry. Come up, Henry. Representatives Joe Wilson, Jeff Duncan, William Timmons, Ralph Norman, Tom Rice, and the Chairman of the South Carolina Republican party, Drew McKissick. As I introduce somebody, and I'll just say stay there because he was brave, but he got hit hard. He's a very special man, retired Marine Corps, major general, and most of you know he received the Congressional Medal of Honor, James E. Livingston. James, just relax. Where's James? He got hit hard. Thank you, James. Congressional Medal of Honor winner. Thank you, James. They are great brave people. You know, we have the Congressional Medal of Honor and we have the Presidential Medal of Freedom, and they're both the highest awards. One civilian, one is military. I always say getting the Presidential Medal of Freedom is much less painful because when I read them off, I'll read like with James or with so many of the Congressional Medal of Honors, many are not living, to be honest with you. And I'll read stories where one of them recently going up a hill, hit 19 times by gunfire, grabbing four people, bringing them down, getting onto a helicopter, falling out of the helicopter, hitting a tree on the way down. Hitting a tree. They went back and saved him, but he died later. I mean, those are tough deals. Those are tough deals. We have one right here who's living. We have one right here who's living. But they are tough. So thank you very much for being here. And maybe I could ask our governor, our great governor of this incredible state, to say a few words. Please, Henry. Thank you very much. And where's Alan? Is your son here? You're great son, Attorney General? Alan, thank you very much. Take good care of him, okay? Thank you. Thank you, Alan. And thanks to Republicans all over America. We are now working on things that nobody ever thought possible. Since my election, over 121,000 new jobs have been created right here in South Carolina. We've lifted 10 million people off welfare, including 7 million off of food stamps. And that's a good thing, not a bad thing. They're working and they have great jobs and they love getting up in the morning and they're making much more money and it costs our country nothing. We make money, they pay taxes. It's a whole different deal. Median household income has reached the highest level in the history of our country. The unemployment rate nationwide has hit the lowest rate in over 50 years. The average unemployment rate from my administration is the lowest for any US president in recorded history. How about that one? It's a good one. That's a good one. The unemployment rate among African-Americans, Hispanic Americans and Asian Americans has reached record lows. Black youth unemployment has reached an all time low. Black poverty levels are the lowest ever recorded in the history of our country.  Paid family leave. Reducing the cost of childcare and giving 40 million American families an average of $2,200 more in their pocket thanks to the Republican Child Tax Credit. Republican, not Democrat. We are reversing decades of calamitous trade policies that decimated manufacturing all across your state and all across our country. For years, politicians sold you out to global special interests, enriching other countries at your expense. That ended. That ended. But I am not the president of the globe. I don't want to be the president of the world. I am the president of the United States of America.  reciprocal. Reciprocal. Got to be fair. After years of building up other countries, we are finally rebuilding our country. We are finally putting America first. On no issue of Washington Democrats more thoroughly sold out the American people than the issue of immigration. Every Democrat running for president supports free federal welfare for illegal aliens funded by you, the American taxpayer. They want to treat illegal aliens, people that come into our country illegally, better than they want to treat our military and our veterans. Not only does illegal immigration drain our treasury, but it threatens innocent lives. I recently invited to the White House the granddaughter of a 92 year old woman who was raped, beaten, brutalized, and murdered by an illegal alien who had previously been set free in New York City. Here in Charleston County, an illegal alien was recently charged with sexually assaulting a young girl in the fourth grade. In Berkeley County, officers captured a previously deported MS-13 gang member who shot a man to death before dousing the body in gasoline and setting him on fire. And he should have never been in our country. He shouldn't have been allowed. It's being built. It's being built. By the way, just in case you haven't heard, it is being built. That, you know. And they're going to go nuts. They're going to go nuts. They thought they got me. They said, "Okay." Have you heard them recently? "Okay. He's building the wall." And you think it's easy getting that kind of money to build a wall when I have a whole party and a deep State and some never-Trumpers? They're a dying breed though. The good thing, they're on respirator. They're on respirator. They're on mouth to mouth resuscitation. You can do it. I'm not doing it. They're on mouth to mouth resuscitation, the never-Trumpers. But you think it's easy. It's not. But that's been built. But you know what they say now. "Okay. He's building the wall, but Mexico's not paying for it." Yes they are, actually. They are. They are. They are paying for it. And some of the fake news knows that, but they refuse to report it, but that's okay. You'll see. You'll see what's going on. And I want to thank Mexico because, by the way, right now they have 27,000 soldiers on our border protecting our border. We have Mexico protecting our border. And they only do that for Trump. They don't do that for sleepy Joe. They don't do that for crazy Bernie. And they don't do it for mini Mike, that's for sure. They're only doing that for Trump, right? 27,000 soldiers protecting our border. In this region … … thousand soldiers protecting our border. In this region of the country alone last year, ICE … They've been treated so badly, right? They are great. They're brave. They're tough. Any men? There are tough guys in here, but anybody want to be an ICE officer? It's tough stuff, right? They go into those nests. They call them nest. That's where these guys get together and they knock the hell. I mean, if they have to … I have to be very careful. I don't want to get them in trouble, because the press wants us to be very politically correct. So let me change it around. They go into a nest of MS13, and they say, "Oh, hello gentlemen. How are you?" On occasion, they have a fight. They never lose those fights. We need people like that. "Hello gentleman. How are you? How many people did you kill last year? How many people did you get kill last year with a knife," because they like knives because it's more painful. This is the kind of people that we were letting into our country. ICE has taken them out of our country by the thousands. By the thousands. Last year, ICE officers arrested 12,000 criminal aliens charged or convicted of dangerous offenses, including robbery, rape and many for a thing called murder. On Wednesday we won the big case in federal court. Did you see that? Did you see that? We won the case unanimously. Unanimously. Federal appeals court, where we don't have to give money to sanctuary cities and States if they don't work with us, finally. Finally. Finally. Why should we? Yet the Democrat candidates oppose all detention of illegal aliens. They want unfettered catch and release. We have ended that program. It was not easy. We have to go through courts. Everything is a court. Everything is a suit. We do anything. We turn to the right, they sue us. We turn to the left, they sue us. We win. But we're winning. We have 218 judges now. It's good. Let me just preface that by saying I know they give fair opinions. It bears no relationship to who appoints them, but I never win with an Obama appointed judge ever. I don't win. No, we have great judges going onto the courts. Great judges. They're fair judges. They're judges that truly love our constitution. It's great. They're judges that if we feel it's right, they don't want to invite the world to trespass across our borders. Very simple. The democrat field also supports deadly sanctuary cities that release violet criminal aliens. You know that. You've been reading. All you have to do is pick up a paper every day. They release these horrible criminals to terrorize our communities. We don't do that anymore. We won't let it happen, and now we don't have to give sanctuary cities and states the money that they're going to want. It's a whole game changer.  "I don't think he's doing a good job." This guy doesn't know he's alive. Oh, what bad people. Republicans believe America should be a sanctuary for law abiding Americans, not for criminal aliens. Thanks to our tireless efforts to secure the border, we have reduced illegal border crossings by a staggering 75% since last spring, and we have ended catch and release permanently. You know what catching release is? We catch them, we grab them. We say, "Could we please have your address?" "Address? I don't know what the hell is an address?" They don't have an address. "Could we have a number? Do you have a phone? Could we call your mother or your father and say in four years you have to come to court." What they do is they catch him, they get some information that the guy has no idea where he lives, and it's one of those things in many cases, and then release. We release him into our country. We don't do that anymore. If you knew what it took … We catch them, and we take some information and we release them in, and we say, "Please report back in four years from now for your trial." About 2% come back, and they're the ones that are the dumbest people I've ever seen. 2%. Nobody comes back. It's crazy, but we're getting a change. It would be so easy. They call it loopholes. Loopholes. That word alone, they call it loopholes. It would be so easy if we had some democrat support. We don't have any Democrat support. They want open borders. They don't care about crime. Border Patrol has seized the largest amount of deadly narcotics ever in the history of our country this last year. We have deported record numbers of gang members. We are building the wall faster than ever, and we will soon be rebuilding more than one mile a day. Washington democrats have never been more extreme. 132 congressional democrats have signed up for Bernie Sanders' healthcare takeover. They want to take away your healthcare. While the Washington Democrats are trying to destroy your healthcare and to destroy your social security. That's what's going to happen. My administration is protecting your social security, your Medicare, and is fighting to give you great healthcare. We are defending your right to keep the doctor and to keep your plan of choice. Remember when President Obama would say, "You can keep your doctor. You could keep your plan." 28 times. He said, "You can keep your doctor and you can keep your plan." Well, he lied. We should impeach him. We should impeach him for that. He lied 28 times. "You'll keep your doctor, keep your plan. It's wonderful. Great." Went through the roof. We're doing a great job. We killed the individual mandate, which is the most unbelievable, horrible. It's not really Obamacare anymore, but we're running the hulk of it and we're trying to kill it entirely, and then we will put it back. You'll have great health care, and preexisting conditions will be totally protected. Preexisting conditions will be totally protected. We're making healthcare better and much cheaper. While premiums more than doubled in the five years before I took office, we are now offering plans already that are up to 60% less expensive than the old Obamacare. Think of that and better. And better. We are stopping surprise medical billing, a disgrace. I signed an executive order imposing price transparency, because when providers are required to show their prices, which they don't have to do, but now they do, those same prices fall very, very fast. We have approved a record number of affordable new generic drugs, which are just as good as the name brand drugs, but at a tiny fraction of the cost. They're just as good. I always like a name brand. I mean, there's something. There's no difference. Probably sometimes they're better. We've totally transformed veteran's healthcare, getting long ought VA choice and VA accountability passed after 50 years.  the spectacular right to try. You know what that is? If you're terminally ill, you go all over the world. If you have no money, you can't. You go home and you die. You're terminally ill. They go all over the world. If they have money, they go to Asia, they go to Europe. They're searching. We have the greatest doctors in the world, the greatest labs in the world, greatest technicians in the world, and we have pipelines of drugs coming out for different problems. Now, you sign a piece of paper. We're not going to hold anybody liable. You get to use that drug, and the results have been unbelievable. Unbelievable. Hopefully you don't need it, but now we have right to try. They've been trying for 51 years to get that approved. 51 years, and we got it approved. I guess I'm good at getting things approved, aren't I? Those people that I brought up here where the reason too, every one of them. They were incredible. Thank you. Thank you. Senators, Congressman, they were the reasons. We are combating the opioid epidemic. Drug overdose deaths have declined for the first time in nearly 32 years. We have launched new initiatives combating kidney disease, which is a big deal. Kidney disease is so tough that people die literally because it's so much work. They die from overwork. It's just crazy. In theory, they could keep them going for a long time, but the work and the dialysis and all of the things they have to do. We've done things that make it so much easier, and it's just such an honor to be involved. Also, Alzheimer's disease, we're really making strides. It's really a great thing. Great thing. we're pursuing new advances in neonatal research to care for America's youngest patients and breaking all records in so doing. Virtually every Democrat candidate has declared their unlimited support for extreme late term abortion, ripping babies straight from the mother's womb right up until the very moment of birth. That is why I've asked Congress to prohibit late term abortion of babies, because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift of God. The Democrat Party is the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late term abortion, socialism, blatant corruption, and the total obliteration of your second amendment. The Republican Party is the party of the American worker, the American family, the American dream, and of course the late, great Abraham Lincoln. Republicans are fighting for citizens from every background, every community, and every walk of life. We are the party of boundless optimism, excitement, energy and enthusiasm. We are a big tent. We are a big party. We are the party of big ideas for the future. This is where it is. This is where it is. this is not the old Republican Party. This is a very inclusive party. This is a great party. Republicans are proudly fighting for nationwide school choice, including right here in South Carolina. We want to give school choice to every child in America who needs it, from kindergarten to 12th grade, because no parent should ever be forced to send their child to a failing government school. I passed criminal justice reform to give former prisoners a second chance at life. That's a big deal. This could not have been done by anyone but the Republican Party. They came to me, a group of people, and they wanted criminal justice reform. I wasn't sure about the issue, but we had a lot of great Republicans, very much in favor of it, including people that happen to be right here today. They were very much, and I started studying the issue, worked hard on the issue, and criminal justice reform. You saw Alice Johnson come out of prison. 22 years. She had another 20 years left. Think of it. For a phone call. For a phone call. A great woman, but we have many people coming out that shouldn't be there for anywhere near those terms. Not for those terms. But they came to see me, a group. A group of people came. Van Jones, he came up. "Oh, thank you, sir." They needed four senators. They needed help. I called Lindsey, I called everybody. I called Tim, who's so great on everything. I called everybody. They needed four senators and maybe five, and they needed help with some of the ones that weren't moving in the right direction. I gave it to them, and I got it, and it was not easy. We get criminal justice reform, and then I signed it. Then this Van Jones has a program that gets no ratings absolutely at all. They say, "Van Jones wants to thank everybody for criminal justice reform." I called our great first lady over. I said, "Darling, please take a look. It's going to be so nice, because honestly, look, they couldn't have done even close without me." I got all these people together, got them done. It was impossible. Previous presidents couldn't even think about it. They couldn't even think about doing it, and they tried, although I don't think they tried too hard, bur they could have never done it. So he gets up, and he starts by saying, "I want to thank the Reverend Al Sharpton. I knew Al when he was very heavy. He looked better when he was heavy. It's true. He's one of the few people, he really looked better when he was heavy. He looked much better when he was heavy. I've got to tell him. I have to explain, because I know him very well. He would admit that he has a lot of respect for your president, but he can't admit it on television." But he called and he said, "I want to take the Reverend Al Sharpton," and then name after name after name of people that I never heard of. My wife said, "Are they going to think about you, right? Are they going to think about you?" I said, "Darling, of course." I said, "He's saving me til the end, because I was by far." It's true. This is true, Tim. Lindsay, this is true. I said, "He's saving me til the end. It's going to be such an honor to be recognized, because I don't get enough publicity. I need a little bit more." He got to the end and he didn't say it, and she looked at me. She sort of smiled. I think she loved it in a certain way. But she sort of smiled. She said, "That's too bad." I said, "Yeah, it is." Then he said, "I have one more thing to say. We must get out this year and fight and vote against this President of the United States." Can you believe that? It's true? It's a true story. Van Jones. These are just terrible that they could … I was a little embarrassed in front of our great first lady, but I'll live through it somehow. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. We recognized Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. 52 years. 52 years that Golan Heights had been fighting and fighting for it. I did it, and I did the true capital, Jerusalem, right? How many presidents promise that? Every president for many, many decades promised we're going to do that. They never did it. I did it. We did a lot. We've invested more than $2 trillion in the United States military, including more than $150 million this year in Joint Base Charleston, Fort Jackson, and Paris Island. We created the sixth branch of the American Armed Forces, the Space Force. We have another branch. 72 years. Not for 72 years, the Air Force, have they done a new branch. We did the Space Force. When I first said it, everybody thought I was joking. I said, "I'm not joking." They thought it was from the comic strips or the future movies. I said, "No, it's all about space." In a number of years, people are going to say, "I can't believe we didn't do this sooner." We need a little vision. We need a little foresight. You know what? I mentioned Space Force. At arenas like this, it gets one of the biggest hands, because that's where it's at. That's where it's going, unfortunately, or fortunately. We needed it for defense. We needed it for offense. Sixth branch. 72 years. For years, we watched as your politicians apologize for America. Now you have a president who is standing up for America, and we are standing up for the people of South Carolina. At stake in our present battle is the actual survival of our nation. I really believe that it's the survival. You see these maniacs that we're dealing with. They want to give away everything. We will end up being Venezuela large scale version. If you want your children to inherit the blessings that generations of Americans have fought and died for, to secure, then we must devote everything we have towards a victory in November of 2020, November 3rd to be exact. Only this way can we save the America we love and drain the swamp. I never thought it was this deep. Man. I talked about a swamp. You never told me it was this bad, fellas. That swamp is bad. You got dirty cops at the top of the FBI. You got a lot of dirty people, but you also have phenomenal people in the FBI and other places, but we're draining that swamp. I never knew it was going to be this dirty, and we're getting a lot of help from a lot of great people. With your help, we will lift millions more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence, and from poverty to prosperity. That's what's happening. Think of it. From poverty to prosperity. Look at some of the stories that you have over there. Look at some of the incredible stories. Look at Tim Scott. Look at that incredible story. No, really. It's an incredible story. Lindsay will say it. I give about 99% of the credit to Tim Scott's mother. I do. I guarantee you, Tim, there was no games, right? There was no games in your household. It was let's go to work, right? Great mother. Thank you very much. Thank you. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a fair, safe, sane, and lawful system finally of immigration. We will continue to enact new trade deals that result in more products proudly stamped with beautiful phrase, "Made in the USA." We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine, finding new cures for childhood cancer, infectious diseases like we're working on right now, and ending the AIDS epidemic. Nobody thought this was possible in less now than nine years, and it should have been started before. We will end the AIDS epidemic. Who would have thought we could have done that? We will land the first woman on the moon and become the first nation in the world to plant our flag on Mars. You have to land on moon, and then you go to Mars. We will defend privacy, free speech, religious liberty, and the right to keep and bear arms. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the sacred values that bind us together as one America. We support, protect and defend the constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government and bureaucracy, are the true American way. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag, and we live by the words of our national motto, "In God we trust." From Greenville to Columbia and from Myrtle Beach to Hilton Head to right here in Charleston, this state is home to some of the toughest men and strongest women ever to walk on the face of the earth. It's true. It's true. True. We stand on the shoulders of American Patriots who have crossed the oceans, blazed the trails, settled the continent, tamed the wilderness, dug out the Panama Canal, lay down the railroads, revolutionized industry, liberated millions from poverty, hunger and disease, won two world wars, defeated fascism and communism and made America the single greatest nation in the history of the world, and we are making it greater every single day. Proud citizens like you helped build this country, and together we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people. With your help, your devotion and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we are going to keep on fighting, and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. You have the best year ever on record, right? Southeast, best year you've ever had, right? You have a great governor, you have two senators, great congressman, the greatest year you've ever had, but some people in South Carolina are getting a little tired, I'm surprised to hear this, of winning. I've very surprised to hear this. Some actually called in two great senators into a big meeting, a town hall, and they said, "Senator Scott, Senator Lindsay Graham, we're tired of winning and South Carolina. Can't do it anymore. It's too much. It's too much. We've had years where we weren't winning, and it was okay. We couldn't get jobs. We took it easy, but we just want you to go and see your friend, the president, and we want you to represent us. We want you to say, ‘Mr. President, South Carolina is tired of winning. We don't want to win anymore. We are tired, sick, tired of winning.'" They're going to come in and say, "Sir, I hate to tell you, but the people of South Carolina don't want to win anymore." I'll say, "Mr. Senators, let me tell you something. South Carolina does want to win. They want to win more than anybody, and we're not going to change a thing, because we're winning like never before. You know what? We're going to keep it that way. Sorry, senators. Go back to South Carolina, senators." Go back to South Carolina, because we are one movement, one people, one family, and one glorious nation under God. America is thriving like never before, and ladies and gentlemen of South Carolina, the best is yet to come. The best is yet to come. The best is yet to come, because together we will make America wealthy again, we will make America strong again, we will make America proud again, we will make America safe again, and we will make America great again. Thank you, South Carolina. Thank you.I want to thank you very much. North Carolina, thank you very much. I'm thrilled to back in the great city of Charlotte, where, by the way, we're having our convention. I guess you heard that, right? With thousands of hardworking American patriots who love our country, cherish our values, respect our laws and always put America first. Eight months from now, we're going to defeat the radical socialists. We're going to win the great state of North Carolina in a landslide. We won it last time, we're going to win it this time by even more. And you know, Eric and Lara named their daughter, you know what her name is? Carolina, Carolina. Her name is Carolina for a reason. This is an incredible time for our nation. Our country is stronger than ever before. And today, we just had the largest one day increase in the stock market in history. That's great. That's great. That was great. You know, our opponents were saying, " Oh, maybe he's in trouble, maybe the economy … " They'll do anything. They'll do anything. I'm sure they were thrilled. Do you think our opponents were thrilled when they saw the stock market today? I don't think so. By the way, look at this. Look back there, look at all of that press. Look at all them. Man, I don't know if Sleepy Joe, or Bernie, I don't think they have that much press. Bernie was going wild. Why would I be here tonight? Why would I be here? He said why would I be here tonight? We don't have the primary, we've already won the thing, you know? I was going to say the you know what thing, I held it back, because they'll say, "Horrible language. He used horrible language today." But we're doing fantastically. There's never been a time where the Republican Party was so unified as it is now. Never, never. And you hear about enthusiasm for crazy Bernie, and that's true, he does have some enthusiasm, but much less than we have and a much smaller group of people, too. And there's not a lot of enthusiasm for Biden. I thought he gave up the presidency the other day because he said he's running for the Senate. I looked at the First Lady, I said, " Hey, he's running for the Senate." And today he just said Super Thursday, he's looking forward to Super Thursday. Jobs are booming in our country, incomes are soaring, poverty has plummeted, confidence is surging, and we have completely rebuilt the awesome power of a thing called the United States military. Every day, for me and for you, it's promises made, promises kept. One of the most important promises I made is right to this era. You know, we look at it, it's the never ending wars in the Middle East. We're taking our soldiers, we're bringing them back home. We're not law enforcement. We're bringing them back home. American troops cannot be the policemen for the world, or to create democracy in other nations that frankly probably don't want it. The job of the American military is to secure and defend our country. Two days ago, the Unites States signed a deal with the Taliban so that after 19 years of conflict, and very close to 20, we can finally begin to bring our amazing troops back home. After years of rebuilding foreign nations, we are finally rebuilding our nation and taking care of our own American citizens And all of the things that we've done, we've wiped out the terrorists, we've done so much, and you know what? We're 8,000 miles away. You got a lot of big countries surrounding Afghanistan, you've got Afghanistan itself. The progress that was made, was made possible by the extraordinary valor of our men and our women in uniform. You know that. We pay a special tribute, and I know you pay it, a special tribute to our great wounded warriors and those who made the ultimate sacrifice. As we bring back our troops, we are committed to ensuring that foreign terrorists are denied admission to America in the first place. They're not coming here, and if they do, bad things happen to them. We must keep radical Islamic terrorists the hell out of our country. By the way, I have to say this, you know you have thousands and thousands of people outside. Somebody was saying that if Pocahontas, any one of them, Sleepy Joe, he doesn't have that, so he doesn't have a lot, he has very small crowds, but if Sleepy Joe or if any of them had a crowd one-tenth this size, they go around talking about how big the crowd. They never say that. Hey, take your cameras and spin them around this big arena. Right now. Spin them around. No fun to be a protestor at a Trump rally, but do we have a great time at a Trump rally? My administration has also taken the most aggressive action in modern history to protect Americans from the Coronavirus. You know about this whole thing? Horrible. Including, sweeping travel restrictions. Today, we met with the big great pharmaceutical companies, and they're really working hard, and they're working smart, and we had a great meeting today with a lot of the great companies. They're going to have vaccines I think relatively soon. And they're going to have something that makes you better, and that's going to actually take place we think even sooner. So a lot of good things are happening, but we have strong borders, and really, our tough and early actions have really been proven to be 100% right. We went out, we're doing everything in our power to keep the sick and infected people from coming into our country. We're working on that very hard. We closed our borders very early. I took a lot of heat for that. Remember when I closed the borders to certain areas of the world? I took a lot of heat. But there are fringe globalists who would rather keep our borders open than keep our infection, think of it, keep all of the infection, let it come in. And we're working with other countries. In all fairness, look, it's a problem, we're working with other countries. Remember this, over the last long period of time, the flu, the common flu, you know this, right? From 27,000 to 70,000 people get infected, and many people die. Think of it, 27,000. You lose 27,000 people to the common flu. It can be much more. One year was much higher than the 70,000 number. Those people died. So when you lose 27,000 people a year, nobody knew that. I didn't know that. Three, four weeks ago, I was sitting there, I said, "What do we lose with the regular flu?" They said, "About 27,000 minimum, goes up to 70, sometimes even 80, one year it went up to 100,000 people." I said, "Nobody told me that. Nobody knows that." Last year was approximately 36,000 people died. So we're working hard on it, and we're going to come up with some really great solutions. In the meantime, we're stopping … Only in North Carolina. Only in North Carolina. It can only be. How many people here are from South Carolina, by the way? All right, we love both places. But that was from North Carolina. But just to finish up, so we've made a lot of progress, we've really done a great job with it. We're keeping our borders strong. My job is to protect the health of American patients and Americans first, and that's what I'll do. Washington Democrats are trying to politicize the coronavirus, denigrating the noble work of our public health professionals. But honestly, not so much anymore. Everyone appreciates, these are the greatest professionals in the world at what they do. We're actually helping a lot of other countries where they have some very, very big problems. So we have our professionals in constant touch, I'm in constant touch with some of the leaders and helping them out. But the political attacks from some of the Democrats really must stop. We've got to all work together on this one to safeguard our people. We're going to safeguard our people, the United States. The United States is, right now, ranked by far number one in the world for preparedness. Earlier today, when I met with the pharmaceutical companies, things were discussed and learned honestly. The media didn't know. Nobody knew. They've never heard this before. And we learned a lot, and maybe that had the impact on the stock market. Who knows what happened, but we're going to reduce and the severity of what's happening, the duration of the virus. We discussed all of these things. We will bring these therapies to market as rapidly as possible. And I have to say, with a thriving economy the way it is, and the most advanced health system on earth, America is so resilient, we know what we're doing, we have the greatest people on earth, the greatest health system on earth. We have the greatest health system on earth. The renewal of American strength over the last three years means at times of challenge, we are the best prepared to rise to any occasion. No country is better equipped than America to handle new threats, and no people are more skilled, talented, tough, or driven than Americans. And together, we are in the midst of the great American comeback. That's what it is. Last month, we added 225,000 new jobs in January alone. That makes seven million jobs since the election. We have destroyed the ISIS territorial caliphate, and we killed the founder and leader of ISIS, al-Baghdadi. He is dead. And we took out the world's top terrorist, Qasem Soleimani, ending his evil reign on terror forever, Soleimani. While the extreme left has been wasting time with vile hoaxes and delusional witch hunts, we have been killing terrorists, creating jobs, raising wages, and lifting up American citizens of every race, religion, color, and creed. Tomorrow, voters in states across the nation will head to the polls for Super Tuesday, not Super Thursday. No, he said, "Super Thursday." You can't do these things. Can you imagine if I said Super Thursday? It would be over, right? I would be over. No matter how good you are at certain things, you can't, as an example, a name like Sleepy Joe, he's constantly naming the wrong state. "It's great to be in the state of Ohio." No, no, no, I'm sorry, you're in North Carolina. No, no. Joe! Do you ever see them run up with a sign, "No, no, North Carolina, Joe!" Once that happens, you might as well leave the states, because it's a disaster no matter how good you're doing. We're in North Carolina! It's great to be in Idaho! No, you're in Iowa. Nah, he makes a lot of those mistakes, they're a little scary? We're going to protect your second amendment, you understand that. But did you see, Sleepy Joe, did you see Sleepy Joe, where he said, "Last year, 150 million people were killed by guns in our country." 150 million! That means 50% of our country. That's a big story. 150. Can you imagine Trump saying that? These people would never let me live it down. We can't make even a little mistake. We can't make even a little, tiny, tiny mistake. If we make a tiny mistake, it's headlining. They say things like 150 million people killed, guns, they say Super Thursday, they say Georgia, he's looking forward to winning Georgia tomorrow. Georgia's not in Super Tuesday! So many mistakes! You can't do that when you're negotiating with China. Can't do that when you're negotiating with these countries, can you? Those mistakes would be very tremendous. Then you have Mini Mike. You see this guy? Can you believe it? Mini Mike. He's being interviewed tonight on Fox. Can you believe it? Fox. They want to be politically correct. They want to interview, they end up interviewing more Democrats than Republic … I don't know what's going on with Fox. But they're interviewing this guy the night before … Mini Mike, ay, ay, ay, what a mess he is. The worst debate performance in the history of presidential debate history. The worst in history. Nah, I got to have more. I'd get down real low, but I don't want to copy him. Everybody saw it. Everyone said, "Oh," they all say, "Oh! Do that again where you get down low." But if I do that again, it's a copy. It's a copy! No, no. No. You never like to copy, even though you're copying yourself. You don't like to copy. You do it once. It was a big hit. But you do it once, and you sort of say, "That was nice, don't do it again," because if it doesn't work the second time, it gets embarrassing, right? Right? We all know. But no, he's a disaster waiting to happen. He's a mess. No matter which Democrat candidate you're talking about, and you understand that, any one of these candidates … And you see what's happening, right? It's being rigged against … It's sad. It's being rigged against Crazy Bernie. Crazy Bernie is going to go crazy. Crazy. I think Crazy Bernie is going to be more crazy when they see what they're doing. I called it a long time ago. Mayor Pete Buttigieg, Buttigieg, May Pete, he quit. Out last night. Then I hear a Senator from a state we're going to win, we're going to win that state, but she dropped out. Sounds like they made a deal. They both supported Sleepy Joe. You know why? They made a deal. You know why? Quid pro quo, that's why. Don't care. Quid pro quo. Quid pro quo, they made a deal. Impeach them! They should be impeached! They should be impeached! Quid pro quo. But they've embraced an extreme left wing agenda. Their plans would massively raise your taxes, destroy our liberty, muzzle our faith, and erase our sovereignty. You know that. The Democrat Party has gone crazy. Whether it's Bernie Sanders plan to eliminate private healthcare, Elizabeth Pocahontas's plan … By the way, she's history. She's history. I came up with that name far too early, I should've just waited. But it didn't matter. I thought she was making a come back. I said, "Wow, I just did it to her." But you know those embers were burning a little bit a couple of months ago? They never caught on. In fact, she'll probably lose the State of Massachusetts to Bernie. So she doesn't know what to do because you're not supposed to lose the State of Massachusetts if you get in there. She's the Senator. She's the Senator for Massachusetts, I think she's going to lose it to Bernie. And Miss Michigan, you see what's going on over there? Michigan, we're leading. We're leading in Wisconsin. We're leading in Florida. We're leading in the last election. Hey, how great was the 2016 election? One of the greatest nights, one of the most highest rated television nights in the history of television. And remember, there was oh, this is going to be a quick one. This is going to be… oh, that wasn't so easy for them. I love the scene. The scene of that convention center where Hillary was getting ready to speak, and then she found out she lost. But Elizabeth Warren's here to plan to eliminate our borders, or Mini Mike's plan to eliminate your second amendment. Mike Bloomberg wants to eliminate your second amendment. Don't worry about it, it's not going to happen. Not going to happen for him. For sleepy Joe, he doesn't even know where he is, what he's doing, or what office he's running for. Actually, I honestly don't think he knows what office he's running for. And it doesn't matter. Maybe he gets in, because he's a little more moderate. So maybe he gets in. But he's not going to be running it. Other people are going to. They're going to put him into a home, and other people are going to be running the country. But they're going to be super left radical crazies. They're going to be super left radical crazies, Joe's going to be in a home. He'll be watching television. Everything will be just fine. The insanity of Washington Democrats is why millions of registered Democrat voters are joining our movement. They are joining our great Republican party. We have the enthusiasm in our party. No, I really mean it. I constantly hear about the enthusiasm. They're fighting each other, they hate each other, they don't know what's going on. We have all the love, we have all the enthusiasm, and we know what we're doing. We know what we're doing. So we're thrilled to be joined tonight by many really great, terrific, brilliant, wonderful warriors. Even though he comes from a slightly different state, but not to far by, is somebody that really has distinguished himself, he's become a great friend of mine. What he did for Justice Kavanaugh, do you remember that? One of the greatest statements ever made in the United State's Senate, Senator Lindsey Graham. Come on up, Lindsey. Lindsey Graham, come on up, Lindsey. Come here, Lindsey. I got to have him say something, come here, Lindsey, great guy. They handle pressure so well. They came and we gave a rally that was like this and Dan Bishop and Gregg Murphy won by so much, it wasn't even close. They're great people, and they've done a fantastic job. Thank you very much. They handle pressure. They were under a lot of pressure, they handled it well. It's nice to know people can handle pressure, there aren't too many of them. North Carolina Republican party chairman Michael Whatley. Thank you, Michael. I have a few great friends of mine and they love North Carolina. Louis DeJoy, who you know, Louis DeJoy. Two great people, diamond and silk. Right? Diamond and silk. We love them. You know the first lady, a long time ago now, right? How long is that? Probably almost almost five years ago, she said, "There are these two women on the internet, they're unbelievable. They're unbelievable." I said, "Oh, I know, I hear that all the time. I hear it all the time." She said, the next day she came again. She said, "I saw them again, they're unbelievable." I said, "Let me see." I saw them, I fell in love with it, and everybody fell in love with Diamond and Silk. So thank you. Some people that have really been helpful to me, Corey Lewandowski, David Bussey, and Pam Bondi, right here. Thanks also to all of the people who are working to make the 2020 Republican National Convention right here in Charlotte an outstanding success, RNC chairman Ronna McDaniel, RNC co chairman Tommy Hicks, and Convention president Marcia Lee Kelly, thank you all. You're doing a great job, I'll tell you they're looking, they're going to spend a lot of money and doing a good job. Should we doing a great job, but just an okay job? It doesn't matter as long as you win. You know what I gave when we won last time, somebody else took them to convention center, spent a fortune and I just took a hotel ballroom. I said, "What the heck, if I win, nobody cares, if I don't." Look if you win, nobody cares what room you're in. If you lose, nobody cares what room you're in. So we took a ballroom, nice ballroom, that's it, no big deal. I think it this way, if we win, nobody cares. And if we lose, I'm out of there, I save a hell of a lot of money. Every place that we've gone, it's been amazing. I'd also like to recognize, so important, a woman who's really helped us win North Carolina in 2016, I have a feeling this year, she'll even do better, because she happened to grow up here, Lara Trump and my son Eric Trump. Two great people. I mean I have to say that about my son, but I know a lot of people don't like their sons that much, but Lara has been fantastic, and thank you very much, what a job. She knows this state better than anybody in this room except maybe this guy right here. How are we doing, Lara? How are we doing? How are we doing in the state, are we doing good? And we're doing well in Pennsylvania I hear, and South Carolina, I know we're doing great there. Also with us tonight, is a man who's really become a good friend of mine. We were going at it a little bit at the beginning, but I will tell you, and I would say if I didn't get along, I would not be here. I wouldn't do this. I think he's been tremendous. He's been a tremendous supporter and things that we've wanted to do, and fights that we've had which were so important, he's been right up, and Lizzie will tell you that he's been right up in front and really he deserves another six year term. Probably a lot longer than that, but he's going to come up and I'm going to ask Senator Thom Tillis, come on up. Thom has really been incredible, he's been working everyday. And he really wants to fight to the radical left and he does it and he knows how to fight, and take care of our amazing veterans, and stop illegal immigration. Thom is the champion for the people of North Carolina. This November, we need everybody to go and vote for Thom, he's doing great. He's doing great. I hear he's way up in the polls, he's way up in the polls. Thom, say a few words. "Get me off this stage. Get me off. You guys didn't tell me this was going to happen." No, that was great Thom. We're also honored to be joined tonight by a true American hero, a veteran of World War II and the Korean War who just turned 100 years old. His name is George Washington Perry, legit. George, thank you very much for being here. Thank you, George. 100 years. He's 100 and he looks good. Thank you, George. With the help of everyone here tonight, America has now become the hottest economy anywhere on the planet earth. Since my election over 219,000 new jobs have been created right here in North Carolina. We have lifted 10,000,000 people off of welfare, including 7,000,000 people off of food stamps. Median household income has reached the highest level ever recorded, think of that. The average unemployment rate from my administration is the lowest for any US president in recorded history, that's happening, that's happening. The unemployment rate among African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Asian Americans has reached the lowest level in recorded history. Very important to me, African American youth unemployment has reached an all time low. African American poverty is that the lowest rate ever recorded. For decades democratic politicians betrayed, and they truly did, they betrayed African Americans. My administration is delivering for African Americans like never before. No president has done more for our black community, no president has done more for our black community, and it's an honor to do it. Last month here in Charlotte, we launched a nationwide campaign to create a better future for all Americans. It's called Opportunity Now, you know about it. We're also fighting to ensure that working families have access to paid family leave, reducing the cost of childcare and giving 40,000,000 american families an average of $2,200 thanks to the Republican child tax credit. The Republicans are claiming that we did that nobody else did, but the Democrats are saying, "How did they do that one?". The USMCA is a giant for North Carolina's incredible farmers and factory workers. And by the way, speaking of farms, factory workers, and small businesses, are all for the death tax. You know about the death tax, right? It's called the inheritance tax. You have a small farm some place, you have a small business, you have a nice business, you no longer have an inheritance tax or a death tax. So if you want to leave it to your children, you can leave it to your children, there's no tax to be paid by your children. So they don't have to go back to the evil banker, borrow money from the banker, lose the farm, lose the business, it won't happen. And I always say, I know a lot of parents that don't love the children very much. Is there anybody in this room that does not love your children? Please raise your hand. Please raise your hand. Nobody. Nobody, that's because we're North Carolina, you love your children. But if you don't, then it doesn't matter because if you don't love your children, don't leave them a damn thing, but you don't have the inheritance tax anymore, which is great. A lot of people don't even know that, but that's a big deal or no issue have Washington Democrats more thoroughly betraying the American people than on the issue of immigration sanctuary cities, which release dangerous criminals to terrorize your communities. Right here in North Carolina, believe it or not, the sanctuary county of Durham released an illegal alien criminal, who then receded to viciously murdered a young 19 year old woman last year, you know all about it. Killing her and dumping her body into the woods. Last year alone, sanctuary jurisdictions in North Carolina, how did that happen to North Carolina? Deliberately set free hundreds and hundreds of, and these are really dangerous criminal aliens, including those charged or convicted of burglary, gun crime, sexual assault, kidnapping, and even suffering they inflict on our people. We're building the wall. We're building the wall. We're building the wall. We're building the wall. Mexico's paying for the wall, by the way. We built 127 miles as of today, 127. Mexico is paying for the wall. The media is going to be thrilled when I explain that Mexico is paying for the wall because you know, now finally they said I've had obstruction like you wouldn't believe. The entire democratic party. I could get anything. I created Space Force. I could do anything. I could get. Lindsey and Thom Tillis knows. Mark knows this. All of them knows this. If I wanted 25 cents for the wall, they didn't want to get it. They didn't want to do it, but now we got it, and you think that's easy? Nobody else could have done this. We're building it. We're building our hearts away. We'll soon be building many, many miles a week, but we're up to over 125, I guess 127, 28 by now, of the super duper wall, super duper. I went to Border Patrol, I said, " What is your wish?" "Well, sir, we'd like it to be steel and concrete." They want it exactly what they have it, and the barriers up top, they want everything. It's called a no climb provisor, no climb provisor. I said, "What does the word provisor mean?" They didn't know. All it means is you're not able to climb over it. It is very tough. I don't know if you saw. In a part of the wall, a couple of weeks ago, they were climbing the wall, and the fire department had to come and take them down. That's what the no climb is. That's what the no climb is. It's a no climb. It's more money. It's a little more expensive. Thank you. Who is that? What a voice. Pavarotti. So, we're building the wall. It's going great. So, they said, "All right. He's building the wall, but Mexico's not paying for it." Yes, they are. You'll see. You'll see. You understand. Some of you understand because I told a few people last week, it got linked to the fake news media. If you want to end sanctuary cities in North Carolina and across America, then you have only one choice. You must vote Republican. You have to. You have to. We've added catch and release, one of the worst loopholes you've ever seen, catch and release. You catch them. You then say, "Where do you live?" They don't know because look, let's face it, they don't know. I understand that. It's not even to be laughed at. They don't know. "Where do you live?" I don't know. Mexico, maybe, Honduras, Guatemala, who knows? El Salvador. "Where do you live?" Like this guy, he's a Mexican. You're about as Mexican as I am. Look at this guy. He's as Mexican as I am. Look at that hat. Are you Mexican? Are you Mexican? No, you're not. Are you? He is. It's like Elizabeth Warren. She said she was an Indian. I said, "I have more Indian blood in me than you have, and I have none. She said, "Oh, this is terrible." So she went out and got a test and it turned out not so good for her. Right? 1024th, right? One thousandths, so I was right. I probably have more in me. What a phony she is. What a phony. Washington Democrats have never been more extreme. 132 Congressional Democrats have signed up for Bernie Sanders' healthcare takeover. While the Washington Democrats are trying to destroy your healthcare and your social security, and they are going to destroy your social security. Remember they used to say with me, "I'm going to end it the first day." Well, you know what, we're going to soon be four years and all I've done is make it stronger. You know that. My administration is protecting your social security, your Medicare, and is fighting to give you great healthcare. You're going to have great health. We are defending your right to keep the doctor and to keep the plan of your choice. Remember President Obama? You can keep your doctor. You can keep your plan. 28 times. They said, "Impeach him. You should impeach him." 28 times he lied. 28 times on record, "You can keep your doctor, you can keep your plan." Well, that's not true. It wasn't. Impeach him. We're making healthcare better and much cheaper while premiums more than doubled in the last five years before I took office. We are now offering plans that are up to 60% less expensive and they're better plans. We are protecting people with preexisting conditions and we always will, and we are trying terminate, in the Supreme Court of the United States, the worst healthcare in the world, and we are going to give you the best healthcare you've ever seen at a low price and again, protecting preexisting conditions. Protecting preexisting conditions. We're fighting to stop surprise medical billing. You know what that is? Surprise. You get all sorts of surprises. We have people that take a blood test in one place, it's $26, and in another place it's $2000. Same blood test, maybe the cheap one is better, who knows? Same blood test. It's wrong. Surprise medical building. Bombed. Out. Billing. I signed an executive order opposing price transparency that's going to be bigger than healthcare, because when providers are required to show their prices, those same prices fall very, very fast. Right? It's a big thing. It's a big thing. We've approved a record number of affordable new generic drugs, which are just as good as name brand drugs, but a fraction of the cost. We have given them, and there's a lot of political pressure not to do that, you can understand why. To care for our amazing veterans, we passed VA Choice and VA Accountability, and nobody said it could be done. So now, instead of waiting in line for days and days, and weeks and weeks to see a doctor, you go outside, you get a doctor, we pay the bill, you get all fixed up. What a great thing. It's called VA Choice. I got it done. They've been trying to pass it for almost 50 years and they haven't been able to. Those people over there were a great help. We have passed the spectacular Right to Try. You know what that is? Hopefully nobody in the room needs. Hopefully nobody in the room needs Right to Try. We are combating the opioid epidemic. Drug overdose deaths have declined for the first time in nearly 31 years. We've launched new initiatives combating kidney disease and Alzheimer's, and we're pursuing new advances in neonatal research to care for America's youngest patients, and breaking all records in so doing. Virtually every Democratic candidate has declared their unlimited support for extreme late term abortion, ripping babies straight from the mother's womb, right up until the very moment of birth. How about that? That is why I've asked Congress to prohibit late term abortion of babies, because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift of God. Then you have the Governor of Virginia. The baby is born. The baby is born and he says, "And then you go over and start talking to the mother as to whether or not you execute the baby." This is the Governor of Virginia. The Governor of Virginia. He's a beauty. You remember what he did? He wanted to dance like Michael Jackson and his wife stopped him. He got lucky. But the Governor of Virginia wanted to do that. The baby is born and then he goes over and talks to the mother. The doctor will now talk, and you'll make a decision as to whether or not the baby lives. Did you ever hear of anything like this? The Democratic party is the party of high taxes, high crime, unlimited regulations, open borders, late term abortion, socialism, blatant corruption, and the total obliteration of your second amendment. The Republican party is the party of the American worker, the American family, the American dream, and the late great Abraham Lincoln. So many people came up to me tonight and they want me to fight, and we're doing it for school choice, so that every child who needs it, gets it. No parent should ever be forced to send their child to a failing government school. I passed criminal justice reform to give former prisoners a second chance at life. Alice Johnson, do we love Alice Johnson? This could not have been done by anyone other than the Republican party. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. We recognized Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. Our historic investments in the United States military include $200 million to a place that nobody's heard of in this audience, I'm sure, Fort Bragg. $300 million for Marine Corps Air Station Cherry Point. More than $500 million for Marine Corps Air Station New River. Listen to this one. No Democrat's going to this. They don't even want to spend money on the military. They don't like the military. They're not going to spend money. $1.2 billion for Camp Lejeune. $1.2 billion. Do you think that a guy like sleepy Joe's going to put, he doesn't know what it means. I know what I means. We have to have a strong military. We have the strongest military we've ever had. When I came in, our military was in sad shape. It was depleted, but we've rebuilt it, $2.5 trillion dollars went into our military. 01] is the actual survival of an our nation itself. If you want your children to inherit the blessings of generations of Americans who fought and died to secure, and you know what they're securing, they are securing us, they're securing our freedom, then we must devote everything we have toward victory in November, November 3rd to be exact. Only this way can we save the America we love, and drain the Washington swamp, which is by the way, much more vicious, much dirtier, much deeper than I ever thought, but we are kicking ass. With your help, we will lift billions more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence, and poverty to prosperity. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a fair, safe, sane and lawful system of immigration, and we will continue with the great Thom Tillis. We will get Thom Tillis. Thom, I don't think anybody even wants to run against you, Thom, but we're going to reelect Thom Tillis. Is that right? We're going to reelect Thom Tillis. If we don't, I'm going to be so angry at you. I'll only come back here a few times a year. No, Thom is going to be great. Thom, I think you're in great shape. I think you're in great shape. One more hand for Thom Tillis, please. We don't even know who's running against him. Nobody wants the run. We will continue to enact new trade deals that result in more products proudly stamped with that beautiful, beautiful, beautiful phrase Made in the USA, right? Made in the USA. We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine, finding cures for childhood cancer and ending the AIDS epidemic in less than nine years. We've already started. Who would have thought? We will defend privacy, free speech, religious liberty and the right to keep and bear arms. Your second amendment rights are under siege. Believe me, they're under siege. We don't get in, you can forget your second amendment. That's what I think. I really believe it. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the sacred values that binds us together as one beautiful America. We support, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work, and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government and bureaucracy, are the true American way. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag. We live by the words of our national motto, In God We Trust. From Fayetteville to Wilmington, from Raleigh to Greensboro, from Asheville to Kitty Hawk, to right here in Charlotte, this state is the home to some of the toughest men and strongest women, and most incredible patriots ever to walk the face of the Earth. We stand on the shoulders of American heroes who crossed the ocean, blazed the trail, sailed the continent, tamed the wilderness, dug out the Panama Canal, laid down the railroads, revolutionized industry, won two world wars, defeated fascism, and communism, and made America the single greatest nation in the history of the world, and we are making it greater every single day. Proud citizens like you helped build this country, and together we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people, that's what's happening. With your help, your devotion, and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we are going to keep on fighting, and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. We are one movement, one people, one family, and one glorious nation under God. America is thriving like never before, and ladies and gentlemen of North Carolina, the best is yet to come. Because together, we have made America wealthy again. We have made America strong again. We have made America proud again. We have made America safe again, and we have made America great again. Thank you. Thank you, North Carolina. Thank you.Thank you all. Thank you very much. Thank you to Vice President Mike Pence, and hello Cincinnati. You know, I used to work in Cincinnati, a place called Swifton Village. You know what that is? Swifton Village? It was good and it worked out well, and it gives you confidence when things work out well at a young age, and look what happened to all of us, right? Look what happened. Look what happened. I was watching the so-called debate last night, and I also watched the night before that was long, long television. The Democrats spent more time attacking Barack Obama than they did attacking me practically. This morning, that's all the fake news was talking about. It's all they were talking about. That wasn't pretty. No, we're doing good. It's great to be back in the state that I love. I love this state. Very special. Very, very special, on the banks of the beautiful Ohio River with the hardworking patriots of the American heartland. Thank you, Ohio. We love you, Ohio. We've got thousands of people standing outside, and I asked the officials can we sneak some up along the aisles? Can they sit on the stairs? But I'll tell you what, this is some crowd, some turnout. We've sold tens of thousands of tickets. And, you know what the sale price is? We keep it nice and low. We keep it nice and low. But, there never has been a movement like this. This is a movement the likes of which they've never seen before, maybe anywhere, but certainly in this country. They've never seen anything like this before. You came from the mountains and the valleys and the rivers, and you came for … I mean, look, from wherever you came from. There were a lot of you. And, they showed up on election day. I'll never forget, a wonderful congressman from Tennessee. They have early voting, and one of the earliest places, great state, Tennessee, and he was in Pennsylvania with me, great state. And he said, "You know, sir, I've been doing this for a long time, but I've never seen people like this show up for early voting. People that haven't voted in a long time because they didn't see anybody they wanted to vote for." He said, "I've never seen it. They have Trump banners, and Trump hats, and Trump buttons. I've never seen it." This great congressman said, "I don't know, sir, but I can tell you one thing. If the rest of the country is voting like Tennessee is voting, you're going to win by a lot." And, we won, and we won by a lot. We won by a lot. Our nation is stronger today than ever before. The number one economy on earth. No economy is so strong. We're rebuilding the awesome might of the United States military, and soon it will be stronger relatively speaking than at any time in our history, and when we took over, it was depleted. We took over a depleted military. It's not depleted anymore, I can tell you that. Our spirit is strong. Our stride is back and our stand is clear. We are finally putting America first. It's about time. We've created six million new jobs since election day. Nobody would've thought that was possible. More than seven million Americans have been lifted off of food stamps, and they're happy. They're happy. 123,000 more Ohio workers are employed today than when I was elected. Think of that number. And, right now, Ohio is the most successful it's ever been in the history of our country. Thank you. Congratulations, Ohio. Stand up, Mike. And, you have a good governor. I want to tell you that. Good job. Mike. Unemployment has reached the lowest rate in over half a century and unemployment for African-Americans, Hispanic-Americans and Asian-Americans have all reached the lowest rates ever recorded. While Republicans are working every day to build up our country, the rage-filled Democrat Party is trying to tear America apart. The Democrat Party is now being led by four left wing extremists who reject everything that we hold dear. No one has paid a higher price for the far left's destructive agenda than Americans living in our nation's inner cities. They have paid a dear price. Do you see what's happening? You see our inner cities, we spend billions and billions and billions for years and years and years, and it's stolen money and it's wasted money and it's a shame. For decades, these communities have been run exclusively by democratic politicians, and it's been total one party control of the inner cities. For a hundred years, it's been one party control and look at them. We can name one after another, but I won't do that because I don't want to be controversial. We want no controversy. No controversy. The democrat record is one of neglect and corruption and decay. Total decay. The Democrats have tax and regulated jobs and opportunity out of these cities and out of existence. They've squeezed the blood out of them. Left wing mayors and city councils have opposed school choice, trapping children and failing in government schools left and right. So many of these mayors right now, you know where they are? They're in jail, that's where they are. Republicans believe that every parent has the right to send their children to the school of their choice, but the greatest betrayal committed by the Democrats is their support for open borders. These open borders would overwhelm schools and hospitals, drain public services, and flood communities with poisonous drugs. It's tough enough, and I want to thank, by the way, the country of Mexico. They've got 21,000 soldiers on the border right now. I'm starting to like Mexico a lot. They do a lot more for us than the Democrats do, right? A lot more, a lot more. And, the numbers are way down. You'll see that. Way, way down. Democrat lawmakers care more about illegal aliens than they care about their own constituents. They put foreign citizens before American citizens. We're not going to do that. 572 people were murdered in Chicago last year. So, you got a lot of hot people outside, but we broke the all time record. The homicide rate in Baltimore is significantly higher than El Salvador, Honduras, Guatemala. I believe it's higher than … Give me a place that you think is pretty bad. Give me a place. The guy says Afghanistan. I believe it's higher than Afghanistan in our country. Think of that. I believe, we'll check the numbers and if we're wrong, they will tell us tomorrow. It'll be headlines. Trump exaggerated. I do believe the rate is higher than Afghanistan, yet Democrats, and they've run it for many years, want to spend hundreds of billions of dollars on illegal migrants instead of supporting their own struggling communities. No good, no good. The conditions in Nancy Pelosi's once great city of San Francisco are deplorable. They're deplorable. Do you remember the word deplorable? Do you remember when Hillary used the deplorable? She used two words. She used deplorable and irredeemable, right? And only being a politician for a few years. I said what a terrible mistake that she used the word irredeemable, but it turned out to be deplorable. Deplorable was not a good day for Hillary. Crooked Hillary. She is a crooked one She's crooked. She is crooked. Nearly half of all the homeless people living in the streets in America happen to live in the state of California. What they are doing to our beautiful California is a disgrace to our country. It's a shame the world is looking at it. Look at Los Angeles, with the tents and the horrible, horrible, disgusting conditions. Look at San Francisco. Look at some of your other cities, and then you have a governor … You have a governor that invites the whole world to come into California. We'll pay for your healthcare. Then you wonder why so many people are coming up. They're coming up because we're the hottest economic country in the world, but they're also coming up because you have people like that governor say, "Come on up. We'll give you healthcare. Come." Who wouldn't come up? Who wouldn't come up? How crazy is this? How crazy is this? Schools, healthcare. Today, I've a simple proposal for Democrat leaders to support legislation to end illegal migration, and we will use the vast savings to rebuild our inner cities. That's the way we should be doing it. That's what we should be doing. By the way, you know, they keep talking about, " Oh, the voters, the voters, the voters." They want all sorts of security. What about a thing called voter ID? Voter identification? Rob Portman, please work on that, Rob Portman. You have a great senator. Would you please start working on that? You see the response. Every place I go, Rob. Please, Rob. Voter ID. They give you everything they can give you except voter ID and the things that matter. Republicans believe that a nation must care for its own citizens first. Our pledge to America's workers has secured commitments to train more than 12 millions Americans for the jobs of tomorrow. You know who's working very hard on that? You probably never heard of her. Ivanka Trump. She's working very hard. She gave up a lot. She had a very easy life, but she loves doing it. She's got over, I think, now 12 million people. They're teaching them the great companies of our country, they're teaching people how to do it, and it's an incredible thing to watch. To give former prisoners a second chance at life, we passed groundbreaking criminal justice reform that nobody could've passed except us. President Obama tried, a lot of them tried, they couldn't get it passed. I got it passed with a lot of help from liberals and conservatives, and a lot of help. And, the biggest beneficiary is the African-American community. Biggest beneficiary. And, something which a lot of people don't talk about, but we doubled the child tax credit. Doubled it. Our tax plan also created nearly 9,000 opportunity zones, hottest thing going, providing massive new incentives for investment in job creation in distressed communities. Left together, I put out a six minute video detailing everything I found unacceptable about liberalism and the Democrat Party. Take your time. Take your time. Walk away. Doctor? Doctor in the house, please? Okay. Thank you very much. Thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you, doctor. Thank you. Don't forget, it's a hundred degrees in here. That person's been standing there for almost a day if you think about it. A lot of you, so I appreciate it. And you know what? They'll come back. They'll get a little something and they'll come right back because there's never been anything like this. There's never been anything, right? Never been. Thank you. Incredible. We established more than 300 opportunity zones in Ohio alone, and these are really working out incredibly well. Nationwide, nearly eight million African-Americans live in opportunity zones, but every democrat voted against them. Every single democrat, because they vote as a block. It's the only thing they do good. They stick together. Their policies, no good. They're lousy politicians, but they stick together like glue. It's the only thing they have. That's the only thing they have going. Democrats deliver poverty for their constituents and privilege for themselves. Republicans deliver jobs, safety and opportunity for all Americans. We're thrilled to be joined tonight by many terrific Republican leaders, and we'll start off with a man who had a very, very tough race for governor. A lot of people choke. They choke like dogs. They can't breathe, aw. They can't breathe. This guy was running against a so-called star … So, that's two protestors, and tomorrow night the headline will be, Protesters, Protesters. You know what happened to the second one? He looked at the guy in front of him and he said, "Ah, I'm out of here. Bye." That's the way it works, that's the way it works, I guess. Too bad. But, a man who really has done a fantastic job, he campaigned so hard, and this was a star right from the fields of the great Pocahontas whose now lying and cheating her way to the presidency, if possible. She's trying to win, remember? She defrauded people with her credentials. She said she was Indian, and I said that I have more Indian blood than she does, and I have none. I'm sorry. We drove her crazy. And, we drove her crazy. That's a good thing, not a bad thing. She went out and she had a blood test done, and it came out 1,024th. He said, " Somewhere back there, hundreds of years ago, there may have been an Indian. Or it may have been a statistical error because it was so small." Which, it was. Anyway, but the guy was from her group. You wouldn't be very happy right now, and we have a man that campaigned so hard, relentless. I came in, we did a rally where we had people like this. It was packed the day before the election and Mike DeWine won that election. -and Mike Dewine won that election and he won it easily. Mike Dewine. We have a man who's running for governor of Kentucky again. And he's done an incredible job. And did you ever hear, sometimes you could do such a good job that not everybody appreciates it? But they had a lot of problems with pensions and a lot of tremendous problems that a normal governor would never have been able to correct. But when you correct it, you make yourself a little bit less popular. But he had no choice and they had no choice. It's a great, great state and he has turned out to be a great, great governor. Matt Bevin. He's running in November, and because I like him so much, Matt get a nice big arena ready, we're going to do a rally for you. And a man who's fantastic son is here tonight who I just met, incredible. When I ran with him, he was down. I said, "Rob Portman's down," and then about four weeks later he was up by like 24 points. I said, "What the Hell did you do?" And you know what he did? He does a great job. That's what he did. Senator Rob Portman. Great guy. And we have a few guys that, these are warriors. A couple of them you saw the other day, they were questioning Bob Mueller. That was a beauty. He was sharp, wasn't he?He was sharp as a tack and Steve Chabot and Brad Wenstrup, and Warren Davidson and Andy Barr and a man named Greg Pence who happens to be a brother of somebody I know very well. They have been with us through thick and thin, and it has been mostly really good times because what we've done, no other administration in the first two and a half years in history has done. Thank you fellas. Great job. A couple of them gave a grilling. They gave a grilling. All they had to do is mention the facts and it was over. And also the auditor of the great state of Ohio, a man whose job I made much easier because you have money pouring in. You have companies pouring in. Keith Faber. How is it Keith? The numbers are good, Keith. Numbers are good, right? Yeah. The numbers are good. Ohio Senate President, Larry Obhof. Larry, thank you. Great job. Nice tie. I like Larry's tie. And you have a couple of people that are very, very powerful. I hear that office and I shudder, Ohio Supreme Court justices, Sharon Kennedy and Judy French. Thank you. Please don't recuse yourself because I gave you a nice welcome, should I ever be before you. I love judges. When they see you for about two seconds and then you say, oh, that judge should be fair. And then they say, "I'd like to recuse myself because 29 years ago I met Donald Trump." I'd never have been in… We've been doing very well in the courts, by the way. Have you seen? We've been winning a lot of cases, a lot of cases. We really have.  179. Percentage wise, it's the second most. We will never be number one. Sadly we'll never be number one. So percentage wise, nobody's ever seen anything like it. And that's because President Obama basically was not able for about three years to get his people in, which is a shame. And I came in, I had 148 openings. You're supposed to have none. I said, "How many do we have?" 148. And I said, "You got to be kidding." And we've all done a good job together. It's been amazing, with Mitch and you and everybody. It's been amazing. So we're going to be up to, within two months, 179 federal judges. That's in two and a half years. And what else? Two great Supreme Court judges. Great ones. There's only one person. I think most of you must know this. Who percentage wise has done better than me with judges? Tell me. I'll give you a hint? He appointed 100% of the federal judges and 100% of the United States Supreme Court. George Washington. That's one record we're not going to beat. But I appointed many more than him, so let's take it that way. Many anymore. I also want to introduce a friend of mine who's done an incredible job. She's really something, she has been incredible as a leader of the GOP. She's the chair and she's my friend Jane Timken. And aman Bob Paduchik. You know Bob Paduchik? So Bob, I had to pick campaign manager in Ohio and I kept hearing from the media, "You must win the state of Ohio." I heard this over and over for like a year and a half. "You must win Ohio. You must win." So I had to pick a campaign manager and I picked a man named Bob Paduchik. And no matter what happened, no matter how badly we were doing, he said, "Sir, you're going to win Ohio easily." I said, "But Bob, we just lost the head of the GOP in Ohio. He left because you have a certain governor that asked him to leave." Great support from the governor, a different governor than Mike by the way, slightly. So he had to get out. So I said, "We just lost." And Bob said, "Don't worry about it, sir. You're going to win. In fact, I think you just went up." Then we lost a couple of other people. I'd call him. I say, "Bob, I'm worried about Ohio. Very worried." He said, "Don't worry about it, sir. I think he just went up." He kept saying, "You just went up." I said to somebody, "I don't know much about this guy, but boy, he's the most optimistic person I've ever met." True. He said, "Don't worry." We ended up winning Ohio by close to nine points, which is unheard of. He was right. Bob Paduchik. Bob. And also here tonight, I don't know, did he do a good job? My son, Donald Jr. and Kimberly. I hope he did a good job. Good, I heard you did. I heard you did a great job. He's been a great help. They both have. Thank you very much. Thank you, Kimberly. Thank you very much. Our shared Republican agenda is pro worker pro jobs, pro family pro growth and 100% pro American. We've eliminated a record number of job killing regulations, giving the average American household $3,000 more to spend every single year. The previous administration tried to shut down American energy and close up, totally, close it up. American clean, beautiful coal. That's what they did. That didn't work out too well, but you had a suffer. It didn't work out well, but get a suffer for a long time until I came along. You're not suffering any longer. The previous administration, they liked to windmills. If a windmill is within two miles of your house, your house is practically worthless. They make noise, they're intermittent. They kill your birds. They break down all the time. You have to replace them every 10 years because they wear out, and they cost a fortune and they need subsidy. Other than that, they're quite good. You don't want one of those windmills within vision. You hear them, they're noisy. They've got a lot of problems. No, we're going to say with the great energy that's powering our businesses, that's creating so many jobs. And solar, you know what? We'll live with solar, but solar is peanuts by comparison to what you need. But we're going to stay the way we have it. We've ended the war on American energy and we're putting our coal miners back to work and our steelworkers back to work, and our auto companies back to work. We've learned over the last three years the incredible gold that were sitting on top of in this country. We're very lucky. We're now the largest energy producer in the entire world, bigger than Soviet Union, formerly. Remember the Soviet Union when it was all together. The Soviet Union, when it was all together before they decided we got to call ourselves Russia. When it was all together, they wanted to be, that was always their dream to be the biggest in the world. Then it became Russia and you know what? They've done a good job with energy and so has Saudi Arabia done a good job with energy. But we're now bigger than Russia. We are now bigger than Saudi Arabia by far. I withdraw our country from the job killing and very expensive Paris Climate Accord. Last year coal export were up 92% compared to 2016. 92%, do you believe that? You're shipping it all over the world. To Vietnam. I was in Vietnam and they said, "We get coal from Ohio. We get coal from West Virginia. It's the finest coal in the world." We've created more than 110,000 new mining jobs, and thanks to states like Ohio the United States is now the number one producer of oil, the number one producer of natural gas, the number one everything having to do with energy. Number one. Anywhere in the world. We're reversing decades of calamitous trade policies that led other countries to pillage our jobs, plunder our factories, and devastate Ohio communities and communities in every state. The era of economic surrender is over, and when you look at what they've done to your jobs over a period of time, NAFTA was one of the worst deals ever made and probably the worst deal. You still have empty buildings, empty factories, but now they're getting filled up pretty fast or being knocked down for brand new ones. We have hundreds of new companies pouring into the United States. My first week in office, I withdrew the United States from one of the last administration's worst sellouts. It would have destroyed our automobile industry. It would have destroyed manufacturing in this country, and maybe that's what President Obama meant when he said, you can't produce manufacturing jobs anymore in the United States, because he would've signed Trans Pacific Partnership and he would've been right. I killed it. And by the way, TPP, Trans Pacific Partnership would have destroyed the automobile industry in this country already. Already the shipped down 30% of your jobs to Mexico. Under the new USMCA. That's Mexico and Canada. We've got to get them to vote on that because that's an incredible deal. But under the new… It's going to be very hard for companies to leave you, to fire you, to go down to make their product, whatever it may be, to send it back into the United States with no tax. All we end up with this unemployment and taxes and empty buildings. So they got to vote, on the USMCA. Before I took office, foreign countries ripped us off, robbed us blind, and pushed us around, but America is not being pushed around anymore. Do you realize that? I got that from working in Ohio for two summers. We've taken the toughest ever action to stand up to China's trade abuse, and I just announced another 10% tariff on $300 billion worth of Chinese products that come into our country. And that's on top of the 25% that we take off $250 billion coming in from China, and don't let them tell you, the fact is China devalues their currency. They pour money into their system, they pour it in, and because they do that, you're not paying for those tariffs. China's paying for those tariffs. For the last 20 years, China's taken hundreds and hundreds of billions of dollars out of our country, and now we're stopping the theft of American jobs. We're stopping the theft of so many other things happening, including intellectual property. They steal our intellectual property. I think they want to try and make a deal with us, but I'm not sure, because the word is, I feel they want to wait until they get… They're praying. They're praying. They would like to see a new president in a year and a half so they could continue to rip off the United States like they've been doing for the last 25 years. Would love to see a guy like sleepy Joe Biden who has no clue what the hell he's doing. They say to sleepy Joe. Sir, "Just sign right there." "Oh, okay. I'll sign." We'll be losing hundreds of billions of dollars a year to China. It has to stop but they understand that. President Xi is good man. He's a friend of mine. He understands it. And until such time as there is a deal, we will be taxing the hell out of China. That's all there.  make your product in America. Come on back to the United States. Come on back to Ohio. There's no tariff. There's no tariff. Thanks to steel tariffs, hundreds of thousands of tons, think of this, were dumped on our shores, and steel is like something else. It's that quality. They were dumping garbage, they call it sand steel, they call it dirt steel.. It was mixed up. It was bad stuff and we didn't want to use that for our jet fighters and for our beams that hold up building. But they were dumping tremendous quantities of steel, and what was happening is United States steel and all of our companies were going virtually out of business and I stopped it. I put on a 25% tariff, billions of dollars is now pouring into our treasury and our steel companies and our steel workers are coming back. Right here in Ohio. Nucor a great steel company, and a steel company that's doing great again, Nucor, has announced an $85 million upgrade in Marion. Charter Steel announced plans to build a new $150 million steel mill in Cuyahoga Heights, and Cleveland Cliffs announced a new $700 million plant in a very good place that I like a lot, Toledo. Toledo, Ohio. This was unthinkable because four years ago, steel plans were closing. They weren't expanding or they weren't building. We're building new plants in Florida, North Carolina, South Carolina, all over. Not Just Ohio. On issue after issue, Democrats have forgotten who it is that they're supposed to represent. They forgot. I wonder why they forgot. The job of elected officials is to represent American citizens, the radical Democrats even support deadly sanctuary cities which release dangerous criminals onto our streets. Sanctuary cities. Many of the places that have sanctuary cities and many of the people that live there, they don't want them. They don't want them. They're dangerous and not good. Here are just a few examples. In San Francisco, an illegal alien was arrested no fewer than 10 times in the span of less than one year for numerous counts of burglary and theft. Yet each time San Francisco defied federal authorities and set him free and bad things happened when they set him free. A sanctuary jurisdiction in California recently released a criminal alien from jail. The very next month, the same individual was arrested for rape and then beyond anything you would even believe, a horrible thing happened. But yet again, he was released back into your community. After sanctuary city in New Jersey released an alien charged with domestic violence, he was arrested in Missouri for the murders of three people. In the bizarre worldview of the third and hard left, they have no problem destroying the lives of innocent Americans for a single politically incorrect thought. But they want to virtually, and you know this, they want virtual immunity for illegal aliens who have committed horrible crimes and murder. Horrible crimes and murder. Republicans believe our cities should be a sanctuary for law abiding Americans, not criminal aliens. And yes just won a big lawsuit last week. In fact, on of my lawyers for winning that lawsuit is here tonight. I gave him a little reprieve. We need a lot of lawyers in the White House. We get sued so much, so unfairly, but we're winning those lawsuits left and right, but one of them is here. He said, "I'd love to go to a rally." I said, " I'm going to a place called Cincinnati, Ohio. You deserve it." We just won the lawsuit on the wall. Where's Pat? We just won the lawsuit on the wall. You hear that? We're building the wall faster and better than ever. It's time for Democrats to end sanctuary cities and catch and release. You know what you do? You catch them and then you release them and you say, "Would you please report back in four years from now." But only 2% come back. You know why? Because they're not the smartest. They are not the smartest. They're the ones we don't want to have come back. Only 2% show up. Catch and release, we could end it immediately if the Democrats caved. So what we're doing is something else. We're keeping them out altogether. We're replacing random migraines and we're replacing the lottery system. How about the lottery system? How about lotteries? This was chuck Schumer. You put the name in a basket. The country puts the name in a basket and you picked people out of the lottery. Well, let's see. This one's a murderer. This one robbed four banks. This one, I better not say. This one, another murder. Ladies and gentlemen, another murderer. Think of this. Do you think they're going to put great citizens… they have great citizens, they have great people like we have great people. Do you think those people are going into a lottery? No. And then we get these people coming in and we hold it against the country. The country isn't based on that, the country, you just take a look, look at the people they put into these lotteries. It's a disgrace. And how we've done this for so many years folks, how we've done this. It's an immigration system that's totally broken and we're going to win the House, we're going to win the Senate, we're going to win the presidency and we're going to do a merit based immigration system. Merit based. Merit based immigration. And we need that because we have companies coming in from all over the world and we need good workers. We need good people. We're down to 3.5% unemployment. We need people, but we want people to come in based on merit, not based on some lottery put in by a governor. Democrats have never been farther outside the mainstream. Liberal politicians want to eliminate private- Dream. Liberal politicians want to eliminate private healthcare and force everyone onto the government plan. Remember the lies from the previous administration. If you like your plan, you can keep your plan. If you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor. 28 time, one lie after another. 28 times it was said and it turned out to be a total lie. My administration is defending your right to choose the plan and doctor that is best for you. We're offering right now plans up to 60% cheaper than Obamacare and we will always protect patients with pre existing conditions. Always. Always. Virtually every top Democrat also now supports late term abortion. And then you'll have like a governor of Virginia, it's not only late term abortion, it's killing the baby after the baby is born. How about that? Think of that. Think of that. That's why I've asked Congress to prohibit extreme late term abortion because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift from God. Democrats are now the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late term abortion, and they're the party, frankly, of socialism. The Republican Party is the party of freedom. We're the party of the American worker, the American family. We're the party of the American dream. I'm fighting for you each and every day. I had a great life. I used to get great publicity. Nobody got better… I had such a great life. It was so easy. My great wife, the first lady, Melania, she said, "You know, you've always been a hard worker. You love to work, but your life was a lot easier in the old days." But I love it and you know why I love it? Because we're accomplishing so much. Nobody ever thought it would be possible to do the things we're doing. Even a thing like Right to Try, right? Right to Try. They've been trying to get that for years and years and years. That's people that are really sick, terminally ill. They couldn't get medicine. We have the greatest doctors, the greatest clinics, the greatest technicians in the world. They couldn't get anything. They'd traveled to Asia if they had money. They traveled to Europe. They'd travel all over the world hoping for a cure. If they had no money they'd just go home. They'd die. They had no hope. For 44 years, they've been trying to get Right to Try. We are so advanced in medicine. We have a lot of things that probably work or possibly work, but we weren't allowed legally to give that to these people that were so sick. You know why? Because they didn't want this drug if it didn't work to hurt the people, but the people were terminally ill. So I got it approved and it wasn't easy. It was complicated. The insurance companies didn't want to do it. The government didn't want to do it. The doctors didn't want to do it. Tremendous liability. But our country didn't want to do it. They said, "Well, if it doesn't work, we're going to get sued." I say, "So they'll sign an agreement, very strong, one page, taking all liability away from the United States, from the drug companies, from the doctors, all liability. They're terminally ill. Let's try it." And you know what? It's been a miracle. So many people have done so well. It's great. We got it done. When I set about the agreement, they had these great lawyers and they said, "Gee, that's a good idea." They'd been working in this few years. They said, "That's a good idea." I said, "Yeah, it's a good idea. How about getting you to me like in about two hours?" Right to Try. It's a great thing. But we have so many things like that. I have lists that you wouldn't even believe. I have lists that go on for pages of things we've done. We've launched a historic initiative to reduce the price of prescription drugs, including a plan to allow companies to import lower cost drugs from other countries. It's a very unfair system. Our country pays the highest prices in the world. Last year was the first time in 51 years that drug pricing for prescription drugs actually came down. Now we're going to bring it down by a lot. We're going to bring it down a lot. And now… So other countries… Here's an example, Canada pays half the price for a lot of drugs that we do. So we have a great governor in the state of Florida, Ron DeSantis, calls me up. Doing a great job. Ron DeSantis. He was at three and he went to 70. that's a pretty good increase, right? Ron DeSantis, a great governor. And he comes to me, he goes, "You know, if you buy the drugs, if we buy the drugs, because this is so botched up, we have a middleman. It's not a good situation." He said, "If I could go and buy the drugs from Canada, I could save 50%." I said, "Do it. Do it. And if you can buy them from Europe, because their system…" Like, remember I used to scream when I was winning states and not getting the delegates that I was entitled to and I'd say the system is rigged? Well, the drug system is rigged. It's rigged. So if we can buy the same drug made by the same pharmaceutical company from Europe or from Canada or from other places at a big deep discount, we're doing it and we're giving them the right to do it. Just happened today. And we're doing one other thing that, believe it or not is even bigger, but you'll be seeing that over the next two weeks. With the help of your great Senator, Rob Portman, we've taken bold action to confront the opioid epidemic and in Ohio, drug overdose deaths went down 22% last year, 22%. No, but think of that. Opioid, big problem, big problem. Deaths went down. Opioid deaths, 22%. Nobody writes that. Nobody talks about that. They don't want to talk about that. Good job, Rob. Good job. Good job, Mike. We passed VA Choice and VA Accountability on behalf of our great veterans. They been trying to pass VA Choice for four decades. They couldn't get it done. We got it done. We got it done. This is where a veteran would stand online for three, four, five, six days, for three weeks, for five weeks. Sometimes they're okay. By the time they see a doctor, they're terminally ill. And I said, "You know, I have a great idea." Because I not been doing that this long. You know, we've been working with this for… I've been thinking about it a lot. This was during the campaign. What a campaign that was, right? Was that a campaign or what? And I came back to my people. I had experts and I said, "I have a great idea. These lines for the veterans are too long. It takes them three, four weeks sometimes to see a doctor. I have a great idea. Let's let them go outside. Go to a private doctor. We'll pay the bill. They'll be fixed up all perfect and they can do it immediately. We'll pay the bill." And I thought… I said, "Man, am I smart? I am the smartest guy to think of that." So I went before this panel of experts that were with me working on things and I said, "How do you like that idea?" And they said, "Sir, we've known about it for about 40 years, but we've never been…" I said, "Really? You've known about it that long?" But here's the thing. We got it done. Nobody else could get it done. Nobody else. And Accountability. You couldn't fire anybody. If they were treating our vets badly, you couldn't fire them for anything. People could steal. They could be sadistic to our vets. By the way, they wouldn't have done that in primetime to our vets. I can tell you that. They can be whatever they want. You couldn't fire them. And it was because of unions and it was because of other things. Civil Service. Very tough. You couldn't fire anybody for almost anything. We had cases where people got… They got caught stealing a lot of money and you couldn't fire them. We got VA Accountability. Now we say, "Jim, get the hell out of here. You're fired." We're rebuilding our military. And after years of budget cuts and layoffs, the army tank plant in… Do you Lima? You call it Lima, right? See? You know, most people call it Lima, but I know Lima. But you know why? Because I came here and they said, "We're closing this plant." I said, "What kind of a plant is it?" Remember when I was here? In Lima. And I used to say, "You mean Lima?" They said, "No, sir. It's Lima." That's why… Because, but Leah, hey look, I'll be honest with you because they have it wrong with the teleprompter, okay? And I would have been in big trouble. But the good news is I don't use the teleprompter too much. If I did, you would've been out of here a long time ago because it gets very boring when you do the teleprompter deal. But in Lima, and I said, "What kind of a plant?" And I said, "Let's go see it." During the campaign I went to see it and they make the incredible, the best army tank in the world and I couldn't believe the complexity, the genius. I said, "Wait a minute. You close this, you'll never be able to open it again. You can't open this. This isn't like a normal situation that you can open four walls and a roof. This is complicated. This is genius and you'll never replace these men and women that work here." I said… And I didn't know anything at the time other than I said, "You're not closing it." They took it off to list. They kept it open and now we're making army tanks around the clock. We're investing in the future of human space flight. Americans won the race to the moon and we will now win the race to Mars. It's going to be amazing. And you know, one thing I have to say also, and we're also winning the race to great, great strategic defense and offense, not just Mars. And Mike Pence is doing a great job on that. Great job. To protect America's security, I withdrew the United States from the horrible Iran nuclear deal, a horrible, stupid deal. We gave Iran $150 billion. We gave Iran $ 1.8 billion in cash. Plane loads of cash. I wonder what they saw when those planes landed. I wonder what happened to the cash? Can you believe it? One $1.8 billion we gave them in cash. And remember what I said, Iran is a much different country than two and a half years ago. When I took over, Iran was all over. They had 14 to 18 different sites of confliction. They were all over. And now they just want to… They want a negotiated deal so badly. Iran. Iran. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. And just a few months ago, we recognized the Golan Heights. You know that. That's another one. Big one for the security of Israel. Also recognized the legitimate government of Venezuelan and we condemn any of the socialist brutality taking place. Let's see what happens there. Let's see what happens. Tonight we renew our resolves that America will never be a socialist country. Never, ever, ever will it be a socialist country. No matter what label they use, a vote for any Democrat in 2020 is a vote for the rise of radical socialism and the destruction of our great, our beautiful, our wonderful American dream. We're not going to let our country ever go down the route of socialism. You must never forget that the 2020 election is about one thing. It's about you. I say it again. I say it all the time. Never happened before. There's never been a movement like this. They've had movements. They never went… They won a state. They did well in the state. We won 32 states. There's never been anything like it. There's never been anything like it. But this movement is about your family and your future, and it's about the life and the fate of your country. We begin our… Hey, look, this is a good place. Is this a great thing to do? We begin our campaign and we're going to do great, Bob. Right, Bob? Bob, if we don't do great, you're fired, Bob. You're fired. But think of it, our Ohio campaign with the best record, the best results, the best agenda, and the only positive vision for our nation's future. And again, remember this, Ohio is doing better today than it's ever, ever, ever done before. It's the best it's ever done. What's going to do… A guy like a sleepy Joe Biden is going to come in and say, "But I could do better. I could do better." He wants to go back to sleep. Together we will continue unleashing the power of American enterprise so every American can reach their fullest and highest potential, tremendous potential. Our country has such tremendous potential. You know, we've had… The last week, we've had the highest stock market in the history of our country. That means 401ks. That means job. But there's tremendous potential to go up. We have tremendous potential to go up. With your help, we will elect a Republican Congress to create a safe, modern, fair, and lawful system of immigration. We will enact trade deals that ensure more products are proudly stamped with those four beautiful words "Made in the USA" or "Made in America". Either one. You can use either one. Made in America, made in the US. We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine and I see what they're doing. I see it. They show me the things we're doing in our country today. There's never been anything like it. We will be ending the AIDS epidemic shortly in America and curing childhood cancer very shortly. We will defend privacy, free speech, religious liberty, and the right to keep and bear arms. Just remember with the Democrats, there is no second amendment. You can forget about keep and bear arms. You can forget it. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the values that bind us together as one America. We will never ever stop fighting. We support, protect and defend the constitution of the United States. We stand with our incredible heroes of law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work and we believe in the sanctity of life. And we believe that faith and family, not government and bureaucracy, are the true American way. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and always be proud, patriotic Americans. And we will always live by the words of our national motto, "In God We trust." Two days ago, I spoke at the 400th anniversary of the first representative legislature assembly at Jamestown, Virginia. It was beautiful. It was incredible. I was… I must tell you, I was reminded of so many great things in our country. We have been blessed with such a remarkable and priceless heritage. We are the greatest republic on the face of the earth and we are going to keep it that way. Every day of my presidency, we will never forget that we are Americans and the future belongs to us. The future belongs to all of you. The future belongs to the greatest movement in the history of our country. And with your help and your devotion and your drive, we are going to keep on working. We are going to keep on fighting and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. We are one people in one family saluting one great American flag. We all share the same home. We all share the same heart. And we all share the same love of Almighty God. Together, with the great and proud people of Ohio, we are making America wealthy again. We are making America strong again. We are making America safe again. We are making America great again and with your vote in 2020 we will keep America great. Thank you, Ohio. Thank you.Hello Colorado. We love Colorado, most beautiful place And I'm thrilled to be back in Colorado Springs. I've spent a lot of time here over the years. Beautiful place, beneath the majestic peaks, that's true, of the Rocky Mountains with thousands of terrific, hardworking, great American patriots. With your help this November, we are going to defeat the radical Democrats and we are going to win Colorado in a landslide. And you're going to help us get Cory Gardner across that line because he's been with us 100%. there was no waiver. He's been with us. There was no waiver with Corey. We appreciate it. Thank you Corey. Thank you. This month we mark a very special anniversary. 75 years ago this week our brave United States Marines landed on the shores of Iwo Jima and began one of the bloodiest battles of the second world war. It was a rough one. Tonight it's our great privilege to be joined by three of the heroes of the Battle of Iwo Jima, James Blaine, Donald Whipple and John Thurman. Great, great patriots, very brave people. Just passed away. Sadly he passed away just a few days ago. He was going to be here. Passed away a few days ago, but he was great. I have a beautiful picture of him right outside and we're going to honor him and his family. Great, great gentlemen. So we were going to have four. We have three and we want to thank you for being here. Thank you all. Thank you. Because America is truly a land of heroes, on behalf of the grateful nation I would like to recognize the many veterans of the Vietnam War and the Iraq and Afghanistan Wars who are here this evening, and a lot of them. Great people, great people. This is a truly incredible time for America. We have the best economy in our history, the most prosperity of any country. We are doing better than any country in the world, that is not even close. And we've rebuilt our military over the last three years. Don't tell anybody, but we spent two and a half trillion dollars. But when it comes to our military and our safety and our security, we don't worry about budgets, right? We don't worry about budgets. We had to rebuild it. It was depleted. It was in bad shape. It was old, it was tired. We have the best people in the world, but they had old equipment. Now we have brand new jets. We have brand new missiles and rockets. We have everything all made in the USA. In my State of the Union Address, I proudly declared that we are in the midst of the great American comeback. That's what we're doing. Our country is stronger today than ever before. After three years of ridiculous witch hunts and scams and partisan Democrat crusades, the radical left's attempt to poison our democracy and overturn this last election have totally failed. They have been a complete flop and we today have the highest poll numbers we've ever had today, just came out. And I don't know if anybody watched last night's debate, it got very big ratings and you know what? Mini Mike didn't do well last night. I was going to send him a note saying it's not easy doing what I do, is it? It's not easy, Mike. Not easy for any of them. Now, Mike didn't do too well. He went way down. It's all right. Mini mike. How about Klobuchar, did you see her? She choked. She choked. She couldn't breathe. Alfred E. Neuman looked at her and said something slightly derogatory and she said, "Are you accusing me of being dumb?" Who would make a statement like that? Because that's really what he was doing, but he doesn't want to say that. No, how about that? "Are you saying I'm dumb?" That was the end of her campaign in my book. You don't say that. Even if it's true, you don't say that. They had a crazy person on today on one of the Fox shows. I tell you, Fox doesn't treat us the way they used to. But we have the great Sean Hannity, we do, and we have Laura and Tucker. And we have in the morning Fox and Friends, Steve and Ainsley, and Brian's gotten much better, he's moving up. And we have the great Lou Dobbs. Lou Dobbs says he's the greatest president ever. The great Lou Dobbs. He says, Lou Dobbs a year and a half, two years ago he said, "He's the greatest since Reagan." Then he said about six months ago, "He's better than Reagan." And then he said a few nights ago, "He's the greatest we've ever had." I said, "Does that include Lincoln and George Washington?" He said, "That includes them all." That's Lou Dobbs. The great Lou Dobbs. And you've got Hegseth and you've got Jesse Waters. How about Jesse? And Judge Jeanine and even Greg Gutfeld. Greg hated us, right? But now he says, "Look, whether I like him or not, he gets it done. It's all about getting it done." We're getting it done. Nobody's ever done what we've done. No, but Fox says, and I don't know, it's different. It was different. In the old days, it was better for us. It was better for us. But it's okay, we'll win anyway. No, but they had this woman on. Neil Cavuto, doesn't treat us good. Neil Cavuto, he's not too good. She said, "I don't like him." Nobody likes him. Right now… So you had, remember Lest in The Readies? You remember who was Lest in The Readies? He got fired, right? You remember, right? Remember? He's gone and now Neil's taking his place. Neil is actually a nice guy, but he doesn't like Trump too much. And he put this woman on today and she said, "Donald Trump didn't do well in the debates and he won," because she was referring to Mike Bloomberg, sometimes referred to as Mini Mike. And I said, "Wait a minute, I won every debate." It's true. And we sent them polls, poll after poll after poll. Not only won them, but won by a lot. I won every debate. I'm just saying every poll, they do those polls right after, three, four, 500,000 people, Time Magazine. I said, "Nobody's allowed to do that. You can't do that." We're at enough of a disadvantage with the fake news. They make up 90% of the story. So where is Dan Scavino? Where is Scavino? Does anyone know who Dan Scavino is? Dan, bring me those pages up here. Bring those pages up. See if you can get them. Go get them. It's such fake news. It's so disgusting. You know what? They'd do better if they told the truth. Do you agree? They'd do better. Oh, someday in 10, 14, 18, 22 years when I'm gone, when we leave office in 26 years or so, they're going to miss us. I told the story that a month before I ran, 2016 I was thinking about it. I said to my wife, who has become a great First Lady. People love here. They said it's one of the greatest fields ever assembled. And I said, "What the hell should I run for if they are so great?" But I remember holding up the New York Times and it was like a leaflet that you give a certain, a supermarket, right? It's like, the thing was blowing in the wind. It was dead and now it's successful again. But when we leave, it's all of us. We leave together. We're unified. This is the most unified the Republican party has ever been. And when we leave, the New York Times… Thank you. The great Dan Scavino, the most powerful man in politics. Hey Dan. So Zuckerberg left. Who is number one in the world on Facebook? And I'm saying this in front of the fake news because if I'm wrong, they're going to report me, right? Who is number one in the world on Facebook? He walked in, but that's us. He walked in for… We had dinner recently just because I want them to pay taxes. I want to find out what's going on. But he walked in, he's smart, and he said, "I just want to congratulate you." Small dinner, a few people. He said, "You're number one in the world in Facebook." I said, "That's nice." I said, "Who's number two?" He said, "Prime minister Modi of India." I said, "Wait a minute, wait a minute. He's got 1.5 billion people and we have 350 so he should be number one." But we're never going to give up that position of number one in the world for our country, for Facebook, for Twitter, for anything, and they still haven't figured it out. They have not figured it out. But look at all that press. Look at all that press. Did this ever happen before? And then you have Brad Pitt. I was never a big fan of his. He got upset. A little wise guy statement. A little wise guy. He's a little wise guy. Anyway, but we're doing what? Over here, I just showed this real quick. Right? So this horrible journalist, she's a real, she's a Trump hater. You know what she's worth? Zero ratings. Nobody watches her, but she said… she was trying to… Look, Bloomberg made a fool out of himself last night. He choked. He's another one who's going, " Oh I can't breathe. I can't breathe. Don't ask me the question, please." I look at my wife, I said, "Let's send him a little note. It's not so easy up there to do what I did, right?" Not so easy. But this woman who is a third rate, fourth rate, she's been with everybody. Every year she's with a different group, but I won't use her name because it'll make her too famous. It actually plays to their advantage. But she's third rate and she's on the lowest rated show at Fox, Neil Cavuto. That's why. So she said, "Donald Trump didn't get good ratings. He didn't do well in the polls." She said, "He didn't do well on the debates." She said that we were defeated in the debates. Well I defeated crooked Hillary every time and by a lot. Yeah, she's crooked as a $3 bill. I was going, "Whatever happened to the 33,000 emails? Whatever happened?" 33,000, she deleted them and her acid washed them and she didn't get in trouble. Can you imagine if a Republican did that? They would want to bring back the death penalty, right? Two standards. But I think things are happening. I said drain the swamp, I just never knew how deep it was. We have more garbage in the swamp than you would ever believe. And this is part of the swamp. So what happens? She said, "Donald Trump didn't do well in the debates." Now remember my answer, Rosie O'Donnell, right? First question I've ever, and we took down the house. Then the second, Brett Barry asked me, I had to raise the hand. I'm the only one, I guess that raised the hand. Right? And the place went crazy because I was the only one telling the truth. Okay? Turns out I was the only one telling… And the people get it. But she said I didn't do well on the bench. I said, "Really? I won every single debate." We had 15 to 14 debates, then we had the presidential debates with crooked Hillary against myself. So here's one. I don't want to… I'm a little guilty because these are all my friends, right? A lot of them are my friends now. They weren't my friends then, they were my mortal enemy. It's hard to be friends when you're competing against somebody. You're right about that. So here's Donald Trump, 67. The next one was 13%. the next one was 5%, 4%, 3%, 2%, 2%, 2%, 1%, 1%, and 0. All right, that's Time Magazine. All right, that's Time. They don't like me. I don't like them either, by the way. Although actually I do like the new owner. This year I got beaten out by Gretta. You know Gretta? Last year I got beaten out… I mean, I've won it. But when the world evolves around all of us, we should be chosen. There's nothing wrong with it, right? I mean, we've won it, but we should win it every single year, let's face it. And now they call it person of the year. They don't go out man of the year. And I know the women out there are saying, "Isn't that nice?" But a lot of the women out there don't like it. They don't like it. We could have a woman of the year and a man of the year. I like that. Okay, here's Drudge Report. Drudge is starting to treat me good again. He started to like me again. I like him. Look, Trump and Ted Cruz, I can say he came in second. He was a great debater. And Marco came in third and a guy who I don't like much and they don't like him much in Ohio either, Kasich. Kasich. He was way down. Way down. Okay, look who won? Trump. Here's another one. Look again, a different one, Time Magazine. Trump, 33%. Ben Carson, good man, he was down. Marco, Jed, Ted. Carly Fiorina, a name I haven't heard in a long time. What happened to Carly? And ran, good poll. Here's the story. Look, but way up. Way up. Look at this. Here's another one. Look at this. Trump 46%. I didn't make this up. Here's another one. This is a different debate. I don't know. They're all different. I won every one of them. Look, Trump, I just took these at random, 46%. second, 5%, 3%, 5%, 3%, 9%, 5%, 11%. Trump, 46%. Here's another one, CNBC. Well, the market's been up. They've actually been not so bad and Joe Kiernan is a good guy. He is a good guy. Some of the rest, I don't care for it too much. Becky's like, she plays it a little bit down in the middle, right? Which is okay. Trump, almost 50%. Then they have all the rest of them. 14, 4, 3, 2, 2.8, 2.54, 1.9, I'm not going to give you the names. I won't tell you that I got 48.8 and Jeb Bush got 1.1. The rest I'm not going to talk about, but he hasn't been exactly a great supporter, sort of a never Trumper I guess. So Jeb, 1.9, 1.1, and Trump 48. That's another one. Oh, here's a nice one. Here's a nice one. Look at this. Look at this. Trump 70%, next one is 18%, next one is 7, 4, 3, 3, 3, 2, 1, 1, 1. Trump didn't do well in the debate. See, they're fake news. Here's another one, Trump Kicked Ass. Trump Kicked Ass. Trump 48, number two was six. Here's another one. Trump 75.6, crooked Hillary was 24%. This was against crooked Hillary. So look at that. Trump was 74.6, crooked Hillary Clinton was 24.1. Trump was 80%, crooked Hillary was 18%. And I've got this woman. You know who it is, right? Nobody knows the name. I'm not going to mention it. But everybody knows Neil Cavuto. She has no credibility and neither do you, Neil Cavuto. Here's another one. Crooked Hillary, and by the way, one is a Fox poll, one is Breitbart, one is a Drudge report. One is a Patch, one is Syracuse.com, one is Pollack Opinion, Alyssa Goodwin. But look at these numbers. Trump 92. What is it? So I'm winning every poll, I beat crooked Hillary. Here's the one, Trump 61, crooked Hillary 39. Okay? That's what it is. And then I turn on the damn show on Fox. Again, it's not the same. It was much better. It really was. It was much better. I turn on Fox and I've got this third rate political journalist, if you call her that saying, "Trump did very poorly in the debates, but he became president." No, I did great in the debates. I became president because of the debates, because unlike Mini Mike, I could answer questions. And here's the final one and I could get you another 15. These are all the ones that taken right after. People call in, hundreds of thousands of people, they call in Time Magazine, CNBC. So here's a CNBC, crooked Hillary Clinton, 39%. Donald Trump, 61%. and then this stupid person said I didn't debate well. Now look, I don't mind and you can have bad debates, but I won every single debate. Listened to this, then three and a half, four years later I have to listen to a person saying how we didn't do well, because these people are among the most dishonest people anywhere in the world. Take it. Take it. Here it is. Okay, let's get back to business. Now I feel good. Now I feel good. She's a third rate journalist. Let's go. We're standing up in defense of our constitution, our freedom and democracy itself, right? While the extreme left has been wasting America's time and doing all sorts of vial hoaxes, we went through hoaxes. We went through the impeachment scam. And by the way, Corey was with us all the way. He didn't move. He didn't budge. He said it's a lot of bull. He said it's a lot of bull. But while they're doing that stuff and we're working with a cloud, we're working with these people. They want to take you out. They want to change the results. They got caught spying, let's say it like it is, right? They got caught spying on our election. Fake news. Hey fake news, take your cameras for a change and show them the room and show them behind you. Go ahead, show them the room. Show them the room. You see, they never do it, including Fox, by the way. Fox is not that much better. We just got lucky because we have some… All their high rated shows are the shows that like Trump, all their losers shows like Cavuto are the shows that don't like Trump. How is Shep Smith doing lately, by the way? How is Shep Smith? He had the lowest ratings and now Cavuto took his place so that's okay. But they never show the room. My wife, a great First Lady, she goes… I say, "Hi honey. Did you watch the debate?" "Yeah." "How did the room look? Was that…" because last night I think we turned away 21,000 people. We had an arena that it held 12, but we fill up the basketball courts, right? Or the ice rink. We had to have 15, 16,000 people. It was on fire. You all saw it. It was great. And she said to me, she said, "Darling, how did you do?" I said, "I did great." I said, "Did you see the arena?" And she said, "No, they never show the arena." You know that guy Dana White at UFC? I won't tell you about him yet, but he's a brilliant guy, right? I mean, he sold his crazy fighters, I mean bomb bomb bomb. $4 billion he got with Fertittas, great people. But you know what? They're always showing it's full. It's full. These fakers back there, they don't want people. But I'll tell you what my wife said, "They don't show it, but you can't imitate 15,000 people when it comes to the noise." Look, they won't show it. They never show it and we've never had an empty seat from the day I came down the escalator, not one. What these guys do if Mr. And Mrs. Jones sitting right up there, beautiful couple. If she said, "Darling, I'm sorry, there's nothing I can do about it, darling. I have to go to the bathroom." He said, "Darling, I'll walk with you." The cameras glong on to those seats, they glong on and they say, "There were two empty seats. Trump didn't fill up the room." These are the worst people. But when I told them to spin around those cameras, they stayed that way. Now, if we had a protestor somewhere in the arena, it could be up in that corner where it's loaded up with people, those cameras that can do, they look like a pretzel. They look like a pretzel. They want to find it. There's trouble, those same guys could, it could cover anything. I used to think, well it's the equipment, it's very rigid. They can't turn it. And then some idiot from up in the corner starts screaming stupid stuff, because that's dangerous in this room, to be honest. We don't have it too much. They only pick on the guys that are all by themselves and aren't fighters. But if somebody up there does something, those cameras turn around, spin around like a pretzel. They bend, boom, they get. So that was the end of my theory that we have rigid equipment. And by the way, I told them, turn around, not one of those cameras turned around to show the room because it's fake news. While the extreme left has been wasting America's time with vial hoaxes, we've been killing terrorists, creating jobs, raising wages, enacting fair trade deals, securing our border and lifting up citizens of every race, color, religion, and creed, right? We added another 225,000 brand new beautiful jobs last month, way, way, way above what our great geniuses back there thought it would be, 225,000. Think of it, we right now have more people working in our country than at any time in the history of our country, almost 160 billion. 00 in the morning, they are watching. The whole world was watching. That was the most exciting television that anybody's ever seen. Even ESPN, some guy on ESPN said, "This is the most exciting event I've ever seen." And all he does is watch sporting events and big ones. But since the election, 7 million brand new beautiful jobs have been added and we've invested more than $2 trillion into that military that we talked about. And we created- Into that military that we talked about, and we created something that's very exciting. And we have our great new General. He's on the … he's on our … I'll tell you, he was on a list of the most incredible men you've ever seen. The sixth branch of the United States Armed forces, the Space Force. And I will be making a big decision for the Space Force as to where it's going to be located, and I know you want it. We'll be making that decision toward the end of the year. I was here, I did your … I met … I was up at the Air Force Academy, and I greeted those kids, they were so great. I did the commencement address. Was anybody there? I did the commencement address. And the General said, sir, would you like to shake hands with the cadets? I said, does everyone else do it, President? Oh, yes, sir. What he didn't say is, they'll shake 10 hands. I said, so they do … how many do you have? Sir, we have 1156 cadets. I said, you mean other people do it? Yes, sir. But they don't do 1156. They'll do 30, 40. They'll take the top 10 out of the class. I said, I'll do it. I stood there for two and a half hours and the sun was blazing. True. And I shook 1156 hands. And a lot of these kids are very strong physically. In fact, you have one of them as an example, he was the winner of the home run derby. Did you know that? College … think of that. The college home run derby. I said, let me see you. I want to see what you look like. He stands up, uniform, everything else. And by the way, I did something for Air Force, but I did something for all of the academies. If you were a great athlete and they had a hard time recruiting, although they've done well, if you're a great athlete, you can't … we wanted to get them to go, but they didn't because they didn't want to serve five years in the military and then they'd go into the NFL or baseball. So, I had one of the teams in. They said, sir, give us the waiver, sir. They've been after the waiver. You know what the waiver is? That means that if you're a great athlete, you can go to the Air Force Academy, or Army, Navy, the Coast Guard, you can go to one of our service academies. I did the rule and we got it through Congress. And you don't have to serve. You go directly into the major leagues and to the NFL, and you serve your time after, when you get out. Isn't that great? And the Army coach, who's a great guy … all great guys. Navy coach, Army coach, said sir, if you do that, we can compete with anybody, because we lost lot of great athletes who said, you know, we just can't do that. Now they serve their time afterwards. Isn't that great? And we did it. They've been trying to get that for so many years. But I love that group of people. I saw this guy from the home run derby, and I shook hands. Oh, I shook hands. And they come up and they're strong people. And they're shaking, and they're excited. They're a little nervous, maybe. They're meeting the President. They're a little nervous, and they're strong. They've got big, strong hands, and they're saying … and I'm saying, hello. Sir, thank you. Man. Jeez. What are you? I'm captain of my wrestling team, sir. I admire you greatly, sir, thank you, sir. It's like … and I'm trying to act like it doesn't hurt. By the end of the day, I'm going like … but we did it. And then I said, wait a minute. I said, General, no other President could do that. The Presidents don't do that. He said, no, they do, sir, but they stop, usually, at around 50. Oh, that's great. But I love the Air Force Academy. And you have all of the infrastructure, so you're being very strongly considered for the Space Command. Very strongly. And actually, I have to say this. I think I can say this, Mr. Senator, but the Governor showed up at the plane today, your Governor. Democrat. No, but in all fairness, he showed up because he wanted to lobby to see if they could get it. That's okay, that's all right. And we are going to be making that decision, Cory, when we make that decision, all right? Okay. But we've destroyed the ISIS territorial caliphate 100 percent. We killed the founded and leader of ISIS, al-Baghdadi. He's dead. He's dead. And we just killed the world's number one terrorist, Qasen Soleimani, ending his evil reign of terror forever. Forever and ever. He was the king of the roadside bomb, right? When you see these young men and in some cases women, no legs, no arms. They get it, and 92 percent of them were from Soleimani, and then they started making them … they had great detection. We had these guys, great detection, then all of a sudden, the detection wasn't working because they started making them out of plastic instead of metal. So they're blowing the guys up with the scopes, so they had the scopes on and that happened recently because they started making it out of plastic. Real scum, but he's gone, he's evil, he's dead, and America is respected again like never before. But as we keep on winning, Washington Democrats keep on losing their minds. They've gone nuts. That's why millions of registered Democrats, voters, people that were with the Democrats for a long time, they're leaving their party to join our movement. They're joining our great Republican party. We have more enthusiasm than any party has had in the last 50 years. And don't believe stories, and don't believe polls, because the polls are worse than the stories. They give phony polls. 00. The polls have closed … and you know they only announce if you're very … if you're really going to win by a lot. Otherwise, it takes all night. The polls have closed in the great state of Texas. Donald Trump has won the great state of Texas. Thank you. But they had Alfred E. Newman, Buttigieg, little Buttigieg. I said, I've had you up to here. They had little Buttigieg leading Donald Trump in Texas. These people. But very close. They said, it's too close to call, where Buttigieg … so, a friend of mine from Texas, a big, powerful, strong guy, real Texas, he's got the cowboy hat … I'd love to wear that hat, I wouldn't have to comb my hair so much. I wouldn't need hairspray, right? I love those Texas hats. I don't know if we'd get away with it in Washington, that's my only problem, but I love them. This guy wears that big hat, the biggest hat. He's a big guy. And he's interviewed by somebody. He said, listen, I don't know much about politics, but I can tell you one thing. Buttigieg is not tied with the President. The President is leading him by 20 points. It's like I said the last time, nobody's leading Trump in Texas. And you know what? Nobody is even close to us in the great state of Colorado. We're leading big. Nobody. With your energy and enthusiasm, this November, and specifically it's November 3rd is the big day, and this is going to be as big … and I can't say bigger, because what was bigger than that? They came from the hills, they came from the mountains, they came out of the rivers, they came all over the place. Great people, they just never saw anybody they wanted to vote for. Women would come in, they hadn't voted in 20 years, great women, beautiful women, strong women, smart women, wives. No, no, incredible. And they love our country and they work hard and they pay their taxes and they work and they're … we're the elite, just so you … they're not the elite, we're the elite. And you know what? They'd show up, they've got Trump bandanas along with our great Vice President Mike Pence, Trump Pence, and they got the hats now and they walk … these are people that were never political people. They never wore a pin. Now they've got 30 pins all over their chest, they've got the hats with the things and the Trump, and nobody's ever seen anything like it. Really, it's a great revolution, and we're turning this country around. And I'm not saying anything can ever compete with 2016, but I think if we don't do it, a lot of what we've done, and we're going to go over the jobs and the regulation cuts and what we've done for the vets with choice and accountability, but you know what? They can undo it, but in four years they can't undo it, because that tree will be planted. It will be solid. They're not going to be able to do it, so we've got to win. And your second amendment is at stake, remember that. So this November, we're going to take back the House, we're going to hold the Senate, and we are going to keep the White House. So we're thrilled tonight to be joined by many great leaders from across this incredible state and from all over the country, and I want to thank Mike Pence. I heard he gave a great speech. I never want it to be too good. I never want it to be too good. I said, Mike, take it easy. Can't be too got. Mike is great. But we have Secretary David Bernhardt, Department of Interior. Thank you. Come on up, Dave. He's great. What he's doing, by the way, he's the largest landlord by a factor of about 2000. Department of the Interior. You're taking good care of Colorado, please? Okay. He's a big deal in Colorado, right? He's a big deal. All those beautiful mountains and rivers and lakes, he's the guy. You better keep them nice and clean. Believe me, we like the environment more than anybody. We want clean water and we want clean air. And you have warriors. You have guys, they fought for us. 197 to nothing. We were … when you think of it, the Republicans, 197 on the house to nothing. Congressman Ken Buck, come on up. Congressman Scott Tipton. And Congressman Doug Lamborn. Thank you, Doug. Thank you. And we're also joined tonight by somebody that you really love, and I love him, too, but there's a reason. He's my son. Don junior. And Kimberly Guilfoyle. Kimberly, thank you, Kimberly. And a man … he happens to own the Chicago Cubs, but that's okay. He's done an incredible job, actually. He had a five year plan on the fifth year, the stadium was fully rebuilt, and they won the World Series. That's not bad. He had a five year plan. RNC finance chairman Todd Ricketts. Come on up, Todd. Come on up. Come on up, Todd. And I mentioned him a little earlier, but you didn't know he was here. I just said he's a champion, he's a winner. He's been a friend of mine for a long time. He's a tough cookie. He's the kind of people that made our country great. Truly, they've made our country great. He started off with two people fighting each other, then he got four people fighting each other, then he got them fighting each other, each other. Then he got six and eight and 12. All of a sudden people started watching and looking, and I was proud to hold his first event. That's why he loves me. They didn't want … they said, it's too dangerous. Nobody would take it. I'm the only who said, take it. We'll take it. And it was unbelievable. I went and I said, this is great. Let's do it again. And he has been my friend for a long time. And they put together a phenomenal deal, it's called UFC. He's the UFC president. And they just sold the company. He started it off for about $ 30, and they just sold it for $4 billion. And the people that bought it said, we're not buying it unless Dana White stays back and runs it. So Dana White, come on up. He's now a very wealthy guy. Come here. You want to hear from him? Yes. What's up, Colorado? How are you today? So, I'm not a very political person, I'll start there, but let me say this. There's things that I can tell you about the President of the United States that you don't hear on t.v. and you don't hear from other people. Like you said, I've known this man for 20 years. We've actually become even closer since he's become the President of the United States. When somebody becomes the President of the United States, you don't ever expect to hear from them again, and I understand it. It absolutely makes sense. This guy is so loyal and such a good friend, every time I see him … I saw him today. When I met him on Air Force One, the first thing he said to me is, how is your family? How is your family? Good man, very loyal, and a very good friend. I see a lot of things from Mr. Trump that the public doesn't see, and the people who surround me every day see how this man treats me as a friend, and other people he's friends with. He's a fighter, he loves this country, he's doing great things for this country, and we got to win this election again, ladies and gentlemen. Thank you. That was beautiful, because we get tired of hearing from these politicians all the time. Right, politicians? What a job he does, and we thank you very much, Dana, and you are my great friend, and thank you. But with Cory and with me, they're not going to play with your second amendment. Not going to happen, but it's … it is under siege. You see what's happening. But somebody … we fight together, and he's been so great. Cory Gardner, please come on up, please. Thank you. That's beautiful. That's true of the pipeline. A long time they've been trying. We got it right away, and we'll be announcing something very big toward the end of the year. Cory is a champion for the people of Colorado. He loves your state. Look, he loves your state. He was here, he does the tractor thing. He loves tractors, he sells a certain type. And don't worry, if there's any noise, just let them … they won't hear us. And he's got my complete and total support and endorsement. He will never let you down. The unemployment rate among African-Americans, Hispanic-Americans, and Asian-Americans has reached the lowest levels ever recorded. And for women, 71 years, and soon you're going to be hitting the historic number. 71 years, the best numbers in 71 years. African-American and Hispanic-American poverty has plummeted to the lowest rates ever recorded. The unemployment rate for women is going … and I'm telling you, within a very short period of time, you're going to see some statistics coming out on … statistics. I've got to do it right, otherwise they'll say, what's wrong? If you go 16 of these, and if you mispronounce one word, they say, what's wrong? Statistics for women that are going to be unbelievable. They're going to be unbelievable. The best ever. The veterans' unemployment rate dropped to a record low. Workers without a high school diploma have achieved the lowest unemployment ever recorded in U.S. history. Half a million more Hispanic-Americans now own a home. We've lifted 10 million people off of welfare, and median household income is now at the highest level in the history of our country. Think of that. Think of this. To lift up forgotten communities that need investment the most we created with Tim Scott great guy, great Senator from South Carolina, opportunity zones. Jobs and investment are now pouring in to over 125 newly-designated opportunity zones right here in Colorado. You know about that, right? It's been amazing. Opportunity zones are amazing, what's happened. We're supporting working families by fighting for paid family leave and getting it, reducing the cost of child care, and giving 40 million American families an average of $2,200 in their pockets directly thanks to the Republican child tax credit. People don't know that. Our historic regulatory reduction campaign is ending the tyranny of Washington bureaucrats. We repealed the ridiculous waters of the United States rule, which was basically taking away your property. And we are taking the Bureau of Land Management out of Washington, DC. We're just on it, and thank you very much Secretary Bernhardt. Just up here, nice, slim, beautiful looking man. He looks beautiful. When you work with him he's beautiful because he gets it done, and you're moving it and it's headquarters to Grand Junction, Colorado because we believe that the people who manage the lands of the great American west should live right here in the great American west. And we have ended the war on American energy. It was a war, and we're up here and we're doing it. We are right now energy independent, can you believe it? They want to use wind, wind, wind. Blow wind, please. Please blow. Please keep the birds away from those windmills, please. Tell those beautiful bald eagles, oh, a bald eagle. You know, if you shoot a bald eagle, they put you in jail for a long time, but the windmills knock them out like crazy. It's true. And I think they have a rule, after a certain number are killed you have to close down the windmill until the following year. Do you believe this? Do you believe this? And they're all made in China and in Germany. Siemans. And for those of you that want to hear it, when they're making them, more stuff goes up into the air and up into the ozone, the atmosphere. More stuff is going up there, they're making it, ay, ay, ay. And they don't say this, but after a period of time they get tired, they get old, they get rusty, and a lot of the guys say, hey, their useful life is gone. Let's get the hell out of here, and they're all over the place. You look at Palm Springs, California. Take a look. Palm Springs, they're all over the place. They're closed, they're rotting, they look like hell. Every major Democrat running for President wants to entirely eliminate American production of oil and natural gas, crushing Colorado's economy, destroying tens of thousands of Colorado energy jobs and demolishing property values all across the state. They're doing that. Look, you're going to vote for one of these people, probably crazy Bernie. He seems to be leading. Mini Mike, I thought he might come up, but he can't because he can't debate. He wasn't meant for the camera, do we agree? He wasn't exactly great last night. No, I think he lost too last night. Only in Colorado could somebody say that. No, you're going to probably … it looks like Bernie, doesn't it? It looks like crazy Bernie. Crazy Bernie's not big into natural gas and oil, and the things that keep our great factories and plants going. But Colorado voters will never let it happen. We're reversing decades of calamitous trade policies. America lost one in four manufacturing jobs following the twin disasters of NAFTA and China's entrance into the WTO. But under this administration, all of that is changing. The era of economic surrender is over, thank you. It's over. Last month, we ended the NAFTA catastrophe and I signed the brand new U.S-Mexico-Canada agreement into law. Incredible deal. The USMCA is a gigantic victory for farmers, ranchers, and manufacturers all across the great state of Colorado and every other state. Also, something we got that people don't talk about, if you love your children, you don't have to pay estate taxes on your beautiful small farms and businesses. If you love your children, it's great, and if you don't love your children, don't worry about it. Who in the hell knows. If you don't love them, don't leave that beautiful farm to your children. Give it to somebody else, okay? If they don't treat you well, give don't leave them a damn thing. Are you listening, Donnie? Are you listening, Donnie? I also took … no, it is true. That's a big deal. Farmers were leaving their ranch and their farms and their … people were leaving their small businesses to their family and they were being assessed in valued much higher in many cases than it was worth. You couldn't do it. They'd go out … your kids would go out and borrow a lot of money. They'd end up losing their business, losing your farm that was in your family for 150 years. You know what happens. And they're good kids, and maybe they'll never be you. They can't farm like you and maybe they can't any maybe they can, maybe they're better. But you know what? They'd go out and they'd borrow a lot of money and they'd lose the farm. The numbers are staggering. We got rid of it. No more death tax, no more inheritance tax. And I also took the strongest ever action to confront China's massive theft of American jobs. What they've done to us over the years, we were losing 200 billion, 300, 400, 500, not million, billion. Billion. Not million. 500 million would be a lot. We're talking about 500 billion, they were taking it. Our strategy worked. We put tariffs up, 25 percent on the first 250 billion. Billions of dollars poured into the United States. They devalued their currency and they pumped money in. We didn't pay for it despite the fact that these guys … they like to say they did, we didn't pay for it, and I'll tell you what. China- They like to say they did. We didn't pay for it. I'll tell you what, China came to the table, and we made a deal that's great for us and hopefully it's great for them. Last month, as you know, we signed a groundbreaking trade agreement with China that will defend our workers, protect our intellectual property, and boost American exports $250 billion worth of purchases, $50 billion worth of farm agricultural purchase, $50 billion. You know the most they ever purchased were $16 billion. You know that story. I've told it a couple of times. $16 billion was the most ever. Secretary Sonny Purdue agriculture, he's done a great job. I said, "Who's the most? What's the biggest year?" "$16 billion, sir." I said, "All right, make it 20." So they agreed on 20 so now we're getting ready to close the deal, biggest trade deal ever made, biggest deal ever made. We're getting ready to close the deal between that and USMCA. We're getting ready to close it. I go over, I say, "What do you have down for the farmers? They've been great," although I have been helping you out. I gave you a lot of money. I gave you a lot of money. $16 billion on year, $12 billion from the year before. I took it out of the tariffs or we had a lot leftover, but think of it. But I said, "So tell me fellas, let me ask you, what do we have? What's the number?" " 20 billion, sir." They're going to purchase 20 billion worth of farm products. I said, "Make it 50. Tell them to make it 50." So, we went to China and they were great. You know they got 1.5 billion people. You got a lot of feeding to do. I said, "Do me a favor, instead of 20 billion purchased from our farmers, would you make it 50?" "No, no, no, no, no," and they agreed to do it. They agreed to it. I don't think you're going to be able to make it. You better be able to make it. I don't want the farmers coming to me, sir, sir, I'm sorry we can't produce that much, sir. I said, "Our farmers will find a way. They'll go out and buy larger tractors and they'll buy some extra land." Go out and buy a bigger tractor or something. No, but it is true. I've had people say, "Sir, they can't produce that much." I said, "Forget it." They will. Look at them. You're a farmer. They'll figure that one out. Although Mike Bloomberg said you'll never figure it out. They'll figure it out long before him. You'll figure that one out long before him. No, I know the farmers. I'm not worried about it. $50 billion on no issue have Washington Democrats more thoroughly sold out the American people than on immigration. Every day Democrats open border policies are harming and killing innocent lives. This region alone, last year ICE officers arrested over 2000, and by the way, our ICE officers, these guys are tough and they're brave. Over 2000 criminal aliens, that's MS-13 gangs, thousands, and they bring them back to where they came from. By the way, now their countries take them back. They weren't taking them back, safe third agreements. They take them back. Charged or convicted of dangerous offenses including robbery, rape, and murder. We bring them back and in some cases we don't even want to bring them back. We have to put them. I don't want to house them for the next 50 years, but you know what? We don't want to take chances either, but we'll bring them back to Guatemala, Honduras, El Salvador, Mexico. We bring them back. They didn't use to take them. They said, "We don't want them back. Oh, okay, we'll keep them ourselves." We don't do that anymore. In Denver, an illegal alien was recently charged with brutally stabbing a judge multiple times, attempting to murder him his own home. The alien had been arrested 36 times over the past 20 years. Other than that, he was a very fine fellow, for crimes including assault and child abuse, yet somehow they kept letting him go and he was still in our country. In communities across the nation, radical, and we're watching them very closely, left wing politicians are imposing deadly sanctuary cities, and sanctuary states, and policies that compel local law enforcement to release these illegal aliens straight into your beautiful communities. Last year, Colorado Democrats enacted a law declaring this entire state to be a sanctuary for dangerous criminals. As a result of state and local sanctuary policies, officials in Boulder defied federal law enforcement and released a previously deported child molester into the community. In Denver, officials released a criminal alien arrested on felony drug charges, and now he is a very dangerous man. We just caught him for attempted murder. Right here in Colorado Springs, El Paso County officials defied the requests of federal law enforcement and released a criminal alien arrested for robbery, assault, and kidnapping. They released him straight into your community. These are the Democrats. These are your Democrats. Democrats think that Colorado should be a haven for murderers, predators, kidnappers, and felons in our country and that come in illegally. Republicans believe that Colorado should be a sanctuary for law abiding Americans, not criminal aliens. If you want to shut down sanctuary cities and stop sanctuary states, if you want to protect your family and your loved ones, you must vote for Cory, vote for Trump, vote for the Republican party. We're getting it done. Thank you. Thank you very much. Thanks to our tireless efforts to secure the border, we've reduced illegal border crossings for eight straight months in a row. Illegal crossings are down 75% since last spring, and we have ended the horrible practice of catch and release. You know what you do? You catch him. You say, "Where do you live?" They don't live here. They don't have an address. "Where do you live? Give us your address." They don't have an address. Many are criminals. Many are very dangerous criminals. So they're saying, and we are building the wall. It's gone up 122 miles as of yesterday. It's a serious wall. Did you hear? Two weeks ago, a small section, twice the size of this stage, we were putting it up and they're pouring the concrete, and a lot of, it's Mexico, it's very rough territory, some of it. It's partially desert. We were in a rough area, very windy, and we had a tremendous sand and wind storm. So we hadn't put it in. We put it in and it was just getting set, and we got hit with a tornado of wind and it blew it down, and the fake news said Trump's wall fell down. It was blown down. But see, at least we have a voice where we can explain. It's true. We lifted it up and we held it up. When the storm went by, we had it set and it's set beautifully, and the following day, that sucker is going to be up for many, many years. Can you imagine? I said what happened in a certain area, and we're doing a great job by the way, in New Mexico. New Mexico is going to be a great, great state for the Republican party, and Arizona, what we're doing on the border in Arizona, they want us to do it badly. But can you imagine that? A thing falls over because the concrete was just poured, it's soaking wet and it falls over, and they make it sound like the wall fell down. These are very, very dishonest people, but you know that. Border patrol has seized the largest amount of deadly narcotics over the last year ever recorded. It's horrible what's happening, the largest amount ever recorded. We've deported record numbers of gang members, especially the MS-13 gang members, but there are others that are just as bad. We've done more to secure the border than any administration in the history of our country. The border is going to be very soon secured. We'll have, some time next year, over 500 miles of beautiful, powerful wall built. Washington Democrats have never been more extreme taking cues from crazy Bernie Sanders, 132 congressional Democrats have signed up for Bernie's healthcare takeover that would strip 180 million Americans of their great private coverage that you want. While the Socialist Democrats are trying to destroy American healthcare, and trying to destroy your social security, that won't happen with me, my administration is protecting your social security, your Medicare, and is fighting to give you great, great healthcare, already done a good job. We're defending your right to keep the doctor, and to keep the plan of your choice. Remember, President Obama 28 times, he said, "Keep your doctor. Keep your plan. Keep your doctor. Keep your plan. Keep your doctor. Keep your plan." Right? It was a lie. We should impeach him. We should impeach him. Impeach Obama. Get him out of office. No, nobody thought of that. We caught him in a lie 28 times at least. He's on record. We caught him in a lie, but nobody said let's impeach him. Only these maniacs, crazy Nancy Pelosi, crying Chuck Schumer. What about the little pencil neck, right? Pencil neck. He's got the world's smallest neck. Here's a guy that lied about my statement. He made up a statement and he delivered it before a contract. He made up a statement. It was totally fiction. He made it up and then they tell me, you're getting ready to sue him, and they say, "Oh no, he's protected because he made the statement in the halls of Congress." That should be worse. No, that should worse. Little wise guy. We're making healthcare better and much cheaper while premiums more than doubled in the five years before I took office. We're now offering plans that are up to 60% less expensive and they're better. They're better. We're protecting people with pre-existing conditions and we always will. We're fighting to stop surprise medical billing. I signed an executive order imposing price transparency. That's going to be bigger than healthcare in a certain way. Watch the prices come down because when providers are required to show their prices, those same prices fall very, very fast. We have approved a record number of affordable new generic drugs, which are just as good as the name brand drugs, but at a tiny fraction of the cost. We have totally transform veteran's health care, including getting the long sought VA choice and VA accountability. So, now if our veterans have to wait in line, they go out to a doctor, a local doctor, we pay the bill and they're all set. They don't have to wait for six weeks. He's agreeing, right? Good. Right? You don't see those stories. You used to see all these horrible vet stores, veterans, the veterans on television, and you don't see it because veterans choice, it's amazing. Our great veterans, here's a man right here. You're saying, yes. Purple Heart. Thank you. Thank you. That's great. But it's a lot different under Trump, isn't it? A lot different under Trump, and now you go out to a private doctor, but you know, we also got accountability. They've been trying to get these things done for 45, 46, 48 years, couldn't get them done. I'm good at getting things approved. I have to say. But, we also got accountability where we can fire people that aren't taking care of our vets. If somebody isn't doing a good job, you couldn't fire him. Now you look at him, you say, "Get the hell out of here. You're fired." We passed another thing. For 44 years, they've been trying to get it passed, the spectacular Right to Try, where we can use our medicines that are in trial if somebody is terminally ill or very sick, we can use it and we are having tremendous results, Right to Try. I hope that nobody in this room needs it. I hope you don't need it, but if you do, we have the best in the world, and we're seeing amazing results. We're combating the opioid epidemic. Drug overdose deaths have declined for the first time in nearly 31 years. We are pursuing new advances in neonatal research to care for America's youngest patients and breaking all records in so doing. All of the radical Democrats in the Presidential debates have declared their unlimited support for extreme late term abortion, ripping babies straight from the mother's womb, right up until the very moment of birth. You know that. That is why at my State of the Union, I asked Congress to prohibit late term abortion for babies, because republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift from God. The Democrat party is the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late term abortion, socialism, blatant corruption, and the total obliteration of your second amendment. That's what it is. The Republican party is the party of the American worker, the American family, the American dream, and the late great Abraham Lincoln. People forget that. People forget Honest Abe. He's the most presidential guy. I've always said I could be more presidential than anybody, but I'm not sure I can beat Honest Abe when he wears the hat. That hat is too much. It's so easy to be presidential, so easy. It's so much easier than doing what I have to do, but you know what I'd have? I'd have about three people in the front row. How about sleepy Joe? How about his performance? What? What? It's great to be with the great people of Ohio. Joe, Joe, you're in Iowa. You're an Iowa. Oh, wow. He did it five times. So far, I've never done it. Thank you. I've never done it. If I do it, that's a bad sign. Now he does it all the time. He was in New Hampshire and he said he was in Vermont. It's great to be in Vermont. Joe, you're in New Hampshire. Dammit. He'd go up and tell him again and again. Joe, what the hell is wrong with you, Joe? Sleepy Joe. He's sleepy Joe. He was sleepy a long time ago, but now he's really sleeping. But it's easy to be presidential. You know that. The easiest thing you could do is presidential. Never open your jacket. Never. It's got to be buttoned up. Right? Ladies and gentleman, the President of the United States. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you very much. It's so great to be with the people of Colorado. Thank you, everybody. Good night. Good night. No, no. It's so easy. It's so easy, honestly. Look, I did very well with the State of the Union, right? They said it was one of the best. Smart, smart. Smart guy. We do good. We're representing you. I better do good. If I didn't do good, you'd dump me so fast. Actually, I don't think you would dump be so fast, actually. You want to know the thing? She said, "we're never dumping you." Fake news CNN went up to a woman. "What does it take for you to leave the President?" "I'm not leaving him." There were 10 women, and the one woman, beautiful, incredible women, and they had their bandanas, they had hats, Trump, and stupid CNN, they go up, "What does it take for you?" Then he goes, "Look, he said one time that his people are so good, they'd stay with him if he shot somebody in the middle of Fifth Avenue." Do you remember? Right? " Would you stay if he shot somebody?" This is actually an answer, or something to the effect, "Would you say every shot somebody in the middle of Fifth Avenue?" The woman looks, "Well, it depends why he shot him." Makes sense. Depends why he shot him. But then they said, "We're not leaving him. We're never leaving him." We're in thing together, folks. We got the swamp. We got that dirty, rotten swamp. We got crooked politicians. We got a lot of bad people, but we're getting them out one by one. We better be, little Adam Schiff, that little Adam Schiff. What a crooked politician. He's a corrupt politician. Talking about guys, he'll lie and then the next day get caught. He'll be sorry that he got caught. The next day he'll walk up to the mic and say exactly the same thing. He's got no shame. He's got no shame. He's a liar. I think he's a sick person. Republicans are fighting for the citizens from every background, every community, and every walk of life. You know that we're the party of boundless optimism, excitement, energy and enthusiasm. We are asking all Americans to join our incredible movement. We are the big tent. We are the big party. We have the big ideas for the future. Republicans are fighting for school choice, big deal, it's a big deal, because no parents should ever be forced to send their child to a failing government school. To uphold the new rule of law, we have confirmed 217 brand new, beautiful federal judges who will interpret the Constitution as written. That's a record. That is a record that it includes 192 judges who are appointed for a lifetime. So, think of it. If they're 40 years old, if they're 45 years old, they can be there for 40, 50 years. As you know, and by the way, that's a record by a lot. I have the record, but there's one record that probably nobody will get the percentage record. Who has the percentage? Do you know? George Washington, 100%. But it was only 16 people. So, with 217, can you imagine that? It's a record and we're going up. We're going up. The Democrats are thrilled about that one, and as you know, I have nominated and we have confirmed two great new Supreme court justices, Colorado zone, right? Colorado. That's right. Colorado zone, Neil Gorsuch and Brett Kavanaugh. Neil Gorsuch, that's right. Colorado. He's a great guy, too, great guy. Colorado. That's a big thing. That's another great check you have down for count. Neil Gorsuch. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. They said they were going to do it for years. We recognize Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. Our investments in the United States military include more than $300 million this year. Has anyone ever heard of a place called Fort Carson? Another place, Peterson Air Force Base, you know that. Another place, the Air Force Academy, you know that, and Schriever, right, Air Force Base Schriever. Schriever. Was that right? Schriever, right? Schriever, that's a little tricky one. It took me a little while. I'm looking at that sucker. I'm saying, "Schriever, right." Thank you. That's very nice. He saw he was having a little trouble with that one. That's tricky. You don't like to mispronounce a word. You come to a great place like this and instead of calling it Fort Carson, you go at Fort crasson, and they say, "Oh, this guy doesn't know anything about us." No, a lot of money going into Fort Carson. It's great. For years, you watched as your politicians apologize for America. You saw that. Well, I'd like to apologize. We don't apologize. Now you have a President who is standing up for America and we are standing up for the great people of Colorado. At stake in our present battle is the survival of our nation. If you want your children to inherit the blessings that generations of Americans have fought and died for, they wanted to secure these great rights that we all have, then we must devote everything we have toward victory in November of 2020, November 3rd. Only this way can we save the America we love and drain the Washington swamp once and for all. We'll get it finished. We'll get it finished. They're bad people. They're all over the place. They're bad people. With your help, we will lift millions more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence, and poverty to prosperity. You know that. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a fair, safe, sane and lawful system of immigration. We will continue to enact great new trade deals like we've been doing. I'm going to India next week and we're talking trade. They've been hitting us very hard for many, many years, but I really like Prime Minister Modi. We got to talk a little. We've got to talk a little business. They've been hitting us hard. They give us tariffs. One of the highest in the world is India. But I hear they're going to have 10 million people, they say anywhere from six to 10 million people are going to be showing up along the route to one of the largest stadiums in the world, the largest cricket stadium in the world, which is brand new and beautiful. But you know what, and the only problem with doing that, Prime Minister Modi said, "We will have 10 million people greet you." Here's my problem. We have a packed house. We have a lot of people, thousands of people that couldn't get in. It's going to look like peanuts from now on. I'll never be satisfied with the crowd. If we have 10 million people in India, how can I be satisfied if we fill up a 60,000 seat stadium? Big deal. See, I'm getting spoiled. He said, "Build a bigger stadium." That's good. Colorado, very good. But it's going to result in more products proudly stamped with that beautiful phrase Made in the USA. That beautiful phrase. We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine, finding new cures for childhood cancer. They've made such progress, and ending the AIDS epidemic in America. We started a year ago. It should have been started long before in the last administration because they had the technology then. They didn't start it, but we're starting it. We'll have it done within nine years. It's a 10 year process. Think of that. AIDS. we will land the first woman on the moon and become the first station in the world to plant our flag on Mars. You have a lot of that action happening right here. We will defend privacy, free speech, religious liberty, and the right to keep and bear arms. That's a big one. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the sacred values that bind us together as one, beautiful America. We support, protect, and defend the Constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government bureaucracy, are the true American way. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag. We live by the words of our national motto, In God We Trust, from Pueblo to Fort Collins, from Denver to Durango, from Black Forest to Broomfield, from Castle Rock to right here in Colorado Springs, we stand on the shoulders of red blooded American Patriots who poured out their heart, and sweat, and soul, to secure our liberty and defend our freedom. Colorado was founded by pioneers and prospectors, cowboys and miners, and ranchers who tamed the wilderness, explored the west, scaled the Rockies, fought the battles, and helped make this the greatest nation ever to exist on the face of the Earth, and we are making it greater every single day greater than ever before. Proud citizens like you helped build this country and together we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people. With your help, your devotion, and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we are going to keep on fighting, and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. We are one movement, one people, one family and one glorious nation under God. America's thriving like never before, and ladies and gentlemen of Colorado, the best is yet to come. Together we will make America wealthy again. We will make America strong again. We will make America proud again. We will make America safe again, and we will make America great again. Thank you people of Colorado.Thank you. Thank you very much. Hello Dallas. It's great to be with you tonight. Thank you. I am thrilled to be here deep in the heart of Texas where we just opened a beautiful new Louie Vuitton plant. I'm with the freedom loving Patriots of the lone star state. I love it. There has never been a better time to be a proud Texan and there's never a better time to be a proud American. There never has. Never has. I came from a small town, Alvarado, Texas where we celebrated the incredible revival of American manufacturing and we opened up some beautiful places. I'll tell you, this place is doing great and created in a very short period of time an extra 1000 jobs for Texas. Since my election, we've created 775,000 new jobs across your state including 70,000 Texas manufacturing jobs. They said those jobs had disappeared, didn't they? Huh? Hey man, our country is once again living by two simple rules, buy American and hire American. The economy is booming. Our people are prospering. Our country is thriving and our nation is stronger than ever before. But the more America achieves, the more hateful and enraged these crazy Democrats become. Crazy. They're crazy. They're crazy. At stake in this fight is their survival of American democracy itself. Don't kid yourself. That's what they want. They are destroying this country but we will never let it happen. Not even close. For three straight years, radical Democrats have been drawing to overthrow the results of a great, great election. Maybe, maybe the greatest election in the history of our country. They want to oppose an extreme agenda. They cannot pass it and they cannot win it at the ballot box. They're not going to win. The not even going to get … they won't come close in 2020. They know it. They know it. They're not going to win it. They say, let's see. What's another idea? What's another idea? How do we win this election? You know, I really don't believe anymore that they love our country. I don't believe it. Crazy Nancy. Think of that. That crazy Nancy. She is crazy. And shifty Schiff. How about this guy? He makes up my conversation, which was perfect. He makes up my conversation. He sees what I said. It doesn't play well because it was perfect. So he made up a totally false conversation with the Ukrainian president and we caught him cold. Everybody knew it anyway. See, we did one thing. You always have to do the unexpected. They never thought I'd released the conversation with the Ukrainian president. I want to get him before Congress and I want to see what he has to say. You know, they say he has immunity. Why would you have immunity for outright fraud? Why do you have immunity? Why? He's a fraud. We're fighting a campaign against leftist, socialist, and globalists who want to return to reckless wars, open borders, rampant crime, and totally disastrous one way trade deals. We're changing that one around very quickly. They believe America is the world's piggy bank and that your tax dollars should subsidize the economy, military and defense of every other nation in the world but our own. It's not happening anymore. Our political opposition made its fortune selling out our nation and its citizens. And you know that's what's been happening. And that's why 2016 was so important. And that's why 2020, I can never say it's more important, but you know it's like the roots of a tree. You plant the baby tree, it's got to catch, get that extra time. We'll have more tax cuts. We'll have even … I'll tell you what, we have rebuilt our military. What we've done has never been done before. The do nothing democrats have betrayed our country and that great betrayal is over. We are finally again, and we've been doing it now for almost three years. Can you believe we've been doing this for three years? Can you believe it? I've been a politician for three years. I can't believe that. I never thought I'd be called a politician. I don't like it. But it is what it is. But we're finally again putting America first. The radical Democrats want to destroy America as we know it. They want to indoctrinate our children and teach them that America is a sinful, wicked nation. You see that happening all the time. And I know it from personal experience. What they want to teach your kids, not good. They come home, mommy, daddy, this is what I learned. And you're going, oh no, don't tell me. Let's get them into another school fast. They want to disarm law abiding citizens. They want to take your guns away. They want to install far left judges to shred our constitution. It's not happening. They want to tear down symbols of faith and drive Christians and religious believers from the public square. They want to silence your voices on social media and they want the government to censor, muzzle, and shut down conservative voices. You know that. If they didn't hate our country, they wouldn't be doing this to our country. They wouldn't be doing it because they know better. They know better. As an example, we're building a great wall along the Southern border and it's going up rapidly. Going up. And you know, five years ago almost every one of them wanted a wall until I came along and I said, we're going to build a great wall because they could never get it done. Then they stopped the funding. They made it almost impossible. Few people would've been able to do what we did, but we got it from here and we got it from there and we got it from all over the place and we're building that sucker right now and it's having a tremendous effect already. Not easy. Highest level. Everything we said it would be, it's moving rapidly. Although the fake news back there, they don't want to talk about it. They don't want to talk about it. Look at all those cameras. You believe it. Look at all those red lights. Don't worry. I won't say anything bad about your network because a lot of times I get ready to do a number of these phony networks and you know, you see those red lights go off, off, off, off. They don't want their viewers to see it, but that's okay. I'm not going to say it tonight. I'm going to say you're legitimate media. I don't actually mean that. But you look at that. But look at all those cameras. You know that's like the Academy Awards used to be before it failed. You know why it failed? You know why it failed? Because they came after us. That's why it failed. It failed because they had stupid people saying horrible things about us. Stupid. stupid people. They are stupid people and their ratings have dropped like a rocket. I love seeing it. I'm telling you. Love it. But no matter how hard they try, they will fail because the people of Texas and the people of America will never surrender our freedom to those people right there. We will stand strong for family, faith, God, and for country. Last week, a very dumb Democrat candidate for president, that's the end of him in this state, pledged to revoke the tax exempt status of many churches and religious charities. By the way, that was after a few weeks ago. He said, excuse me, we're going to take your guns away. That doesn't work well with me. I called him right. Remember the flailing arms? Nobody noticed it. I noticed it. The flailer. You remember he was flailing all over the place. I said why is this guy hot? John Cornyn's going to win so easily. Just like Ted Cruz won. He's going to win no matter what happens. But John Cornyn is not talking about Beto anymore because Beto, in a few short weeks got rid of guns and got rid of religion. Those are not two good things in Texas to get rid of. I will never allow the federal government to be used to punish Americans for their religious beliefs. I will never allow the IRS to be used as a political weapon, except in the case of myself where they use it against me. The radical left tolerates no dissent. It permits no opposition. It accepts no compromise. These people are crazy. And it has absolutely no respect for the will of the American people. First it was the Russia hoax. Then it was the smearing which continues, that disgraceful, disgusting smearing of a fine man, Justice Kavanaugh. And now they continue the outrageous impeachment witch hunt with nothing. With nothing. They come after me, but what they're really doing is they're coming after the Republican party and what they're really, really doing is they're coming after and fighting you. And we never lose. I'm fighting for everyone who believes in the values, traditions, and principles that have made our nation the greatest in the history of the world. And I have to say this, we are far greater now than ever before. You go back four years, you go back seven, six, eight, even you go back into another administration, you go back 10 and 12 years, where were you compared to where you are right now? We must hold the Democrats accountable for their lies and their corruption. They are corrupt people. And we must show and vote and we have to go out and we have to win this election coming up. It's going to be a landslide and we have to make it a landslide. Today's do nothing democrats, they don't do anything. Where's the USMCA? Everybody wants it. The Democrats even want it and crazy Nancy won't let anybody vote on it. She's nuts. Today's Democrats believe anyone who opposes them must be crushed. It's not just like, let's win. You know, I have to say this. The Republicans said, I'm not sure I like this because my life hasn't been this way, but the Republicans play a much softer game. They really do. When all of our stars, and we have great stars, when they went to our speaker of the house at the time and they asked for subpoenas, oh, let's take it easy. Let's … okay. I mean, I get that too. She hands them out like it's cookies. Here. Subpoena. I heard a commentator who happens to be standing right there the other day. Doesn't like us at all. But said, I've never seen anyone hand out so many subpoenas. I have people getting subpoenas I never heard of. I said, who are those people? Never saw anything like it. It's a disgrace what they're doing to our country. We became, because of what they do, not the Republicans and not what we've done because what they've done and what they see. When people come to my office, which is now the oval office, which is your office too. Presidents, Prime Ministers, Kings, Queens. I hate to say it. Sometimes dictators, they just don't like to go by that title. They say, sir, congratulations sir on what you've done. Congratulations on what you've done. It's incredible. Your economy is the greatest on earth. And let me tell you it, if my crooked opponent would have won the election right now China would be by far the number one nation from an economic standpoint in the world. We've gone up trillions of dollars. They've gone down trillions of dollars, and we are so far number one, so far that they'll never catch us if we are smart right here. But the do nothing Democrats believe anyone who opposes them has to be crushed. They don't want to just beat them. They don't want to just beat him. These are sick people. They want to crush these people. The anger, the hatred, and that any lie or crime or corruption is justified so Schiff gets up and makes up my statement. He makes it up 100% and then he said he didn't speak to the whistle blower. No, we didn't see the whistleblower. And what about the whistleblower? The whistleblower got it all wrong. Who's the whistleblower? Who's the whistleblower? Who is the whistleblower? We have to know. Is the whistleblower a spy? And who is the IG that did this? All he had to do is look at the tape or look at what they wrote down, the transcribed version of the phone call. Compare that to the whistle blower's account and you see it had nothing to do with it. So why does the IG allow a thing like this to happen to our country? Why? Why? Got a lot of bad people out there, but one by one we're advancing. One by one. Just look at the terrible foreign corruption of the Bidens. I hate to talk about him. You know why? I don't think the guy's got a chance. Sleepy Joe. I don't think he's got it. I don't see it. I don't know. I've got these great, brilliant senators over here. I have all these congressmen over here. Fellows I don't think he has a chance. I'd like him to. I'd like him to. You know I thought Pocahontas was gone, left in embers. You got to give her credit. Those embers, they kept going, going, going. Now it looks like she's doing better. But I don't think Joe has a chance. But did you see the other night where CNN, in a totally unsubstantiated statement, the president said this about you. We're so sorry he said that. His son walked out with a billion and a half dollars from China. These were not the same Chinese people I just dealt with. I will tell you that. But Joe Biden was in charge of Ukraine policy while his son with absolutely no energy experience just got thrown out of the Navy like a dog, was paid massive sums of money by a Ukrainian energy company. You know that's called? It's called a payoff, folks. He didn't no energy at all, knew nothing about energy. They hired him, paying him massive amounts of money, much more than the $50,000 a month you heard about. That's a lot. That's a lot. But much more. Joe Biden made them go out and fire the prosecutor on tape. But they don't want to show the tape. I had to put it up on my social media site. They don't want to show the tape where he was bragging. You're not going to get this money unless they get rid of … and boom, they got rid of the prosecutor. He was investigating the son and the son's company. Got rid of him. Now that's what you call quid pro quo. While these charges are totally unsubstantiated. These are the fake newsers out there. And then Biden flew. Think of it. He goes into a tough place. We just met such a great deal with China. Just think of this. My guy said, if we could get 20 billion in agricultural product, that would be good. The most China ever did was 16 billion for our farmers. Okay. We're just talking about the farmers. We did banking. We did everything. But we're talking about them. The most they ever did was 20 billion of product from our farmers. Our great farmers. Our patriot farmers. Our farmers that never left us even though they were being targeted by China. They never left me. So they wanted 20 in China agreed. I said, nope, no good. I want 50 billion, not 20 billion. 50. So my guys say, sir, we have a problem, sir. Our farmers cannot produce that much. It's true. I said, tell them to go out and get bigger tractors, right? John Deere case, Caterpillar, all American. Only American tractors. We only buy American tractors. Go out and get bigger. So now China's agreed. They've already started buying. Hopefully the agreement gets signed sometime prior to a big summit that we have with president Xi and others in Chile. That's in about four weeks. But they give this. They said, sir, they can't produce $50 billion. I said, I want the farmers to tell me … remember the story about winning? We're going to win so much. We're going into the White House. We're going to tell the president, sir, we just can't stand winning. The state of Texas, John Cornyn and Ted Cruz, they're going to come into my office. Sir, we just can't stand this winning in Texas anymore. It's too much. We can't handle it. Well, that's what I want from the farmers. I want the farmers to say. I want the farmers to say, sir, we just can't produce that much product. We can't do it, sir. And I'm going to say yes, you can. And they're going to say, no, we can't. I'm going to say yes you can. And they're going to go out and they get to take in 50 billion from China as opposed to 20. That's what's going to happen. That's what's going to happen. But they were great. They stuck with us through thick and thin. Now it's really working out for a lot of different groups. In the meantime we've taken in tens of billions of dollars of tariffs and China's eaten the cost because they devalued their currency and they put money out. Tens of billions of dollars. It's cost us nothing. Billions and billions and billions. You know what I did for the farmer? During the lean times, I gave them 16 billion last year and 12 billion the year before. $28 billion altogether came out of the tariffs that I had a lot of money leftover and nobody complained. You know our farmers didn't want that money. Our farmers didn't want it. True story. Everybody comes for money. Countries come for … everybody wants money, right? They all want our money. The farmers said, sir, we don't want this money. It's a subsidy. We don't want it. I said, no, it's not a subsidy. You're being targeted unfairly. They said, no, sir, it's a subsidy. This is true. I had 35 farmers in the oval office. Incredible people. They didn't want it. They said, sir, just give us a level field. So now I gave them a field that's more than level. It's level like this. Nice and easy. Nice and easy. But the farmers, I call them the great patriots the farmers. I never lost them. They always said, yeah, I'm in trouble. I got a problem. But this should have been done many, many years ago by other presidents and other leaders. And we lose for many years $500 billion a year with China and many other countries we lose billions. We lose with everybody. But that's all changing now. But we lose 500 billion, not million. 500 millions is a lot, right? We lose 500 billion. And you know what? It's a disgrace that that was allowed to go on for 25 years. It was a disgrace. Disgrace. But now we're taking in billions of dollars. They've had the worst year they've had in 27 years and we're having the best year we've ever had. So that's good. That's good. So Biden flew with Hunter on Air Force 2. They flew to China. Hunter walked out of the plane, had a quick meeting, walked away with one and a half billion dollars. These characters back there said, oh, that's okay. There's no problem. Can you imagine if Don or Eric Trump or Ivanka Trump, who's here someplace … right here. And by the way, our great First Lady is home watching this. She said, this is the most exciting thing I've seen in a long time. You're a great First Lady. Doing a great job. She's doing a great job. We're doing a great job. The whole country now is doing a great job. So Biden takes 1,500,000,000 and he goes on and he allows China to rip us off. Remember he said a year ago? No, no, China's good. They've done nothing wrong. They are wonderful people. They are all wonderful people. I don't blame China, by the way. I blame our leaders for allowing this horrible, you know what and pillage. It's the R word. You know what and pillage. You know what word I'm talking about, right? I don't want to use it because they'll say it's a horrible word that Trump used. So the Biden's got rich while America got robbed. Tonight we forcefully condemn the blatant corruption of the Democrat party and nobody ever pays the price with the Democrats. They're so deep seeded. They never pay the price. They never pay. But maybe soon that will start. You know, we've had a lot of, we've had a lot of Obama people and Clinton people and some, to be honest with you, we've had some pretty bad Republicans down deep that didn't exactly love us. But slowly they're getting out. They have all sorts of protections. He says get rid of them. Yeah, we're trying. Get rid of them. But their partner in the whole thing is the fake news media. That's the problem. Because the Democrats and the fake news media, it's a partnership. Remember that. And you see it all the time, and I've never seen it to this extent. You know, when I won in the primaries and then I won the election, I was treated horribly by the media, horribly. And then when I won the election, we had the greatest night, one of the highest rated nights in the history of television all over the world. And I won. And I said, oh, the great thing. I said to Ivanka, I said to the first lady, I said to anybody that would listen, I said, listen, this is so great. Finally, finally, we, all of us, we're going to be respected by the media. And you know what happened? They got worse. They're worse now than they ever have been. They're crooked as hell. They're worse now than they've ever been. They're crooked. The only message these radicals, and they are radical lefties, will understand is a crushing defeat on November 3rd, 2020. Save that date. With your help, we will win back the house. We … With your help, we will win back the House, we will keep the Senate, and we will keep the White House in numbers like they haven't seen in a long, long time. Joining us tonight are many terrific Republican leaders, and they are terrific. And frankly, if they're not, I'm not going to introduce them, okay? But we have some great leaders, and you have great leaders in Texas. Great leaders, and they love Texas. A friend of mine, a guy that a lot of people weren't so sure, we had this unbelievable relationship. In fact, when Ted Cruz held a rally in Washington, he said, "Could you come to my rally?" And everybody thought, these people thought that was strange. They said to me, "Well, when is the fighting between these two?" Because we really like each other. "When's the fighting going to start?" Right, Ted? They said, "When is the fighting going to start? And I said, "Don't worry, it'll start. And when it does, it's going to be vicious." And it was vicious, and now we love each other again. He's great. Ted Cruz. And he had a great victory against a man that spent almost $100 million dollars. That's a lot of money. Spent almost $100 million, but that was a great victory. Thank you, Ted. Another man who's currently running against somebody. I kept thinking maybe Beto will jump in because he's at zero right now. We hope he's going to jump in. Remember, no religion and no guns. I think that's not good. Oh, and I think he's like pretty light on oil production too. But a man and John, I have no idea who you're running against, but nobody's going to be able to beat John Cornyn. He's a good man, you're good man, thank you, John. And we have a lot of Congress people here. We have a woman who's fantastic, who has been a fan of ours right from the beginning, Kay Granger. Thank you, Kay. We have a man who's smart as hell and he is tough and he is mean and nasty, but he loves this state and he's only mean and nasty because he wants to defend you and me and all of the horrible things that we all go through, Louie Gohmert. Louie, he's a great guy, been a great friend of mine. I'll tell you once we got him on board, he wouldn't leave us no matter what. And he had Mueller and everybody figured out long before anybody else had it figured out, right, Louie? A person who's been an incredible ally, again, loves your state, Randy Weber. Thank you Randy. Great job, thank you. One of the best lawyers you'll ever find. He's slick, he's smooth, but boy he's loyal, he's talented and he's got them all buffaloed because they're not as good as him, John Ratliff, thank you John. A man I saw on television last night defending me, brilliantly defending me. I actually don't like doing this usually, but I tweeted out, I said, "Thank you very much Brian Babin. That was a great defense, I appreciate it." Thank you Brian, that was great last night. See I put a tweet out because it's easier than making a phone call and talking for a half hour, thanks Brian. I just said thanks. And you know what, he'd rather have that too actually, right? And Lance Gooden, special person, Lance Gooden,, thank you Lance. Thank you, Lance. And Lance was one of 60 people that stuck in there, he was unbelievable. And Ron Wright, thank you, Ron. Great job. Great job. These are great people. These are great people along with Republican party chairs and all of these total winners. Here's one, Ronna McDaniel, I'll tell you what, you know, Ronna was the head of Michigan. Michigan hadn't been won by a Republican for decades and it was tough. They all said you couldn't win Michigan. I said, "Why? We're getting these massive crowds, why"? And she was in charge of Michigan and I said, "I want you to do me a favor. Find out who this woman is. She's driving me crazy. She calls me, Just one more trip, sir, one more trip. Who is she? Who is she?" And it was Ronna and we won the State of Michigan, we won. And when it came time, when it came time to picking somebody to head the RNC, Republican National Committee, I said, "What about that woman that drove me crazy from Michigan?" And it was Ronna and she's done a fantastic job. Thank you, thank you, Ronna. Thank you, she's fantastic. And a great governor from your state, he's a great, great man and a friend of mine. And together with your Lieutenant Governor Dan Patrick. Well you had a hurricane, two years ago now. They still keep calling me for money. "Sir, could you give us another?" When the governor called up, Dan was there, "Thank you for being so generous to Texas, sir, the hurricane." It was a big one, it was a bad one. A lot of water dump. I think the biggest dump of water, remember kept going in and out, in and out. Our Coast Guard saved 16,000 lives. But it kept going in and out, water, water. And finally I get a call. I paid billions and billions of dollars to the state. Like numbers, my people are driving me crazy. I get a call from the governor and Dan is there. Where's Dan? Is he here? Where's Dan? Dan, Dan Patrick. And the two of them call me. And then I had Ted Cruz on my back and I had John Cornyn on my back and I had the Congressman calling and it was brutal, it wasn't even fair. And they said, "Sir, thank you for being so generous on the hurricane." They made a fortune. You made a fortune on the hurricane. "Thank you for being so generous, sir. Sir, we want one more small request, just a small, it's not much and we appreciate your listening to us. We want to build a dam in the ocean so that if we ever have another hurricane, sir, the water won't be able to come into Houston and all of the areas that have came into, sir, do you think we could do it? I said, "How much? It's only $10 billion. $10 billion!" Right Ted, right? $10 billion they wanted, 10. And you know the way they sell it and it's so good they're salesman, they're incredible salesman. They say it's only 10 billion. I'm supposed to be happy. Oh, let's see, could we give Texas an extra 10 billion for some, crazy thing that may work and it may not, right? No, they're great people. They love your state. RNC, co-chairman, Tommy Hicks, a real friend of ours. Thank you, Tommy. And our great campaign manager, the most sophisticated man with a computer you've ever seen. Remember they used to say with Hillary, her campaign is so sophisticated. Then after she lost, they said, Trump's campaign was so sophisticated. And remember she spent like six times more on this stuff than we did. You know the old days, my father taught me, if you can spend less, that's a good thing not a bad thing, right? My father said, if you can spend less. So we spent much less then Hillary, crooked Hillary, crooked Hillary. Where are those emails, Hillary? They may find those 33,000 emails. They're looking, they may find those deleted emails. They may find them. Remember the emails, 33,000 emails covering her gym and her daughter's wedding, 33,000 that's a lot of emails for a wedding and working out. But Brad Parscale did a great job. Thank you, Brad, thank you. Thank you, Brad. And Secretary of Commerce, one of the legends of Wall Street, he was really like amazing and he is doing an incredible job, Wilbur Ross. Thank you, Wilbur. Smart guy. And a friend of mine, he's another one. He was so tough. He was nasty, man. Boy, he hit me during the campaign. I said, "That guy's ruthless." And when it was sort of over, there was nobody more gracious and I called him, I made him Secretary of Energy, he's done a phenomenal job. And Rick Perry couldn't have done a better job, truly, truly. And he's going to be leaving at the end of the year and probably coming back here. Whatever he does it's going to be successful. But he spent three years with us and I want to thank you, Rick, what a job you done, thank you. What a job he's done. He was also a great governor of Texas that you know. In everything we do, we're fighting for the faithful citizens of this country. This includes putting a stop to the catastrophic era of endless wars. Endless wars, they don't stop. They don't stop. They go on forever. We become policemen. We end up becoming police, were policing these countries. That's not what it's about. We've spent eight trillion dollars in the Middle East. Thousands of American soldiers have lost their lives. Tens of thousands more have been severely wounded, and in all fairness, the other side has lost millions of people. Millions, millions of people, think of it. These wars brought mass chaos, instability, destruction and death. Today we choose a different path. We had tremendous success today. I don't know if you've seen it. We built in the last three years, we built the strongest military by far. And I told this story, I was embarrassed to tell it, but now I'll tell, when I first got in, a general told me we could've had a conflict with someone said, "Sir, we don't have ammunition." And I said, "I never want to hear a president … I just never want to hear somebody have that statement made to them again as President of the United States, we don't have ammunition." Think of how bad. Now we have so much ammunition we don't know what to do with it. And as you all know, I guess you've been watching today. I sent Vice President Pence and Secretary of State Pompeo to lead an American delegation to meet with President Erdogan of Turkey. They got there today and it did work. Without spilling a drop of American blood, not one drop of American blood. We've all agreed on a pause or a ceasefire in the border region of Syria and it was unconventional what I did. I said, "They're going to have to fight a little while. Sometimes you have to let them fight a little while. Then people find out how tough the fighting is." These guys know right up here, these guys know, right? Sometimes you have to let them fight like two kids in a lot. You got to let them fight and then you pull them apart. But it was unconventional, but they fought for a few days and it was pretty vicious. And the Kurds, who are our friends and Turkey's our friend. But they fought, it was tougher. I mean it was nasty and you couldn't make a deal for 15, think of it, for 15 years, 20 years, they couldn't make a deal. The Kurds didn't want to move. Turkey didn't want to budge, and Turkey was having a lot of bad things happen from this region. In all fairness to Turkey, they were having a lot of bad, but they didn't … Now all of a sudden they're fighting and it's not fun having bullets going all over the place. And we went there and we said, we want to pause, and the Kurds have been terrific. They're going to move back a little bit. We're going to keep ISIS all nice and locked up, okay. We're going to find more of them. And Turkey's all set and President Erdogan one was great and we're going to take the worst sanctions and tariffs and everything that I put on the country, we put the worst, I mean, I don't think they could have economically survived, but that doesn't matter. President Erdogan was a gentleman. He understood it, but without a little tough love. You know what tough love is, right? Without a little tough love, they would have never made this deal. President Obama lost a million people in the area, a million people, a million people. So now we're doing a five day period, we're going to see if we can get it all finalized and I think it will be, I think it will be. So Turkey's going to be happy. The Kurds are going to be happy, ISIS is going to be unhappy. We'll deal with whoever we have to deal with, but we'll get it done. And it's a great tribute to a lot of very talented people and thank you to Vice President Pence and thank you to Mike Pompeo. Good job, good job and they're traveling back to our country by night. They're traveling back and they'll be back soon and we'll have a big conference on it. But it was a terrific thing and we've taken care of a lot of religious persecution. We added that in. A lot of things are in that agreement that nobody ever thought possible. So we have to fundamentally change our approach to Homeland Security as an example. In that example, nobody would've ever done that. You have to be a little bit different to do it that way. I took a lot of heat, even from some of our Congressman, even from some of our Senators, but now they're all happy and I'm happy with them. I'm happy with them. Now, I don't know what about the Democrats? The Democrats will say, "Oh, what a terrible …" Anything we do the Democrats will criticize. If I said, like on the China deal, "We get Beijing for one dollar." They would say, "What a terrible deal." It just doesn't work with them. You know the wall. We spend so much time with them on the wall and I realized about two weeks ago, all I had to do is say, "We will never build a wall." And they would have come through and they said, "We demand that you build it." It would have been so much easier, right. Would have been so much easier, Ted, would've been so much easier. American combat troops should not be at the center of ancient sectarian conflicts all over the world. Bring our soldiers back home. Bring our soldiers back home. The same people pushing us to fight endless wars overseas want us to open our borders to mass migration from these war torn and terror afflicted regions. Their policies would import terrorism right onto our shores with American issued visas. Oh, isn't that wonderful? And by the way, the Democrats want open borders. They want everybody to flow in. They want those caravans to flow in, the caravans. And they wouldn't get rid of the loopholes. But you know what? Mexico's been great. Mexico today had 27,000 soldiers on our border and we've stopped this horrible migration of people. And many of them are bad people. You know when countries send them up, they're not sending their finest, okay, use your heads, they're not sending their finest. You've got to see some of the people. But now we send them back. And by the way, ICE is fantastic. They've taken out thousands and thousands of MS-13 killers. They've taken thousands of killers and brought them back. And now we've made deals with Guatemala and Honduras and El Salvador and Mexico. But we've made deals now where we can bring back, there are 45,000 people waiting in Mexico. But it's going to be very tough for these people ever to get back. When did you ever hear that? Used to have no people waiting in Mexico. They just flooded. Our borders are getting strong. When the wall is complete, there'll be as strong as any borders anywhere in the world. My administration believes in a simple principle, the best way to keep foreign terrorists out of America is deny them, just deny them admission in the first place. It's really pretty simple. And that is why I have imposed, and we had passed and we won at the United States Supreme Court, a travel ban on some of the world's most dangerous countries and places. But if Democrats seize power, they would throw the floodgates wide open, wide open. We would have people coming into our country, look at what's going on in California and the people of California don't want it, they say, come into California. We'll give you free healthcare, free education. Why wouldn't … I may even move to California if they keep going. No, but all it does is it brings everybody in. What's wrong with these people? We're rebuilding our military stronger than ever before and we are not going to deplete it again on stupid, senseless, endless wars. We've invested more than two and a half trillion dollars restoring our armed forces and all of it was built in the USA and that includes approving the construction of almost 200 F-35 fighters, stealth, stealth. And many of them are built right here, right here. You know that right, in Fort Worth. As we restore our security, we're also restoring our prosperity. America is winning again and America is respected again. And by the way, I have to say this, so outside they have close to 30,000 people. And I wonder if I could ask the Fire Marshal, fill up this little area, let them in, it would be so nice. You know they have a certain max, we broke the record tonight. Good place. Last month, unemployment reached its lowest level in 51 years. Seven million Americans have been lifted off food stamps since the election. What a great … One point three million children have been lifted out of poverty, think of that. And African American, Hispanic American and Asian American unemployment rates have reached the lowest levels in history. Our great Hispanic American population has reached a poverty level, which is a all time low in U.S. history. And after years of stagnation, wages for Hispanic Americans are rising fast, up nearly eight percent since my election and everybody in the fake news would have said that's absolutely impossible. Medium income, think of this, median income for Hispanic Americans has surpassed $50,000 a year for the first time ever. With Republicans in Congress, we passed the largest package of tax cuts and reform by far in American history. By the way, the Democrats want to raise your taxes, you know. I don't mean a little bit. I don't mean a little bit. I mean like double them up, triple them up and it's still won't pay for the nonsense they want. We eliminated a record number of regulations and we ended the war on a thing called American energy, which is very good for Texas. Since my election, natural gas production in Texas has increased 35% and oil production has increased by 60%, six oh. And the United States is now the number one producer of oil and natural gas anywhere in the world, world. Yet every major Democrat running for president wants to abolish all production of oil and natural gas. I think they want to go to windmills, windmills, you know. "Darling, I want to watch Trump speak tonight. We can't darling, the wind isn't blowing." They want windmills. In other words, they want to annihilate your Texas economy. Can you imagine? No more oil, no more natural. So here we have a few people, right? No guns, no religion, no oil, no natural gas. Abraham Lincoln could not win Texas under those circumstances. Couldn't do it, couldn't do it, Ted. Couldn't do it, Louis. Abraham Lincoln, Honest Abe, couldn't do it, Louie, right? Remember I used to say I can be more presidential, look. I've always said I can be more presidential than any president in history except for Honest Abe Lincoln when he's wearing the hat. That's tough, that's tough. That's a tough one to beat. No, it's much easier, being presidential is easy. All you have to do is act like a stiff, look. Remember the last election, they said these phonies in the back, they said, Texas is in play. They said you'd toss in play too. And I came here, we had rallies like this. Thousands of people outside that couldn't get in. And I said, "Why is Texas in play?" They say because it's voting, it's suppression. They try and get your hopes down. They're suppressed. This is just like fake news. But they said Texas, they said Texas is in play. "Ladies and gentlemen, Texas is play. This is CNN, Texas is in play. President Trump …" And I had guys on from Texas and they're wearing cowboy hats. Sid and a lot of guys. They go, "I don't know about you, but I know something about Texas and Donald Trump is not going to lose Texas. I can tell you that and Texas is not in play." 00 o'clock and usually they have to take hours and sometimes at least even if it's big, they take a half an hour. The Texas polls have closed and usually if it's close, it takes hours. And if it's not even just like so close, it takes a long time. So they go, "Ladies and gentlemen, the polls have closed in the State of Texas. Donald Trump has won the State of Texas. Right, Donald Trump." And we won by a lot. We won by a lot. And we won Florida and we won South Carolina and we won Georgia and we won North Carolina and we won Pennsylvania. We won a lot. Remember these phony people, there is no way to get to 270 you had to get to … So I kept going to Maine. I love Maine, but Maine too, you get one. It's cut in half. Maine too you get one. I went there four or five times because … They got me up, the phonies, they got me up to 269, couldn't get to 270 so I went … I won, by the way, I won Maine too. I got one. But I went there and I went there a lot. That's the beautiful thing about the electoral college, you go everywhere. You don't just spend the three … winning the popular vote would be much easier. I'd rather have that. I'd go to four states and relax. I went to 21 States. I used to be a believer in the other, but I think winning … It's like you're a track star. You're working out for the a hundred yard dash or the mile, it's a different form of training. It's a different form. But we did great. They said he cannot get to 270 and they were right. We got to 306. After decades of economic surrender, I have taken historic action to confront China's- … have taken historic action to confront China's rampant trading abuses, and we've made great progress. And our relationship with China is fantastic, and great things are happening. You watch. They get it now. They get it. And a lot of good things are happening. We're replacing NAFTA with disastrous, I mean, it's been, to me, probably … I used to call it the worst trade deal in history. I think the World Trade has been … WTO, what a real beauty, the World Trade Organization. That's a real beauty. They consider China a developing nation. And because you're a developing nation, Ted, right? They consider China to be a developing nation, and because they're developing, they get tremendous … And we wrote them letters. We don't consider them to be a developing nation. We don't consider India to be a develop… because they're ripping us off. And we didn't win any cases at the WTO, and now we just won $7.5 billion of countries that were taking taking advantage of us. And we've won a lot of cases lately. We didn't win anything for years practically. Now we've won a lot of cases. You know why? Because they know I'll leave if they don't treat us fairly. They know it. And then the piggy bank is gone where they all rob from. We're replacing the NAFTA disaster. And we have to get this crazy Nancy Pelosi to put this thing up for a vote. We have to get her. And the USMCA is a giant victory for Texas farmers, ranchers, manufacturers, workers, and oil. The Democrats should pass it, overwhelmingly. They will. But Nancy has to put it up for a vote. Do-nothing Democrats. They're do-nothing. Nowhere is the Democrat betrayal of our nation more dramatic than on immigration. In recent debates, did you see these debates? Do you believe what I'm competing with? I don't know, when I had to compete with Ted Cruz, that was brutal. He was the national debate chamption, a story I've never told. I never did that before, right? I ran for office. All of a sudden, I'm supposed to be debating tomorrow night.  "Who are these people?" The hell, I don't know all of them. I know a lot of them. I contributed to a lot of them. They used to treat me very nice when I contributed to them. Not so nice when I was their opponent, that changed a lot.  "Let me see, I want to see, who are these people?" I'm going to a debate. I never debated. My whole life has been a debate, but I never debated with a podium, and this, and that.  "Who are they?" And we had 17 people, plus me. We had 18. It was actually not 17, it was 18. Remember Gilmore? Nobody remembers him. But we had 18 people. I said, "Who are these people? Are they any good at debating?" And I hired a debate coach, and he lasted for about 10 minutes.  "This guy knows less than I do." He didn't know anything. He didn't know anything, it's true. He said, "Never ever interrupt while they're speaking."  "Okay, coach. Put me in, coach." And after a couple of those statements, I mean … I mean, you can't beat Ted Cruz if you don't interrupt him. It's impossible. But my first … It's true. So I see, "Let me see the cards. Let me see the whole thing. I want to see it. I need help. I'm going to be debating in front of millions of people." And everyone's saying, "Do you think Trump's going to be able to debate professionally?"  "Let me see these cards."  "You know, he was president of his class. One guy was a good debater in college. He was this, he was okay." But they give me the first card, Ted Cruz, and it says, "National debate champion from Princeton." Is that right? And then, "National debate champion from Harvard."  "My potential first lady, I got a problem."  "Some of these guys are okay. They were only president of the class." Almost all of them ran for president of the class. I never did. I liked playing baseball better. But I said, "Melania," and I called Ivanka, I called my kids, I said, "I got a problem. Ted Cruz was the national debate, he was the number one guy in college. He was the number one guy in law school. How the hell do I beat a guy that's that good at debating?" But we came out okay, Ted. And Ted, Ted was tough. Smart as hell and tough. Tough. Good man. But it is true. The first card I looked at, seriously, it was Ted Cruz. And he was literally, I mean, national debate, he was the best in all of college and in law school. And he's a talented guy. No, he says. I don't think so. Every single Democrat candidate for president raised their hand in favor of giving free healthcare to all illegal aliens. They want to give more to illegal aliens than they give to American citizens. You see that. As president, I will never allow the Democrats to take away your healthcare dollars and give them to people that are in our country illegally. Can't do it. In fact, I just signed an executive action to protect American healthcare benefits for all American citizens. Among those hardest hit by illegal immigration are millions of legal immigrants right here in Texas, including millions of patriotic, hardworking Mexican-Americans who play by the rules, pay their taxes, follow our laws, and strengthen our communities. Whether you are a first-generation or tenth-generation, and every American citizen, and you do, you've been treated so badly. But you're not being treated badly anymore. You know? We got rid of the individual mandate from crazy Obamacare. Every American citizen deserves a government that defends your jobs, your safety, your family, your borders, and is always loyal to you for a change. We're loyal to you. My administration has reduced illegal border crossings by over 60% since May. And that's with no help from the Democrats. They won't close up the loopholes. They won't close the loopholes, and we could do it in 15 minutes. And we're building the wall and we're doing all of these things, but the Democrats won't close up the loopholes. You know what the loopholes are, right? How about catch and release? You catch them. You say, "Hello, darling, how are you? Could you please give us your name and phone number?" They don't have a phone. "Could you give us your address?" They don't want to have That have a phone? Could you give us your address? They don't want to have an address that's in Honduras. "Could you please give us your address and your name?" They can't. They say, "That's okay. We catch and we release," and they go into our country. And then we are getting them out of the country. And you know what? Some are very good people. Some are unbelievably dangerous and bad people. And we're focusing on the bad and they're getting the hell out of our country. Okay? While we're fighting for shared priorities, the American people, the Democrat Party has never been farther outside of the mainstream. They've gone nuts. Every Democrat running for president is pushing a healthcare agenda that would utterly eviscerate Medicare. My administration will always protect Medicare for our beloved seniors. And we will always protect patients with pre-existing conditions. Our ambitious campaign to reduce the price of prescription drugs has produced the largest decline in drug prices in over 51 years. People don't talk about it. The press will not talk about it. We have news conferences. We tell them this, they will not put it in the press. You have no idea how dishonest the media is. You have no idea. Virtually every top Democrat also now supports late-term abortion, ripping babies straight from the mother's womb right up until the moment of birth. And that crackpot governor from Virginia executes the baby after birth. You saw that, right? After birth. You remember that one from last year. That's why I've asked Congress to prohibit extreme late-term abortion, because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift from God. Democrats are now the party of crazy politicians, high taxes, high crime, open borders, late-term abortion, socialism, and blatant corruption. They're corrupt, like Schiff is corrupt. He's corrupt. The Republican Party is the party of the American worker, the American family, and it's the party of the American Dream. It's also the party of Honest Abe Lincoln. We forget that. We got to use that more often. Don't you think? Honest Abe. I liked Honest Abe. We've confirmed … He says "Honest Donald." Thank you. Explain that to them. You're right. We've confirmed 152 federal judges to apply the law as written, including two Supreme Court justices, Neil Gorsuch and Brett Kavanaugh. When I got into office, they say the most important thing a president can do, I actually think it's defense, but they say is the appointment of federal judges. So when I got in, always, when you get in, there are none. " How many do you have?" "I have none. None." So I got to, I say, "How many federal judges do I have?" "Sir, you have 142 federal judges." "No, you don't understand the question." That's impossible. That would mean that President Obama didn't appoint 142 judges. You get none. Or you're doing a bad job as president because you're representing a different philosophy. Very different.  "Actually, sir, the number is 142. We were right the first time."  "Obama was … He's such a wonderful president." How are you a wonderful president when the most important thing you can do, you handed over to the Republicans. 142. How is that good? I mean, how is that good? If I were a Democrat, I wouldn't be too happy about that number. And we'll have a record number of judges by the time our term is over in 16 years, maybe 20. I'm only kidding. I'm only kidding because every time I do that, they say, "See, he's assuming control." We have this crazy guy on television. And he goes, "You know …" he's talking to a guest, he goes, "You know he's going to win, don't you? You know he's going to win." I mean, we've done a good job. He should be happy. But he said, " Our military, our schools, our this, everything." He says, "You know he's going to win." And the guest goes, "Well, no, we're going to fight. We're going to fight." "No, no, he's going to win. And you know he's never leaving. You know that, don't you? He's never leaving. He's never going to leave." And I thought this wacko was kidding. He's a comedian. I thought he was kidding. He's serious. He really believes that. We passed, for the veterans, VA Choice and VA Accountability on behalf of those great people. They've been trying to pass it for almost 50 years. They couldn't get it done. But those guys right there, and me, we got it done. And to protect American security, I withdrew the United States from the horrible one-sided Iran nuclear deal. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. And we also recognized Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. For years, you watched as your politicians apologized for America. You've seen it many times. "Oh, I'm so sorry." Now you have a president who's standing up for America and standing up for your great state of Texas.  about you. I'm doing this for you. You know, we had, in 2016, I really believe it was maybe the greatest election. I guess George Washington was good, right? But that was easy. And by the way, he did even better percentage-wise in judges than I did. He had 100%. but we could have 50%. That's not bad. And I had many more than he had. So I guess you got to give George Washington, what do you think, Ted, you got to give him something? I'd say Honest Abe, that was a pretty good election, right? Andrew Jackson, they say ours topped Andrew Jackson. But Andrew Jackson was a good election. But we had among the greatest elections of all time. But we have to now cement that election. We got to cement it. And once we do, it's going to be very hard to take this beautiful experiment apart. That'll be very hard. Because it's all about your family. It's all about your future. And it's all about the future fate of our great country. So important. With your help, we will lift millions of more citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence, and poverty to prosperity. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a safe, modern, fair, and lawful system of immigration. And by the way, thank you, Robert Jeffress, for being here, wherever you may be in this massive … Wherever you are, Robert. Where is he? He got up, he started saying, "He may not be the greatest person." I said … This is like four years ago, I see this guy, what a mouthpiece, this guy. And he's a man of God.  "He may not be the greatest, he may not be the most perfect Christian. He may not know the Bible as well as some of us, but he's a leader. And I love Donald Trump."  "Who is that guy? I love that guy." Robert Jeffress. Wherever. He's a great guy. Got a big, big group of people on Sunday mornings too, I can tell you. We will enact trade deals that result in more products proudly stamped with those beautiful words, that beautiful phrase, I love it, "Made in the USA." We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine, finding new cures for childhood cancer and ending the AIDS epidemic in America in less than 10 years. We're doing that. Who would have believed we could do that? We're doing that. And the previous administration spent no money on that, and we're spending a lot. But think of that. Who would have thought that we're going to end, within 10 years, the AIDS epidemic in our country? Who would have thought we've advanced that far? We will defend privacy, free speech, free assembly, religious liberty, and the right to keep and bear arms. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the values that unite people all across our land and throughout the great state of Texas. This is a great state. We support, protect, and defend the Constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. Thank you. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government and bureaucracy, are the true bedrocks of our society. We believe in the creeds of self-reliance, personal responsibility, and American independence. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and always respect our great American flag. Loyal citizens like you helped build this country. And together, we are taking back this country, our country. We love our country. We're returning power to you, the American people. That's what we've done. From Dallas to El Paso, from Houston to Austin, from the Red River to the Rio Grande, this state was settled by some of the toughest men and strongest women ever to walk on the face of the earth. Texas. This is the state where William Travis, James Bowie and Davy Crockett made their last stand at the Alamo. This is the state where a small band of patriots at the Battle of Gonzalez, armed with a single canon, stared down a foreign army and declared, " Come and take it."  they loved their families, they loved their country, and they loved their God. These courageous Texas patriots did not shed their blood, sweat, and tears so that we could sit at home while others try to erase their legacy, demolish our liberty, and destroy our proud American heritage. We will never, ever allow that to happen. With your help, your devotion, and your drive, we are going to keep on working. We are going to keep on fighting. And we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. We are one movement, one people, one family, and one glorious nation under God. And together we will make America wealthy again. We will make America proud again. We will make America strong again. We will make America safe again. And we will make America great again. Thank you, Texas. Thank you. . Thank you.I worked so hard for this state. I worked so hard. You just got two of the greatest trade deals, and add Japan to it, by the way. Let's make it three, 40 billion from Japan, USMCA, all done. China, all done for the farmers. It's done, that I can tell you. You're going to have to get bigger tractors and a hell of a lot more land. You've got to produce a lot of product. I don't know if you can, but, hello Des Moines. It's great to be with you. I'm thrilled to be back in American heartland with thousands of loyal, hardworking American patriots. Great people. This November we're going to defeat the radical socialist Democrats that are right down the street. I mean, I don't even know. I just saw, New York Times, can you believe? Failing New York Times… When we leave in 10, 14, 18, 22 years from now, the New York Times will be out of business and so will a lot of others. But, did you see they did a New York Times poll, I think, and Sienna, Sienna, New York Times of Iowa, and they have me pitted against every one of the Socialists, and we're winning by a lot. Everyone. We're beating them all. We're beating them all. We're beating them all. We're beating them like they haven't been beaten before. You know all the noises about their crazy debates, nobody's watching their debates, but it's all about their debates. They don't care about the farmer. Everything out here, they love Trump, and you should love Trump with what I've done. So, we're going to win the great state of Iowa and it's going to be a historic landslide. If we don't win, your farms are going to hell. I can tell you right now. Sell, sell, they'll be saying "Sell." No, we love the farmers, and we love the ranchers, and we love the manufacturers, frankly. You got plenty of that too in this state. The great state, and you have a great governor, by the way. You have a great governor. But every day we're achieving extraordinary victories for the citizens of the Hawkeye State. The Iowa unemployment rate has reached an all time low in history. That's not bad. That's not bad. Oh, let's vote for Pocahontas. Let's vote for Bernie. Let's vote for sleepy Joe. He's falling asleep. Joe, Joe, Joe. He always gets the name wrong. How many times has he missed it? He's in Iowa. He says, "Great to be in the great state of Ohio." They say, "Joe, you're in Iowa." You can't do that. No matter how great you speak. If you're Winston Churchill, if you make that mistake at the beginning of your speech, it's over. You might as well just wrap it up. There's the fake news. They would just absolutely destroy you. They would absolutely destroy you. You can't do that. You can't do that, Joe, sleepy Joe, but you have these guys. You have these people. How about Buttigieg? Buttigieg. They call him mayor Pete. You know why? Because nobody can pronounce his name. Nobody has any idea. Buttigieg. They say, "Say edge edge." He presides over a city that's failed. It's doing so badly, in a state that's having the greatest year they've ever had, and they have a great governor also, and they had a great governor. You just heard from him, right? The great state of Indiana, so I don't see that one. Go down the line. We have some people. Let's not talk about them. What happened to mini Mike? Where is he? He's not running. He's skipping four or five states. Mini Mike. I've had him up to here. More people are working right now in Iowa than ever before. Now think of it. Think of it. Yesterday we replaced a NAFTA disaster with the incredible brand new U.S. Mexico Canada Agreement. The USMCA, you know when you have a hard time with that one, memory is a great thing. I've always had a great memory for whatever reason, but memory is a great thing. Having a great memory, but sometimes you take little clues. USMCA. Thank you, darling. I love you, too. Where is that person up? Look at that. Wow. What a good, strong voice. But you know how you remember it? The song I just walked in on. They're playing the song YMCA. So, when you're having a hard time, gee, what's U-S, just think of the song YMCA, and you'll remember it, USMCA. It's a massive win for Iowa farmers and workers of all kinds. It's a massive win and it creates some fairness with Canada. It creates fairness with Mexico. Probably the biggest reason that I ran was the unfair trade that I've seen, and one after one, China, Mexico, Canada, Japan, South Korea, we've made all these deals, and we have plenty left over. Plenty left over. Europe, Europe, Europe is next. I wanted to finish China before we started on Europe. I like to do them one at a time, one at a time. I'm a very organized person. But weeks ago we also signed a terrific new trade agreement with China that will boost American agriculture by $50 billion every year, and many other businesses like manufacturing, banking, finance, overall $250 billion, and you know with the farmers, because I have a place in my heart for the farmers big. I went and I saw Ambassador Lighthizer's in charge, he's fantastic. I said, "What are you doing? We're getting ready for the final deal. What are you doing?" He said, "I'm putting in $20 billion." Because I asked Sonny Perdue. He's great. You know who he is, right? Secretary of Agriculture. I said, "Sonny, what's the biggest number that China's ever done with the farmers?" He said, "Sir, $16 billion last year. $16 billion." This was two years ago. I said, "So, $16 billion is the biggest," because you know, they targeted you, and now we're friends with China. In fact, maybe we've never had a better relationship and were working with them very closely on the Coronavirus. We're working with them very, very closely. We only have five people. Hopefully everything's going to be great. They have somewhat of a problem, but hopefully it's all going to be great. But, we're working with China just so you know, and other countries very, very closely, so it doesn't get out of hand, but it's something that we have to be very, very careful with, right? We have to be very careful. But I said to Sonny Perdue, Secretary of Agriculture, I said, "Sonny, what's the number?" 16 and 12 the year before, and you were targeted. I don't blame China. Look, they're smart. They're negotiators. They targeted Trump states. Where do they love Trump? They love him in Iowa. They love him in Nebraska. They love him in all these states. They love him in Wisconsin. They love him. We won Wisconsin. They like him and Wisconsin, and a lot of the farm states, and they targeted. The farmers came to see me and they said, "Sir, you have to do what's right." When the fake news would interview farmers, the farmers would say, "No, no, President Trump is doing the right thing. It should have been done years ago. Should've been done years and years ago." But you couldn't have made it because there was too much money, $16 billion. So, what I did is I put a 25% tariff on everything coming in from China, $250 billion, and then more tariffs on things beyond the $250 billion market. We took in billions, and billions, and billions of dollars. We still are, and then what happened? When I heard about the farmers and I saw the farmers, they were in the White House. They came to see me. I had 36 farmers and I said, "I'm going to give you." They said, "Sir, we don't want anything." I said, "What do you mean you don't want anything? I've never heard that before." Everybody wants money. They want every. They said, "We just want a level playing field." I never forgot it. They said, "We don't want anything. We just want a level playing field, and we've been treated badly for years, for years." I said, "Well, you haven't been given a level playing field for many, many years, for decades. You haven't been given a level playing field. We're going to give you the levelest field that you ever had. But, but in the meantime, I'm going to give you $12 billion, out of these tens of billions that we're collecting." Don't worry. We had plenty of left over, because we never got 25 cents from China. China took from us. We didn't take from China, right? I said, "I'm going to give you $12 billion for the year before, and I'm going to give you $16 billion for this year." That was last year for this year. So, they got, meaning you, a lot of you in this audience, got $12 billion, and you got 16, so you got $28 billion over that short period of time, and you were able to actually, in some cases, I guess thrive. I told Sonny, "I want to take care of the small farmer too, not just the big monsters. I want to take care of everyone, everyone." But, I never forgot when CNN fake news and all these people, they go around interviewing the farmers. They could never find anyone saying bad about Trump. They'd go into diners. "What do you think about Trump? Isn't it a terrible what he's doing with the trade?" The farmer would say, "No, he's doing what should have been done 20 years ago." Now, you people are going to make so much money. You're not going to do just, you know what? Just relax. Take it easy. Put it away. Enjoy your life. But you're going to make a lot of money. You're going to make a lot of money. Again, we have never had, because they respect us now, they didn't respect us. We have never had a better relationship with China than we do right now. It's a beautiful story. They respect us. The whole world respects us now. We're respected again. America is respected again. Okay? We're fighting for products made in America and grown right here in this great, great state of Iowa. To keep America safe, we have fully rebuilt the United States military. It's now stronger, more powerful, more lethal than ever before. We have all brand new equipment and it was all built in the USA. Thanks to the courage of American heroes, the ISIS caliphate has been totally destroyed and its founder and leader, the animal known as al-Baghdadi is dead. Crazy Nancy Pelosi said, "Don't call him an animal. He's a human being." No, he's an animal. He's an animal. Two weeks ago, at my direction, the United States military delivered another historic win for American justice. Our brave warriors launched a flawless precision strike that killed the world's number one terrorist, Qasem Soleimani. Qasem Soleimani. He was the mastermind of the road side bomb. He loved roadside bombs. When you see your friends and great soldiers of our country and other countries, frankly, walking around, they don't have legs, they don't have arms in some cases. Some cases they don't have both. You see them walking around, or riding around, or the most brave people, these people have the greatest attitude. I go to Walter Reed and I see him and the young man his legs were blown off. "How you doing?" "Sir, I want to get back. I want to get back, sir." I'll tell you, the spirit of these people, it may even top the farmers. It may even top the farmers, which is pretty good. But he was responsible, more than anybody else, 90% they say of these roadside bombs sent to fight us, he was responsible and he took a hard hit. He took a very hard hit. He was responsible for murdering and maiming thousands and thousands of Americans, and hundreds of thousands of other people. Not acceptable. Soleimani was actively planning new attacks, but we ended his bloody rampage forever. Yet, Washington Democrats, true, like crazy Bernie and Nancy Pelosi, opposed our decision to eliminate Soleimani, and to save American lives. That had a tremendous impact. While we're proudly creating jobs and killing terrorists, Congressional Democrats are consumed with partisan rage, and obsessed with a deranged witch hunt hoax. You know, we're having probably the best years that we've ever had in the history of our country, and I just got impeached. Can you believe these people? I got impeached. They impeached Trump. The best trade deals, the strongest military, I took care of the vets. We got choice. We got accountability for the vets, accountability. We got all these things and they impeach your President. No, that's not going to work. Watch, just watch. They want to nullify your ballots, poison our democracy, and overthrow the entire system of government. That's not happening, I can tell you that. Washington Democrats have spent the last three years trying to overturn the last election. Why am I not worried? I should worried. Remember Nixon, it was like a dark period, right? It's a very dark period. It was like oh, you think about it. Right? With Clinton it was not good. They say that with Johnson, it was a long time ago, none of us remember, but they say it was a very dark period. This is a happy period for us. It's a happy period. It's a happy period because we call this impeachment light. This is light. Crazy Schiff. Shifty Schiff. He's a sick puppy. He's a sick puppy. But, you know what? Today you saw it, I hit my highest poll numbers since I got elected because the American people, and frankly, people all over the world, know it's a hoax. They understand it. They know it's a hoax, and we have a great party, the Republican party. They know what's going on. They know what's going on and they're going to treat us very fairly. But, the Democrats are trying to overturn the last election. We will make sure that they face another crushing defeat in 2020. November 3, November 3, mark it off. November 3, mark it off. Was that a great day? 2016 November. Remember? He's not going to do well with this group. I did well. He's not going to do well with that group. I won that group. He's not going to do well here or there. Even the exit polls, they took it right up. You know what they didn't know about the exit polls? When people are leaving, they're always very accurate. People leave. "Who you voted for?" "I voted for Trump." "Who you voted for?" "I voted for crooked Hillary. I don't care that she's a stone cold crook. I'm voting for her." Who are you voting for? I'm voting for Trump, or Clinton, or Trump. They're always very accurate, but this time something happened. Many people, many… I like that idea. I like it. I like it. Wouldn't we like to run against her. who's tougher? Her, crazy Bernie, Biden, Buttigieg? Who would be the closest? Buttigieg. I don't know. Maybe we take another crack at crazy Hillary. Would that be okay? She was so easy. Remember that speech so innocently given talking about deplorables. Remember? Remember deplorables? But you know the only thing I didn't understand, I said, "That's terrible." But she said another word that was worse. Irredeemables. I said, "Boy," shows you how good I am at politics, I said, "She's in trouble. She said our people are irredeemable." To me that was worse. Well, it wasn't that word that caught on. It was deplorable. The next day I'm speaking, and women are walking around, I'm deplorable. Everyone's got deplorable. I say, "I think she made a bad speech last night." But irredeemable, remember? She called them deplorable and irredeemable, and me being so brilliant, I said, "I think that irredeemables going to get her." No, deplorable got her. A lot her like lack of ability. Together we are going to win back the House. We are going to hold the Senate, and we are going to keep that beautiful, gorgeous, incredible White House. People don't realize this is a lot of work. I just left Michigan, and Michigan is booming now because of me, meaning, my people. I say to Prime Minister Abe, he's a friend of mine, "Shinzo," Japan, "You got to do something. You got these massive deficits for our country. You got to open up plants in Michigan fast, Shinzo. Fast. You've got to do it." "Yes, I will do it." He'll do it, and he's doing it. Countries are coming in from all over the world. They're going to Michigan. They're coming to Iowa. They're buying your stuff again, like crazy, like crazy. They're going to Ohio. They're going to Pennsylvania. They're going to South Carolina. They're going to North Carolina. They're going to Florida. They're coming in like never before. They're all coming back. I ran on the issue trade. I ran on a lot of different issues, but trade was one of them. That was so big. To me, it was so big. I used to say, how do we allow these companies to close, fire everybody, go to another country? Mexico, wherever it may be, make product, sell the product into our country, pay no tax. Who the hell would allow this to happen? Who would allow to happen? It's like in South Korea. I went to him, I said, "Listen, your deal is no good. We have to make a new deal." South Korea, we're protecting them all, all these different things. I said, "Number one, you've got to pay us more." They agreed to. They gave us $500 million a year more. They said, "But nobody has ever asked." They gave us 500. That's nothing compared to what they have to do. That's okay. That's okay. They'll pay more. But you know, they made a trade deal with the United States. Hillary Clinton was in charge of the deal, right? She said it's going to produce 250,000 jobs, and she was right. 250,000. You know who it was for? For South Korea, not for us, it was for South Korea. So, we renegotiated the deal, if I have your permission, we renegotiated the deal and now we have a good deal with South Korea, okay? This deal is going to produce, remember… This deal is going to produce 250,000 jobs for South Korea. She didn't lie. Can't say she lied. She lies about a lot of other things, but she didn't lie. How is she taking her defeat? Okay? I think so. Remember the debate? Do you promise if you lose that you will support the winner and I sort of, I didn't exactly say yes. I didn't say yes, in all fairness, but I got sort of like six the 68% there. But she said, "See he won't." She's the one that doesn't do it. No, no, I feel badly because it's too late for her to get in. I kept hoping, but I think, honestly I think that sleepy Joe, crazy Bernie, I don't even want to put Buttigieg in, but I think they'd actually be tougher than her. During this campaign season, the good people of Iowa have had a front row seat to the lunacy and the madness of the totally sick left. This is a radical left people that we're dealing with. Today's Democrat party, I don't say Democratic party, it sounds so much better in a speech, right? Democratic party, the Democrat, but that's not their name. It's called the Democrat party. You know some people aren't allowed to say the Democrat party because it doesn't sound good. I don't even like it. I don't like the way it sounds in this speech, but I'm going to say it because I'm not looking to have them look good. Today's Democrat party is run by left wing extremists who want to massively raise your taxes, increase regulations, cancel your health plans, raid Medicare, shut down American energy, destroy your social security, they will destroy your social security, eliminate religious liberty, punish free speech, confiscate your guns, abolish your borders, and indoctrinate America's children with hateful, left-wing ideology. Other than that, they're okay. Other than that, they're fine people. In short, this election is a choice between American freedom and Democratic socialism, and in some cases, in my opinion, it's worse than Socialism. Socialism's a kind word by comparison. The Democrats will lose because America will never be a socialist country. We can't. They're all watching tonight. They're sitting in their hotel room, little hotels right down the street, and they're looking at this crowd. The press never talks about my crowds. Did you see in New Jersey a couple of nights ago? We had signups for 175,000 people. We had an arena that held about 9,000 people. We could have sold it out 15 times. Okay? They don't talk about that. You know what they talk about? They said Donald Trump who spoke before a nice crowd. If Bernie or sleepy Joe has, I mean Joe had a crowd that was so small the other day that they set up a round table. No, it's true. No, they were in a gymnasium. There were in a gymnasium, and they set up a round table, and people that went there to hear his speech are now being asked, "What do you think of socialism?" They just said, "I just want to be here to watch his speech." They set up a round- They just said, "I just want to be here to watch a speech." They set up a round table because the crowd was so small, and then they'll say, "It was a brilliant round table. It was wonderful." They never mention crowds. They never mention crowds. They never mention anything. I'll tell you, U.S.M.C.A, The biggest trade deal ever signed in the history of the world. Okay? It is, wait. It barely got any mention. We signed it. It barely got any mention. They talk about the impeachment hoax. They talk about all the other stuff, but the trade deal, that is going to change our country. It's going to bring growth. Wait until you see, toward the end of next year, the growth will be astronomical because of the China Trade Deal, the U.S.M.C.A, Japan, South Korea, Europe, when that happens. It will happen because they have no choice. They have no choice. But in the papers, and on the fake news cable shows, and the regular, look, NBC is horrible, the NBC Nightly News, it's terrible. The good news is people don't watch it like they used to, because they don't believe in it. They don't believe in it. And as Sean Hannity would say, MSDNC, you know what MSDNC is, right, so bad. CNN, total fake stuff. Oops, their camera just went off. Look! The camera just went off! CNN! Their camera just went off. That always happens whenever I say CNN, their camera goes off. But Americans, across the political spectrum, were disgusted by the Washington Democrats, the partisan hoaxes, the witch hunts, the con jobs. It's all a con job. And so, they don't love our country, I swear they don't. You look at Nancy Pelosi's district in San Francisco. It was so beautiful, and now it's a disgrace, being watched all over the world. Needles all over the place, everything else all over the place. I'm not going to get into it, washing down into the ocean, washing down onto their beaches, people living in tents if they're lucky. I mean you never saw anything, living on their most important entryways into what was a great city, San Francisco. What's happened? And all she does is work on the hoax and work on all of the stuff. Really, these people are very, very bad for our country. We have to take back the House of Representatives, we have to. Registered Democrats and Independents are leaving the Democrat party in droves, and we are welcoming these people, and these great voters, to the Republican Party with wide, open arms. And we are thrilled to be joined tonight by a lot of your great leaders, a lot of your really wonderful people. I'm not going to mention all the names, because all those cameras that are rolling, they don't like it when I do it, but one they don't mind is Governor Kim Reynolds. Come up, Kim, come up here! Also first gentleman, Kevin Reynolds, Kevin! Kim, come on, come on. You want to say something? Great, great job. Thank you. Oh, she was driving me a little bit batty. She would call me up, Kim, you would call. "What about ethanol?" I said Kim, "I mean, I'm doing a lot for that place." "No, no. We want ethanol." Then, "we want biofuel." Then she is asking for things I never even heard of, but we got them all, whatever that hell she wanted, we got. Right? And by the way, Joni Ernst and the great Chuck Grassley are right now in Washington fighting for fairness, fighting the hoax, fighting for all of us. They called, they said, "Do you mind if we don't go tonight? We have to stay." I said, "I don't want you to be there. I want you to be where you are" because they are fighting for us. They are great people. They are great people. And, they would call too. Chuck Grassley, Joni Ernst, they would call, "We got to help our farmers, sir." "Yes. Okay, we are going to help the farmer." They were great. Lieutenant Governor Adam Gregg. Thank you, Adam. Thank you, Adam. Great job, Adam. Speaker of the Iowa House of Representatives, a man with really fantastic genes, got to have like the best genes in the world. Although you had an ex-governor here that had very good genes, too. We have his son in the audience, too, but this is Representatives Pat Grassley. Those genes, those two young men have the greatest genes anyone has ever had for politics. Thank you, fellas, thanks. I sent one of them, the father to China, and he's now Ambassador to China. Do you think he is happy? Is he happy? I think so. I think he is happy. Great Governor, longest serving Governor in history, actually, 24 years. We have the Chairman of the Republican Party of Iowa, Jeff Kaufmann. Great job. And just quickly, we have the world's tallest campaign manager, Brad Parscale. And Republican National Committee Co-Chair, who has done an incredible job, Tommy Hicks. And we have the great negotiator, the great man, Bob Lighthizer with us here, someplace. Where's Bob? What a job he did negotiating for you. And we have somebody that you never heard of, somebody that's a fantastic person, but you never heard of, somebody named Sarah Sanders. Have you ever heard of her? Come here, Sarah! Come on! That's pretty good! And we have a great football player, from Iowa, Matt Whitaker is here, Matt. Say something. Thank you, Sarah. Very popular. She is a terrific person, great person. Thanks to Republican leadership, American now has the hottest economy anywhere on the Planet Earth, not even close. Every Prime Minister, President, King, Queen, Dictator, whatever you want to call them, they all say, "How did you do it?" And, the truth is we have certain advantages, but we also have a people advantage. We have the greatest people in the world. I really mean that. Since the election, we have created seven million new jobs. The average unemployment rate, under my administration, listen to this, is lower than any previous administration in the history of our country. Can you believe that? The lowest unemployment rate. African American, Hispanic American, and Asian American unemployment rates have reached the lowest levels ever recorded, think of that. More than two million millennials, you know what millennials are, young, great people with a lot of future, they have gotten jobs, and their wages have grown by nearly 5% annually. That's a record. Another record is that between the ages of 25 and 34, people are now working, and that's a record, the number of people, 25 to 34. And under the so-called Trump Economy, the lowest paid earners are reaping the fastest gains of any group. And that's a great thing. This is a blue collar boom, and that's a good thing too. That's a good thing. Earnings for the bottom 10% are rising faster than earnings for the top 10% for the first time ever, for the first time ever. And median household income is at an all time high, just for one second, president Bush, eight years, $450. President Barack Hussein Obama, eight years, eight years, $975. President Donald John Trump, two and a half years, not three, because the numbers were taken at two and a half, now it's actually higher. Two and a half years, including the tax cuts which are massive, and including all of the regulatory cuts, and the other things you have gotten, $10,000. Think of it. You have eight years, 450. Eight years, 975. Two and a half years, think of it, $10,000. It's one of the reasons the economy is doing so well. And let the people down the road tell you about that, okay? Let them tell you about that. And those tractors that I told you to buy, your tractors will be 60 years old if they have anything to do with it. They will be 60 years old. They will be old, tired, exhausted. Your land will be exhausted. You will be exhausted. We've ended the war on American energy. The United States is now the number one producer of oil and natural gas anywhere on earth, by far. We are also proudly promoting American ethanol, and I recently approved E15 to be used all year round! Biofuel also, but the Socialist Democrats want to shut down American energy. They support Representative Ocasio-Cortez. It's a real beauty. That's a real beauty. That's a beauty. I can't even believe it, but I don't want to knock it, because the Green New Deal, which would crush our farms, destroy our wonderful cows. I love cows. They want to kill our cows. You know why, right? You know why? Don't say it. They want to kill our cows. That means you are next. And they want to wipe out, totally, Iowa ethanol. They want to wipe it out. But we will never let that side get in, and by the way, that's the least of it. But I don't want to attack the Green New Deal, because they might change it. I said to her the other day, they said, "What do you think of the Green New Deal?" I said, "Well, it should be studied carefully. We should look at it, look at it closely. I don't want to talk about until about two months before the election. And then I will tell you how totally insane it is." How about this crazy Senator? How about this crazy, crazy Senator from Hawaii? They said, "I'm totally in favor," not the smartest. She said, "I'm totally in favor of the Green New Deal." Well, that would mean there's no more airplanes. "Oh!" They started screaming at her in Hawaii, they said, "How the hell are we going to get to Hawaii?" They said, "We're going to build a railroad." She said that would be "the world's longest track." It's the world's longest. She doesn't know that they don't want airplanes anymore, and yet they fly around in brand new Gulfstreams, in brand new planes all over the place. They're flying from place to place. They're talking about the carbon footprint. "We're going to destroy the carbon footprint! What time is my plane taking off, please?" To lift up forgotten communities, the Republican tax cut launched Opportunity Zones, jobs, and investment, and now rushing into over 60 newly… and this is incredible, brand, newly designated Opportunity Zones right here in Iowa alone. Rich people are investing vast amounts of money. Tim Scott, Senator Tim Scott, South Carolina, came into my office. He said, "I have an idea that I have wanted to do for years, but we have never had a president that could pull it off." I said, "What is it, Tim?" And he talked about Opportunity Zones, first time I heard it. And we did it, and there is nothing, nobody has ever seen anything like it. Money is being poured into these communities that would have never been there. What's happening is incredible. Opportunity Zones. Remember it. For decades, politicians ran for office, promising to protect American farmers and workers. You've heard it all your lives, right? But then, they went to Washington. They looked at those beautiful marble columns, and that gorgeous ceiling painted, and all that gold, the way they used to build the buildings, they don't build them that way anymore. We could, but they just don't know how. By the way, we're building the wall. You know the wall is over a hundred miles long. It's over a hundred miles long already and moving fast. They went to Washington and they sold you out. That's what happened. They sold your jobs out. They sold everything out. Globalist politicians allowed other countries to raid our factories, ravage our farms, rob our workers, and ransack our communities. But the era of economic surrender is over, because now we are finally putting America first, America first. Before I took office, Washington looked the other way, while China stole our secrets from American agriculture. Your business, what they do scientifically, nobody understands what they have done to a seed. It doesn't sound complicated. It is genius, what they have been able to do, what you have been able to do. But those secrets were being stolen, stolen. And installed massive barriers to your exports. You couldn't do anything with exports, so people, not only China, many, many other places were stealing your secrets. Our new agreement with China will protect our intellectual property and pry open vast new markets for American beef, pork, poultry, seafood, soybeans, rice, dairy, and much, much more. But you know it is true. China is so big. 1.5 billion people. We have 350. 1.5 billion people, think of that, and we are just touching it. This deal will be so big. If it all works out, and you have the best product, the best product in the world, if it all works out, it will just keep expanding. 250 billion will end up being much, much more than that. And, I've told this story before, when we were signing, we were almost finished and I said, "How much are the farmers getting?" Meaning how much are they going to purchase from the farmers. And Ambassador Lighthizer said, "We put 20 billion, sir. The highest ever was 16, so we made it 20." I said "Make it 50." They said, "What?" And then people, even farm people, said, "Sir, we can't produce that much." I said, "That's a good problem, not a bad problem." I said, "Make it 50," so we now have, in the contract, from 40 to $50 billion worth of purchase." Make it 50, make it 50! Right, Jared? I said, "Jared, you better make it 50." I want those farmers to come back, say, "Sir, sir, we can't do it. We can't produce that much, sir, what are you doing to us?" I don't think that would ever happen? Do you think that would ever, I said they will figure a way. He's going "Absolutely not." Nah, I said, "Don't make it 20, make it 50." The U.S.M.C.A. is another colossal victory for American agriculture like you have never had before. It's time. We suffered for a year and a half, almost two years. Think of it, but not really because I was able to give you those, I won't call them subsidies. I made that mistake once with the farmers. I said to this group of farmers that came in, "Subsidy." I used the word subsidy. That was the worst word, "Sir, we don't watch subsidy! Please don't ever use that word." I said, "I won't, I promise." Just in that small, little grouping where you were doing nothing. It's called promises made, promises kept. Promises met. The last time I came, I never did this before, I never ran, so they all said, "You never ran before. You can't do this if you never ran," so whatever happened, it happened. One by one, they started dropping out, right? And then I was left with one, Hillary Clinton, and that worked out very nicely. "He cannot get to 270," remember? 270, electoral college. "He cannot get to 270." I went to Maine. It's true, Maine, too. It's got one point, right, one. I went there a lot, many times. Everyone said, well, they kept getting me, maybe if I have a great night, 269, but 269 loses. Right? But we got 306 to 223. 306, 223, so they were right, "You cannot get to 270, you can get to 306," but not that there is… In the eight years before my election, net farm income plummeted by 20%, you know that. If you look at a chart, for 15 years actually, not eight, for 15 years, it's like a roller coaster ride down for the farmer. Soybeans. Take a look at it all. It was just a one way street. Everybody was ripping off the American farmer. Now you're going to see numbers that are going to be great. Look at even what's happened recently. It's incredible what's going on and I love it, because you deserve it. You suffered a lot, with people that were stupid. They were stupid! Under three years of my administration, net farm income has already gone up nearly 50% and will now be rising even faster. What are you going to do? You are going to vote for Bernie? You are going to vote for Bernie? Here I am on the debate stage, "Well, net income has gone up for the farmers 50%." Tell me, how the hell do I lose this debate? How do I lose? And based on the polls, I guess I'm not going to lose in this state. I don't think I will lose in any other state either. Because this is really true all over the country. This is happening all over the country, not just Iowa. On no issue have Washington Democrats more thoroughly betrayed the American people than on immigration. Illegal immigration costs our nation hundreds of billions of dollars, drains public services, overcrowds our schools and hospitals, and threatens innocent American lives at a number that you wouldn't even believe. But we have got it closed up, but we're getting your people in. You have people that have worked for you for a long time, don't you? I know who the people that you have, and they are hard workers. We have a lot of great people. You have a lot of great people out there. Right here in Des Moines, a twice deported, illegal alien was charged with shooting and killing a woman, her 11-year-old daughter, and her five-year-old son. In this region of the county alone, last year, ICE officers arrested nearly 4,000 illegal aliens charged or convicted of heinous crimes, including robbery, rape, and murder. Yet today's Democrat Party glorifies illegal immigration. We have no idea, now we do now, but people would come in by the hundreds of thousands. We have no idea who they are. Many are fine people and all of that, but some are stone cold rapists, and murderers, and people that their countries don't want, Guatemala, Honduras, El Salvador, and even Mexico. Right now we have a love affair with Mexico because the Democrats, the Democrats wouldn't give us what we needed and I got Mexico, they're great. They put up 27,000 soldiers on our Southern border and the numbers are plummeting, 87% down. The president of Mexico is doing a great job. And we ended Catch and Release. You think that was easy? Catch and Release, you know what Catch and Release is? You catch a criminal, you take the number, and you release him into the, they would never come back. We say, come back please in three years, this is a Democrat deal. Come back if you don't mind, in three years. We release them into our country. We totally ended it through a very, very slick group of rules. Catch and Release. May we please have your address and your phone number? "Here it is!" "What have you done?" "I got out of jail." "Oh, well, welcome to the United States. Please, we have a little information. Okay, and now we're going to release you, and in three and a half years, we schedule a court appearance for you." Do you believe, this is the only country in the world. They catch somebody on the border. You're supposed to be Perry Mason. You take them to court. Other countries catch somebody at the border. They say, " Sorry, you got to get out." We say, "Oh, may we have your information? We're taking you to court." Man. Today's Democrat Party glorifies illegal immigration, vilifies the heroes of law enforcement, and pledges to dissolve immigration control entirely. They want open borders. They want hundreds of thousands of people to flow into our country. And some of those people, some of those people are stone cold killers. Some of those people, in the caravans, right? I came up with that name but they won't give me credit for that. They don't give me credit for anything. They don't give me credit for fake news. Wasn't that my term? Now they say, I see CNN, they said, "Fake news has reported," no, no, you are fake news, that fake news is you. You are fake news. They turned the term around. They are reporting that fake news is reporting their fake news. Left wing politicians even support deadly sanctuary cities that release criminal aliens directly into American communities. We don't want them. In New York City, the Mayor's Sanctuary Policy recently forced the release of a- … the mayor's sanctuary policy recently forced the release of a criminal illegal alien charged with assault. After being set free the same criminal raped, brutalized and murdered a 92 year old woman. They wouldn't give him to the ICE warriors. Their warriors. They're tough and they love our country. They're very tough and they love our country. They're taking MS-13 gang members … They're about as tough as you get, they're taking them out of our country by the thousands. By the thousands. That's a tough job but they love to do it. They love our country. Sanctuary city policies aren't just wrong, they're immoral, and they're lethal, and they really are something that has to be stopped. They have to be stopped now. What's happening is a disgrace. Thankfully here in Iowa your great Republican governor, sometimes referred to as Governor Reynolds, signed a state-wide ban on sanctuary cities. Thank you Kim. That is why we need to elect more Republicans nationwide, to end sanctuary cities in all 50 states. Thank you Kim Reynolds. You know I endorsed her, so I want to take full credit for the job she has done. I endorsed her very early, right? Very early I endorsed her. I know talent. She's done a great job. Democrats stand for crime, corruption, and chaos. Republicans stand for law, order, and justice. It's true. We are finding the illegal game members, drug dealers, predators, and we are throwing them the hell out of our country, ideally. We don't want to put them in prison because you know what? We got to pay for them for the next 50 years, but sometimes we have to. If they're too dangerous we have no choice. Thanks to our tireless efforts to secure the border we have reduced illegal border crossings seven straight months in a row, and they're getting lower, and lower. Shockingly, as that wall gets longer, the crossings get less. Remember the Democrats? "You don't need a wall. You don't need a wall. You don't need it." Seven years they all voted for it, they just didn't have the ability to build it. You know it's not easy with land, and this, and that, and property, and rights. They couldn't figure it out but I can figure it out. The problem was we couldn't get the money, but we got all the money we need now. We have everything. We have everything. The last time, this last budget, they didn't really fight us on the wall. You know why? Because they learned it's a really bad issue for them. It's a really bad issue. But I made one mistake with the wall. I should have said, "We will never ever build a wall." They would have given me so much money to build a wall. That was my only … Because I used to go, "We will build the wall," right? That was a mistake. I should have said, "We will never ever build it. Under no circumstances," and they would have forced its building and I would have said, "Okay." By the way, in all due respect, you know who's going to pay for the wall, right? No, no, they play … The fake news plays. No, no, through remittance illegal aliens from Mexico are going to pay for the call. That's what it is. Remittance. 100% because when I say something I mean it. I said I was going to build a wall. You think it's easy when you have a party that controls the House, you got to end that. You got to end that. They said they picked up the House in '18 but I didn't run in '18. You know the big difference when you run, '16 I ran, '18 I didn't run. They did, they picked up some seats. I didn't run, but I'm running this time and we've got to take back the House. Kevin McCarthy will be a great Speaker of the House. Kevin McCarthy will be a great Speaker, watch. But getting something built when you have a party that controls one of the three, getting it built is … Honestly I don't want to brag, nobody else could have done it. Nobody else could have done it. It's The Real Deal wall. It's the wall that border security wanted. Remember I thought I could just build concrete slabs? They didn't want that because you have to be able to see through. I said, "Oh come on." This is the expensive version. This is the best version. This is steel, and concrete, and rebar in between. It's really something. Did you see the other day where drug dealers got caught at the top? They couldn't get over. We had to get the fire department to get them down. They couldn't get over and they're like mountain climbers. They got used to climbing. They got caught because you know that panel? That's an anti-climb panel. It's very hot and very tough. It's a very hard panel to climb, the panel on top. Sometimes I'd say, "I'd rather do without that panel," because I'm a very visual person. They said, "Sir that's anti-climb panel." I said, "Oh it is? Okay, let's put it on. To hell with it." It's true. Anti-climb panel. The wall is the top of the line. That's what they wanted. Mostly 30 feet tall. That's very tall. That's maximum. It's really doing a big trick. A lot … Wherever we have it … 100 miles is all of a sudden a lot, but where you have that it's incredible. 99.9%, especially when we're watching it. We're watching the sections. Illegal crossings now are down 75% since last spring. The powerful border wall was starting to set. I mean pretty soon we'll be setting records in speed. It's going up very rapidly. Very rapidly. You're seeing it all over and it's going to be really something. Look, it would be nice if we didn't have to have it. It would be great, but we have to have it. They said, "Oh we could have drones." Oh what are you going to do with drones flying around? When people are going through your border with nowhere … They're going to have drones flying around. They know because they were all for it. They were all for it. Now all of a sudden they're against, but they want drones. Well we're going to have drones too but the drones are policing the wall. In terms of human trafficking, people don't even talk about it. Because of the internet, sadly, the worst in the history of our world. All over the world. Trafficking in women and children all over the world. All over the world. The worst it's ever been, but when we have this border it makes it very, very tough for them to come into the United States with women and with children stuffed in trunks in the back of a car. The Washington Democrats have never been more extreme. 132 congressional Democrats have signed up for Bernie Sanders' government healthcare takeover bill. It's a takeover of your healthcare that would strip all of those 180,000 million great Americans of your private coverage. You want that. You got great deals. You're able to negotiate, you're able to keep your doctor, keep your area, keep your hospitals, keep everything that you wanted. Now they want to take it away. Report to an operating room when you have a cold, okay? In your local hospital. I don't think so. 180,000 million people, but I'm not going to knock it because I want Bernie to bring it right up to the end and we'll debate it the day before the election. Okay? We are saving your healthcare while Socialist Democrats are trying to take away your healthcare. Sleepy Joe has no idea what he's even … He doesn't even know what he's talking about. He's so lost. Honestly, that poor guys is so lost. They talk healthcare, she said, "It's over for him." It was over for him, actually if you knew him, a long time ago. Now it's really over. We are making healthcare better and cheaper. We got rid of the individual mandate, the most unpopular thing, which essentially killed Obamacare. We are protecting people with pre-existing conditions and we always will, the Republican party. We're stopping surprise medical billing and making everything totally transparent. I signed it already. Everything now is going to transparencies, where hospitals, doctors, everybody has to tell you how much things are costing. Watch those prices come down. Right? Right? I have an expert on healthcare. He said transparency because it's a big deal. It's a big deal. Nobody else would have gotten it done, that I can tell you. Transparency is bigger than healthcare because you will see prices tumbling like you wouldn't believe. People go in for a blood test, they get charged $2,700. Down the road they get the same test for $57. The same exact test. Maybe it's better. Maybe it's better. It's crazy. When you have transparency it's all going to come. You watch. You watch. But this person, a real expert, said, "This is bigger than healthcare," and I got it done. Unfortunately it won't really start kicking in until after the election because it takes a period of time. They have certain statutory requirements, et cetera. Well you better let me win. Can you imagine? Can you imagine? I did transparency, I took the guts, I did transparency and then I'm going to watch as somebody else says, "Didn't he do a great job for transparency?" You better let me win because I want the credit for that one. We're buying cheaper drugs from other countries and approving more generic drugs than ever, ever, ever before. We are defending your right to keep the doctor. We are defending your right to keep your plan. Remember Obama 28 times, "You can keep your doctor. You can keep your doctor"? 28. "You can also keep your plan. You can keep it. You can keep it." 28 times he lied. We should impeach him. No, he got it on a lie. He got it on a lie, but we've run it much better. But essentially it's totally different because of individual mandate. Because that really took the guts out of it and we're running it much better. I had a choice, do we run it well or do we run it poorly? If we run it poorly everyone's going to blame me. If we run it well everyone's going to give him credit, especially the fakers back there right? But you know what? We got to run it well but we're coming up with a healthcare that if we win the House we will have the best healthcare of any country in the world, by far. We're fighting the lobbyists and we're fighting the special interest, in case you didn't notice. We are serving only you. Thanks to our bold reforms we're now offering health plans that are 60% cheaper than Obamacare. We're offering a lot of different things. We have just passed, recently, 10 months ago, Right to Try. I love Right to Try. You know what that is? That's people are terminally ill and they can't use medicine because … They've been trying to pass this, almost for 50 years. You can't use the medicine. We have the greatest doctors, labs, hospitals in the world. They come up with a medicine but it has to go through the FDA procedure, right? You can't do anything. You can't use it. They won't let you use it. Now I have you sign an agreement, you're not going to sue the United States, you're not going to this, your family, et cetera, et cetera. Very simple. And they can use it. You have no idea the results that are taking place. You have no idea. You have no idea the results. People's lives are being … For me it was simple. I said, "Wait a minute, you're worried about hurting somebody? These people are dying. They're terminally ill. They're admitting they're terminally ill and you won't let them use a drug that may work? Let the use the drug." And we're letting them use the drug and it's working in a lot of cases. We have transformed veterans healthcare, including VA Choice. The best. You know I think I'm a totally brilliant human being. I think I'm the smartest person, so I came up with a plan. I'll never forget, I was in New Hampshire, I came up with this idea because everybody kept coming up to me and saying, "Sir it's really terrible what's happening with healthcare. We're waiting in line for two weeks, for four weeks, for seven weeks." Honestly people were waiting in line, they weren't very sick, they were terminally ill, truthfully, before they saw a doctor. By the time they got to the doctor. So I came up with this incredible plan. Only I could think of this. I said, "Here's what you do … Here's what you do, if somebody can't get a doctor quickly," because we have great doctors at the VA. They don't get enough credit. "If you can't get to a doctor quickly you go outside, you go locally, you get a doctor, we pay the bill, you get yourself all better." Right? So I went back. I went back and I told my people, "Do you have any idea how smart I am? Listen to this plan I have." They said, "Actually sir we've known about that plan for 52 years we just couldn't get it approved." So I said, "Oh that's too bad, I thought it was brilliant," but what I am good at is getting things approved and I got it approved. People are using it and it's great. I know the people of Iowa don't care about this but we are making substantial investments in rural healthcare. We are combating the opioid epidemic. Drug overdose deaths have declined for the first time in nearly 31 years. That's a great thing. Our great first lady is helping us with that. That is such a big thing for Melania. Big, big thing. She is really involved. We will never let the Democrats give away your healthcare to illegal immigrants, especially when we say, "Come in. Come in, we'll give you healthcare." It's one thing they come in and it's a rough situation because we all have hearts but when people are saying, like in California this wacky governor he says, "Come in, we're going to give you healthcare. We're going to give you free education. We're going to give you everything. We're going to give you a beautiful Rolls-Royce." See to show you how fake they are one of the newscasters said, "Donald Trump said that the governor of California promised a Rolls-Royce to illegal immigrants. He didn't promise them. This was a lie and a misrepresentation by President Trump." They can't take a little humor. They can't take it. These people are sick. They're sick. No. They're sick people. Them and Shifty Schiff is a very sick person. He lies awake at night shifting and turning, Shifty. Shifting and turning in his bed, sweating like a dog. "How am I going to get him? He didn't do anything wrong, how am I going to get him?" Oh what a sick guy he is. Virtually every top Democrat also now supports late-term abortion. Ripping babies straight from the mother's womb. Right up until the moment of birth. That is why I have asked Congress to prohibit extreme late-term abortion because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift from God. Democrats are now the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late-term abortion, Socialism, and blatant corruption. No matter how you cut it, that's what it is. The Republican party is the party of the American worker, the American family, the American dream, and the late great Abraham Lincoln. You know that, right? Abraham Lincoln. Honest Abe. Remember I always said, "I can be more presidential than any other past president, other than perhaps Abraham Lincoln when he's wearing the hat," right? Because it's easy to be presidential but only have about three people in front of me. Be a, "Good evening ladies and gentlemen. Is everything okay in Iowa? Oh I see, the world is ripping you off. Well there's not a thing I can do about that. Thank you. Good night everybody. Good night." No, we got to do it the right way. Republicans … And by the way, can I be honest? Doing this takes far more talent than doing that. Doing that is very easy. This is not easy. Especially when you just left Michigan, and you just left other places, and you got maniacs doing a number on you all the time for three years. You got the maniacs for three years. I think before I came down the escalator with our future first lady I think really they were doing it then. They started even before I came down on the escalator. These people are maniacs, so you have all that. So you're fighting that and you're doing farm bills. We got your farm bill approved by the way. We got your farm bill approved. I don't even mention that because that's massive by any other standard, but it's peanuts compared to the USMCA and the China deal, right? So I don't even mention it. Anyway, Republicans are fighting for citizens from every background and from every race, religion, color, and creed. It's true. Our numbers with African American workers, people, are through the roof. Are through the roof because … Remember I used to say, "What do you have to lose?" I'd read the down the worst on crime, the worst on education. They got this, they got that, they got 10 different things, all horrible. One day I'm in front of this tremendous group of people and I'm reading this list, African American, they have the highest crime rate, they have the highest this, they have the worst education, they have the worst schools, they have the worst … I said, "Stay with me," because they were with the Democrats for a hundred years, more. I said, "Stay with me. What the hell do you have to lose?" You know what? You know what? Remember that? Now they have the best employment and unemployment numbers, they have the best poverty numbers, they have numbers that nobody would believe. They're doing so great. It's so great to see it. It's incredible. Youth unemployment, African American youth. It's been great. We're asking all Americans to join our incredible movement. We are a big tent and a big party with big, bold, beautiful ideas for the future. We're what the country was based on originally. It was called greatness. It was called greatness. During National School Choice Week, School Choice everybody, we continue our fight to rescue children trapped in failing government schools. Iowa became one of the first states to pass School Choice. That was over 10 years ago. Now Governor Reynolds, Senator Ernst, Senator Grassley, and more than 100 members of Congress are supporting our plan to give School Choice to every child in America who needs it. It's a great plan. To give former prisoners a second chance at life we passed criminal justice reform. Think of that. Think of that. We had a lot of great Conservatives who wanted it, we had Liberals who wanted it. They couldn't get it passed. President Obama couldn't even come close. He didn't try too hard. He talked like, "Oh I'll try." To uphold the rule of law we have confirmed 191 federal judges, a record, who will interpret The Constitution as one. And two great Supreme Court justices, by the way. As part as … Right? Two great ones. As part of my commitment to rebuild our military we secured an $8.5 million facility to support our Iowa Guardsmen at Camp Dodge, right here in Des Moines, Iowa. Right here, Camp Dodge. Camp Dodge everybody. We take care of Camp Dodge. I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American Embassy in Jerusalem. We recognized Israeli sovereignty over the Golan Heights. Yesterday we just released a historic new plan for peace. We're going to see if we can get that done. It's one of the toughest deals of all. One of the toughest deals but we have a shot at it. For years you watched as your politicians apologized for our country. They apologized. They would say, "I'm sorry." Now you have a president who is standing up for America and we are standing up for the great people of Iowa. We are standing up for Iowa. At stake in our present battle is the survival, frankly, of our nation. Look, I can make this speech really short. All I have to do is say, "Hello Iowa, you have no choice. You have to vote for me. Otherwise everything that you've built in your entire life will be gone. Goodbye Iowa, have a good time." Instead I work my ass off up here, okay? Yeah. True. Do you think this is easy? It's a little hot in this room. This room wasn't designed for this many people. If you want your children to inherit the blessings that generations of Americans have fought and died for then we must devote everything we have toward victory in November of 2020. We have to. By the way, for those beautiful farmers that want to leave your small farms or businesses to your children … Because of our great tax bill, the biggest tax cut in the history of our country, the biggest that you benefit by. Because of that there is no death tax or inheritance tax, as they call it. So I always say, "If you love your children that's a great thing. If you don't love your children don't leave it to them and that particular tax won't matter," but if you love … Is there anybody here that does not love your children? Is there anybody here who loves your children? Well it's Iowa. It's Iowa. You love your children. You know you have no tax to pay, you leave your ... No, it's great. So when you're looking down at your children you're saying, "Oh did you get lucky? Did you get lucky? Look at them, they're enjoying life." But only this way can we save the America we love and drain the Washington swamp once and for all. That swamp is bad. That swamp is bad. I had no idea it was going to be this sick and this degenerated. It's a degenerate swamp. I had no idea. When I came out, I said, "We're going to drain this swamp." I had no idea that the swamp was that evil, but we're winning. We're winning because we're in The White House. We're winning. With your help we will lift millions more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependents to independents, and poverty to prosperity. That's what's happening all over our country. Together we will elect a Republican Congress to create a fair, safe, sane, and lawful system of immigration. It's already happening. We will continue to enact new trade deals that result in more products made, raised, farmed, and grown right here in the USA. We will achieve new breakthroughs in science and medicine. Finding new cures for childhood cancer and ending the AIDS epidemic in America in less than 10 years. We've already started. Should have been started in the last administration. Incredible. Should have been started earlier, but we started. In less than 10 years, the AIDS epidemic will be eradicated, will be gone. Who would have thought that was possible? When they came in and told me that a couple of years ago, I said, "Really? Nobody knows that." Incredible the strides that we've made. We will defend privacy, free speech, religious liberty and the right to keep and bear arms. In the state of Virginia they want to take your guns away, you believe it? Virginia, I love Virginia. Of all states, they want to take your guns away. The Democrats. Not going to happen. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the sacred values that bind us together as one America. We are one great America. We support, protect, and defend the constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that family and faith, not government bureaucracy, are the true American way, not government bureaucracy. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag. And we live by the words of our national motto, in God we trust. We live by those words, in God we trust. From Cambridge, good old Cambridge. Who's from Cambridge here please? Cambridge. What the hell do I mention it for when there's two people here? Can I say it anyway? I'll say it anyway. Good place Cambridge. Good, he said it's amazing. Well, from Cambridge to Council Bluffs, from Cedar Rapids where I made my last speech prior to the election. What a place, 32,000 people. I said, "I'm going to win tomorrow." To Rock Rapids, from Melbourne to Moorhead, and from Davenport to right here in Des Moines, Iowa. We stand on the shoulders of true red blooded American heroes. This great state was founded by tough, tough, tough frontier men. These are tough people. Let's see how big and how tough. They're tough. Anybody like to join ICE? You want to join ICE? He says, "No thank you." And strong pioneer women who defied the dangers to carve out a life and a beautiful home with great families and great neighbors. They tamed the wilderness, braved the elements, tilled the soil, planted the fields and help make this the greatest nation ever to exist on the face of the earth and we are making it greater and greater every single day. Proud citizens like you helped to build this country and together we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people, where it has always belonged. It's coming back to you, you see that. With your help, your devotion and your drive we are going to keep on working and we are going to keep on fighting and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. We are one movement, one people, one family and one glorious nation under God. America is thriving like never before and ladies and gentlemen, and especially the great ladies and gentlemen of Iowa, the best is yet to come. True, true. Because together we will make America wealthy again. We will make America strong again. We will make America proud again. We will make America safe again and we will make America great again. Thank you, Iowa. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you everybody. Thank you and Vice President Mike Pence, thank you very much. Incredible. And, hello to Fayetteville. Hello, Fayetteville. It's great to be here in North Carolina's ninth congressional district with the hardworking patriots who believe in faith, family, God and country. Thank you. Thank you. Tomorrow you'll head to the polls to elect a congressman who always puts America first, Dan Bishop. I've just come from a meeting with North Carolina officials representing communities hit by Hurricane Dorian and I expressed the unwavering solidarity of the American people, we are behind you 100%. 100%. The prayers of our entire nation are with the citizens of North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia, Florida and everyone else that was in the storms path, and I will say I was called by the government of The Bahamas and we're helping with The Bahamas. They were hit so hard. They were hit so hard. Who would believe it? We pledged the full support of the federal government through every step of the rebuilding process. And I will say, North Carolina in our country probably got hit the hardest. That was a little bit of a surprise, but I know one thing about North Carolina. You can take it and you'll build it quickly and you'll build it beautifully. And, you'll be back sooner then anybody ever thought and it'll be better then ever. Right? No doubt about it. I also want to give a special recognition to the many non-governmental organizations doing so much to help people recover from Dorian, in particular, Franklin Graham. He's a wonderful guy. He's got an organization, Samaritan's Purse, based right here in North Carolina and the work that Franklin and his family and all of those that are with Franklin Graham we want to thank them. Special, great people. Great People. Thank you Franklin. Thank you. Incredible job. He does such a great job. All over, whenever there's a problem you see Samaritan's Purse and Franklin and his people. We love the people of this state and we will never ever leave your side. North Carolina will truly recover so fast. I know you people so well. Let's not even talk about it. Let's not even talk about it. We're here tonight to discuss the extraordinary progress we're making as a nation and how to ensure this amazing resurgence keeps on going and going strong. In just over two years, we've taken this big beautiful ship and it's being turned around very quickly. Nobody thought this would happen. You know we won the greatest election, certainly one of them, but maybe the greatest, but we won… let's say one of the greatest, this way I won't be criticized. They'll say, "You know, George Washington had a great election too." The fake news right. The fake news. But, we won one of the greatest elections in history and because of that, and you would be in big trouble if we didn't, I can tell you that. You'd be… Instead of going up we were heading in the wrong direction. We have the number one economy anywhere in the world. And every time I meet a foreign leader, almost every time, they say, "Congratulations on what you've done with the economy." I said, "I didn't do it. I just set a certain path. The people of the United States did it." Number one anywhere in the world. And they tried to do the recession thing. You know, they tried the Russia thing. That didn't work. They tried many other things. I always say, "The media and their partner, the Democrats." I wouldn't mind fighting the Democrats, but we really have to look at it as a two-some. It's the media and the Democrats. It's one and the same. We're rebuilding our military, defending our sovereignty and reclaiming our dignity as a nation. America is winning again and America is respected again. They respect America. By the way, I have about 10 women in the front row and you come from North Carolina and they travel all over the place. Hold up your hands. These are great women. I see them so much, and I must say they have other things to do. They look rich as hell to me, I don't know. How many is this? How many rallies have you come too? They can't count. They said all of them except for two. That's a lot of rallies and it all emanates from this area. That's so great. Well, at least you won't have to travel so far for this one, right? Thank you very much for being here. We really appreciate it. Well, we appreciate it. We appreciate it. Thank you. Really incredible people. But you know, we've created six million new jobs since election day and I couldn't say that in my initial rallies because nobody would have believed it. Six million new jobs. More Americans are working today than ever before in the history of our country. Almost 160 million Americans, nobody would have thought that was possible. We wouldn't have been able to say it actually. We've now had 13 straight months of wage gains of at least 3%, so the people that work so hard… You remember I used to say during the rallies before we won, people worked two jobs, three jobs and they made less money then they made 21 years before and now wages are going up, the economy is doing great and jobs have never been better. So importantly, more than 70 million Americans have been lifted off of food stamps. Nearly 600,000 Americans entered the labor force last month alone. Think of that. And the unemployment rate for African-Americans just reached another brand new, yesterday, all time low in the history of our country. How do you lose that debate? Remember I used to say, "Why do you have to lose?" Well, now you have the best unemployment numbers, employment and unemployment numbers, that you've ever had as African-Americans, as Asian-Americans, as Hispanic-Americans. The best numbers we've ever had, and by the way, African-American youth unemployment has also reached the lowest level ever recorded in history. And, the labor force participation rate for women is at the highest level now in 15 years, and soon will be 35 years, and soon, I promise, will probably end up being better than ever. I can tell you the unemployment numbers for women are the best they've been now in 72 years. So, I always say kiddingly, "I'm sorry I didn't make it historic," but you know what? It's going to be historic very soon. It'll be historic very soon. And, here in North Carolina, over 230,000 more people now have jobs and small business formation has skyrocketed by more than 25%. Amazing. But, the radical democrats want to dismantle, demolish, and destroy everything that you've gained, and they will do it, and it won't take that long. And, that's why we need Dan Bishop and Greg Murphy. We need them. We need them going down. We need them going down to congress and helping. But, they can do it. It's also why we need four more years. It has to… See, it's like a plant. We've changed things, right? Keep America Great. We've changed things, but it's gotta grow. It's gotta develop those roots. And, once it does, it's going to be very hard for them to destroy what we've done. Very hard. And, that's really why I consider this election… Look, we had a very, very special day in 2016. It was a very special day. Very special day. It was an incredible day, an incredible month, an incredible year, and I don't know that you can ever compare anything to it. But, I can say this, 2020 is essentially just as important, because they'll try and take it away. Whether it has to do with religion. Our evangelicals are here tonight, and they're all over the place. And, what we've done for them, and for religion, is so important. You know, the other side, I don't think they're big believers… They're not big believers in religion. That I can tell you. You listen to some of them. They're trying, and they're trying put out little statements. They're not working too well. Little statements that are a little bit, sort of, not too good, huh? What is the word we want to use? Yeah, a little… Nah. Nah. They're pushing a little hard, and it's not working. To stop the far left, you must vote in tomorrow's special election. So important. Or, get your votes in early. I think a lot of… Who voted early for Dan Bishop? Good. Well, that's good, but the big thing is tomorrow. Tomorrow is the election, and you'll get out. To protect your family, you must defeat open borders. And, you have Democrat named Dan McCready, and he wants open borders. He wants sanctuary cities. He's not going to protect your Second Amendment. He's doing nothing on your Sec… You know, North Carolina's a very big Second Amendment state. And, Dan Bishop, Greg Murphy, these guys, they're going to protect your Second Amendment. But, one of the biggest issues in this election is, in fact, sanctuary cities. McCready supports sanctuary city policies that force prisons and jails to release criminal aliens directly into your neighborhoods. Get out. Go ahead. Go into the neighborhood. Go into… What's your neighborhood. Where do you… What? Rutherford County! Okay. So, how do you feel about having them released, hardened, horrible criminals into Rutherford County? I don't think so. But, your whole state… Honestly… Can I be honest? It's crazy what's happening. This whole thing with sanctuary cities, and you go to California, which is so many sanctuary cities, they don't know what's happening out there. You have people that want to get ride of those sanctuary cities, they just aren't able to do it with the people that get elected. A lot of illegal voting going on out there, by the way, a lot of illegal voting. In August, McCready said it was "the right call to set illegal alien criminals loose in the great state…" I'm using the words great state. He doesn't. "… Of North Carolina." With the support and encouragement of McCready, sanctuary jurisdictions in North Carolina have released thousands of dangerous criminal aliens into your communities, and you see it. You see it. The charges against these freed criminals includes sexual assault, robbery, drug crimes, kidnapping, and homicide. Murder. Why would you do it? Why would you do it? What is it? Explain it. Just recently, Mecklenburg County set free an illegal alien charged with first-degree rape and crimes against a child. Support for sanctuary cities is disloyalty to American citizens, and McCready wants sanctuary cities with all of their protections for people that are serious criminals. Tomorrow is your chance to send a clear message to the America-hating left, and it's gotta be. And, by the way, we're building that wall, and it's going up very big. Very big. And, you think it's easy to get money when you have the entire Democrat party… And, they control the House, and we want to change that. We want to flip the house. We'll get so much. It'll be amazing what we can do for our country. We don't want dangerous criminal aliens roaming free in North Carolina. We want to take care of it. This state should be a sanctuary for law abiding Americans, not for criminal aliens. Our great Republican candidate, Dan Bishop, will fight with everything he has to stop sanctuary cities and defend the people of this great state. Dan, come on up. Dan Bishop, everyone. Get out and vote. Come on up, Dan. We need a doctor. A doctor in the house, please. A doctor, please. Doctor in the house. Thank you. Take your time, please. Take your time. We've got plenty of time. Thank you. Take your time. Thank you, Doctor. Take your time. People have been standing outside for two days to get in, so this happens. Thank you. Thank you, Doctor. Doing better? Good. That's good. That's good. That's great. That's really great. Thank you! Thank you, sir. Thank you. That's really great. Thank you very much. I guess Dan's speech wasn't so good. What do you think? That's great. Thank you very much. Great job. Thank you, Doctor. Thank you, everybody. Thank you, law enforcement. Thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you, Dan. That was a good job. That was a good job. He means it, too. He's great. Go out and vote tomorrow for Dan Bishop, please. So, we've had great support over the last six months in particular from a man who happens to be your senator right now, and we need him to keep going, because he has been fantastic. And, I believe he's here tonight. I just came in. The weather wasn't so great to be traveling today, and they said, "Maybe we could skip North Carolina today, sir." So, I said, "No, thank you." I said, "No, thank you." Can you imagine? And, by the way, I have to say, we have a big crowd in here, right? You haven't seen outside. Thousands and thousands of people who couldn't get in. And, when people wait two or three days to come in and especially these first rows, I just want to tell you we really thank you. Incredible. But, Thom Tillis has really worked with us over the last period of time. He's recently introduced a bill to give American victims the right to sue sanctuary cities. That's a big deal. And hold them accountable for the lives that they've shattered. But, to pass the bill, we need more Republicans. Tomorrow there is another crucial special election, and we have a fantastic guy running in that one, too, Republican Greg Murphy. It looks like he's in good shape, but you've got to get it out. So, I want to introduce Thom Tillis, and I want to introduce Greg Murphy. I want to thank you both. Thank you. Thank you, Thom, and thank you, Greg. So, Greg Murphy is looking to, like Dan, cut your taxes, defend your Second Amendment, support our policies, really, really support our military and our veterans. We have rebuilt our military. Greg Murphy, come on up for a second here. Greg Murphy. Come up. Come up, Greg. Come on up, Greg. Come on up, Greg. Just for a second. Then, we'll get back to business. We've got to do this, and I don't know. He's been a great champ Thank you, Greg. Come. Please. Good luck tomorrow, Greg. Get out there and vote for those two guys. They're terrific. We're thrilled to be joined tonight by many more terrific Republican leaders. A man who's really been stepping up to the front. He defended Justice Kavanaugh when he was treated so badly. I've never seen anything like the treatment that Justice Kavanaugh received. And, everybody respects him, and everybody likes him. And, I like him, and we used to fight like hell, right? But, we don't fight anymore. We like each other a lot, and he's a special man. And, he's become a special friend. Senator Lindsay Graham. Another man who is a fighter… I guess we're all fighters. You have to be a fighter or you're not going to be here very long. I can tell you that. We've got to fight them more than anybody else. But, a man who's done an incredible job in Washington, took over a rough situation, and he's become a real leader, and that's Republican Leader, Kevin McCarthy. Kevin. Kevin's working so hard for so many different people. He wants to see Dan and Greg win so badly. Thank you for being here. Appreciate it, Leader. Representative David Rouzer. David, thank you. David Rouzer. He's done a fantastic job. Our lieutenant governor who is going to be, I think, a highly competitive candidate for a very important race, Dan Forest. Thank you, Dan. Thank you very much, Dan. We also have North Carolina Republican Party Chair, Michael Whatley. What a job you've done. And, we have a man from North Carolina who loves this state. He fights so hard. He doesn't know what it is not to fight. You know who I'm talking about? They got it, Mark. You're all screaming, "Mark Meadows." That's right. He's great. So many. Jim Jordan, Andy Biggs, Gaetz, and… I just got so… By the way, Devin Nunez. Devin Nunez. How about Devin? He was out there when it wasn't in vogue to be saying that Comey was a stone cold liar and leaker. But, he knew it all the time, Devin Nunez. But, Mark Meadows is pretty incredible, and do they love… … but Mark Meadows has been incredible, and do they love him in your state. Do they love Mark Meadows. Thank you Mark. Also a friend of mine who's been with us from the beginning, he's not a politician but he might as well be one. He loves us. He loves this party and he loves your state, lives here, Louis DeJoy. One of the most successful people. Thank you, Louis and your wife is… doing a great job Louis. And a very special thanks to my son, Don Junior and Kimberly. Great job. Did Don Junior give a good speech? I heard that. They all said, "He was on fire." Well, he's fighting. He loves this country. My son loves this country. My family loves this country, and two people, from your state, that the first lady, before she was first lady, she said, "You know, there are two people that are unbelievable. You've got to watch them." I said, "I'm not interested. I'm too busy." "No, no, no. You have to watch them. They're so great, they're so smart. They love the country, they love you." Diamond and Silk. They are incredible. Incredible people. Thank you very much. Thank you, what a job, and they're doing very well I have to tell you that. Our shared Republican agenda is pro-worker, pro-jobs, pro-family, pro-growth, and 100% pro-American. And by the way, so is Doug Collins, and so John Ratcliffe. Thank you fellows. Thank you. Two incredible fighters also. For decades our leaders put global interest and special interest ahead of your interest. You know that better than anybody, and this state knows it better than anybody. They traded away your factories, sold your future, squandered your tax dollars, sacrificed your security, and bogged us down in one foreign debacle after another. But all of that is changed. We're respected again. They're all saying, "Oh, gee. I hope he doesn't do this or that." They've taken advantage of us for years, and I have to say sadly, in many cases it's our allies that took the greatest advantage of this country. But now you finally have a president who understands that I'm not supposed to be the president of the world, I'm supposed to be the President of the United States of America. To bring back our jobs for other countries, we passed the largest package of tax cuts and reforms in American history. We've cut a record number of job killing regulations. No president, no longer how long they serve, has gotten anywhere even close to what we've done with regulations, and that's one of the reasons our economy is so good. And we have tremendous potential upward, and China wants to talk. They want to talk. China's lost three million jobs, thousands of companies are leaving China, the supply chain is crumbling because they can't pay the tariffs, and our country has taken over things that you would've never thought. As an example, hundreds of billions of dollars have been and are coming into our country in the form of tariffs, and China is eating the cost, which the fake news doesn't want to tell you. And out of the tens of billions of dollars that we've taken in, because of the fact that our great American patriot farmers have been targeted by China, they've been targeted, because they know the farmer is like Trump. I love the farmers. So they targeted the farmers, and I said to Sonny Perdue, Secretary of Agriculture, "Sonny, how much was it, last year and the year before? Tell me." It was $12 billion and it was $16 billion, and out of the tariffs that we've taken in, we gave to our farmers for distribution, hopefully very good distribution, hopefully very even distribution, we've given them $28 billion so that they're whole. So that they're whole. Nobody would ever do that. Nobody would ever do that, I can tell you that right now, and our farmers know we have to fight. I see it all the time, where some of the networks that are crazy, they have a group of farmers, in some cases they have groups of women, they say, "What do you think of President Trump?" "We like him a lot. We're with him all the way." And they want to turn off the cameras. They go crazy, but with the farmers you know that. You ever see that? The 10 women. "What do you think of President Trump?" "We love him!" Boy would I like to put you on television, I'll tell you right now, and they can't turn off those cameras fast enough, but they say to the farmers, "You voted for President Trump, are you happy?" And ever one of them said, "He did things that no ones ever done before." Who would think of getting 12 billion plus 16 million, $28 billion, because they've been targeted. That's the amount I asked Sonny, I said Sonny, "What's the amount they've took our of our farmers?" "It was 16 billion and the year before 12." And said Sonny, "We got to make that up," and we made that up. Who would do that? Nobody would do that. First of all, nobody else ever had tens of billions of dollars pouring in from China because it's always been the other way around. China has taken advantage of our country for decades, decades. And I guarantee you one thing, none of these Democrats, whether it's Pocahontas or Sleepy Joe, none of them would be able to do a thing about it, and nobody would ever think of helping the farmers who have been targeted by China. China made $500 billion over the last number of years, on a yearly basis, they steal our intellectual property. So many other things. So now it's just different, and now it's working the other way, and tariffs are a beautiful thing when you know how to use them, they're a beautiful thing. And I want China to do well, and I hope they do well, but they've had now the worst year in 57 years. I wonder why? I wonder why? And hopefully it'll all work out. We'll see. We're going to be talking next week. We're talking now. They're going to be coming to the United States in two or three weeks, and we'll see what happens, but unless we're going to make a good deal or a fair deal for our country, let's face it, we can not go back to a situation. We're giving hundreds of billions of dollars to China becomes standard fare. Not going to happen, we can't do it, and we have many other countries also, but we'll worry about them a little bit later. Plenty of others, they've taken advantage of our country like you wouldn't believe, and I've been saying this for many years. I was saying this when I was a private citizen. They take our jobs, they make our product, they sell the product into our country with no tax, no nothing. So we end up with closed factories, no jobs, no taxes, no nothing, and these other countries gain. As an example, Mexico, I must say they've really helped us at the border. The Democrats will not doing anything about these horrible open loopholes, which would be so good. So we're doing it a different way, and Mexico is now patrolling with 27,000 troops. They've never had two troops steward our border, and you saw the numbers today were down approximately 57%. But our country could fix it so easy if the Democrats would sit with me for 15 minutes, but they don't want to do that because they want to have open borders. They want to have drugs pouring into our country. You have to have a wall and you have to stop it, and when you look at what's happening with human trafficking, and it's mostly women, they traffic in women and they pour through our borders. Well, every inch of wall that we put up is vital and we're putting up miles and miles, and we intend by next year, at the end of the year, to have anywhere between 400 and 500 miles of wall built, and this is serious wall. This is the real deal. Serious wall. And I want to thank our new Secretary of Defense, Mark Esper, for the job he's done and he views it really as a national security threat, and you have to. What can be much more threatening that people that want to pour across our borders, and we have the worst walls, we have the weakest walls in the history of any country? You can't do anything to stop them. You have program, catch and release. You catch them and then you have to release them, and they're suppose to come back to court in the next three, four, fix, six years, and nobody shows up, and Democrats don't want to fix it. So we're stopping them, so we don't even have to worry about court. We ended the last administrations cruel war on American energy. The United States is now the number one producer of oil and natural gas anywhere in the world. And for all of these crazy people, but they're not so crazy, they know what they're doing, that talk about Russia, Russia, Russia. Russia's not too happy about that. Their primary source of income is oil and gas, and now we're bigger than Russia, bigger than Saudi Arabia. We're bigger than everybody, and we're doing great. So they're not exactly happy. The Russian Hoax, was a pure hoax, you saw that with Comey the other day. Yet every leading Democrat running for president pledges to ban the energy that drives our economy, and wage an under… If you look at what's going on your way of life is under assault by these people. I mean, I go out and sometimes I'll get these huge audiences, and I wish we could've gotten a large arena than this. We tried. I was even willing to stand out in the rain and get my hair soaking wet, but they said it was a little bit out of your district, and I said, "I don't know if it looks good being out of your district." But I was willing to do it, I would've taken it. I would have been very proud to have done it. It would've shown it's my real hair at least. It wouldn't be pretty, but it's my hair. May not be great, but I will say it's better than most of my friends who are the same age. A lot better. A lot! But we had a different location, as you all know, and we said, "Let's do this one. It's bigger." And we put screens outside for all of the people. We have screens and loud speakers and everything. It's really amazing what's going on out there, but after years of building up there countries, we are finally building up our country, that's the bottom line. The last administration, with Biden and Obama at the helm, they tried to ram through one of the worst trade deals that ever been negotiated, the Transpacific Partnership. You could've kissed many of your industries goodbye. TPP would've gutted the American auto industry. It would've been even worse than NAFTA, and we know how bad NAFTA was. All you have to do, is even to this day, look around at all those empty plants where people moved down and companies moved down to Mexico. Not under the USMCA. We got to get Nancy Pelosi to put it in for a vote, make it bipartisan. She'll have tremendous Democrat support. The farmers want it, the unions want it, the manufacturers want it, and by the way, 600,000 manufacturing jobs in this country, remember? You would need a magic wand. You can't do that anymore. Well, we did it, but we've got to get USMCA put up for a vote by the Democrats. But in my first week in office I proudly withdrew from that job destroying TPP catastrophe, and we're replacing one of the worst trade deals ever made by any country. You can go back as far as you want, NAFTA, the disaster of NAFTA. So whatever you do, start talking to your people, we need a vote on the USMCA. That's United States, Mexico, and Canada, and they've already voted. They want it and we want it, and it's great for the farmers. It's great for everybody. We're also aggressively combating a problem that you have in North Carolina, problem that we have in almost all states, the opioid epidemic. Last year we saw the first nationwide decline in drug overdose deaths in nearly 31 years. At the center of the American drug crisis is the border crisis. Criminal cartel smuggle vast quantities of lethal narcotics across our souther border, including heroin, meth, cocaine, and fentanyl. 100,000 people a year die from what comes across our souther border, and we can get the Democrats to help us in sealing it even tighter. We got to get them. We got to get them. We got to get them. So if you want to stop the drug smugglers, the human traffickers, the viscous MS13 gang members, and by the way thank you to ICE. These people go into those nests, we call them nets. These are vicious, vicious people. We got into the nests with our ICE people, and for them it's another day at the office. There aren't too many people in this room that want to do it for a living. Let me see. That guy would. Maybe him, maybe her, right? Maybe her. But it's a rough job and they get so little praise for the job that they do. So dangerous. These are many killers in those gangs, and we're taking them out of our country by the thousands, MS13. And as you know, Democrats even want to give free healthcare to illegal immigrants. As long as I'm your president I will never, ever let Democrats take away your healthcare, and give it away free to people that have entered our country illegally. We can't do that. It's a tremendous incentive to come in. Democrats also want to bring in unlimited numbers of foreign refugees from overseas, all at the expense of supporting their own communities. Republicans, no matter what you do, where you are, we want people to obey our laws. You want people that are going to help our country. The Democrat party has never been farther outside of the mainstream. Every major Democrat running for president supports a massive government takeover of healthcare that would raid Medicare, force private doctors out of medicine, and lead to the rationing of life saving treatments. And they want to take away your private healthcare, your private insurance. 180 million people will lose with what they want to do. It's a disaster. It's like, did you ever really feel where you don't even have to treat people nicely? You don't have any choice, you have to vote for me. I can leave right now. I can say, "North Carolina, I've had it with you. I'm leaving right now." And you know what? You got to go out and vote. What are you going to do? Put one of these crazy people running our country again? But it's never been so far left. I told a story the other day about a business man I saw, one of the biggest in the country. You probably know his name. He's hated me for 20 years, and I've hated him also. Okay? Now they're going to go out tomorrow, "Breaking news, Donald Trump hates people." You're sort of right about that. I never liked this guy, and I see him in the White House, and I say, "What are you doing here?" And he goes, "Mr. President." See now he calls me Mr. President. He used to call me something else. "Mr. President, I'm fighting for your victory." I said, "You got to be kidding." He goes, "Honestly, you're doing a great job, but also if this radical left gets in they're going to take away everything, and they're going to destroy our country." And for the first time I like this guy. My administration is defending your right to choose the plan and the doctor that is best for you. Remember President Obama? 28 times, remember 28 times, they counted them and there's much more than that I would imagine, that you can choose your plan, you can choose your doctor. It didn't work out that way, did it? Obamacare, and we're keeping Obamacare alive. We got rid of the individual mandate, the worst part of Obamacare. We're keeping it and running it as well as it can, but the premiums are too high. The deductibles are through the roof. It's ridiculous, and we're coming up with Lindsey Graham and all of the folks, we're coming up with a great healthcare plan that if we take back to the house. That's why Dan and Greg, if we take back the House, if we keep the Senate, and maybe even increase it a little bit, wouldn't be bad, and on the assumption we keep the presidency, you're going to have great healthcare. Thank you. We almost had it. We had a man campaigning for eight years to knock out Obamacare, and when he voted it didn't work out that way, did it? We had it, and we would have had it, but we're going to end up actually with a better plan. Sometimes through adversity things work out better. We're going to end up with a better plan, you watch. We'll always protect patients with pre-existing conditions also. Always, yep, my word. Our ambitious campaign to reduce the price of prescription drugs has produced the largest decline in drug prices in more than 51 years. Virtually every top Democrat also now supports late term abortion. Ripping babies straight from the mother's womb, right up to the moment of birth, and if you look at the governor of Virginia, he was even talking about essentially you would say an execution. He was talking after the baby is born, the doctor will talk to the mother and they'll make the decision as to whether or not that baby lives. This is a radical Democrat idea. That's why I've asked Congress to prohibit extreme late term abortion, because Republicans believe that every child is a sacred gift from God. Democrats are now the party of high taxes, high crime, open borders, late term abortion, and socialism. They're socialists. The Republican party is the party of the American worker, the American family, and the American dream. Every day they're making good on the motto, "Promise made, promises kept." In fact, we are keeping even more promises by far than we made, or than we promised. So many more. So many more. So many more. You know what we did with respect to people that are very sick or terminally ill, right? Right to try it's called. I love that name. Right to try. We have some of the greatest doctors in the world, labs in the world, hospitals in the world, and we have incredible medicine that's prohibited from being used until it gets approval, and sometimes that approval can take many years. And I said, "Wait a minute, if a person is sick… " And they've been trying to get this for 45 years. I said, "If a person is sick, and maybe terminally ill, why aren't we letting them try this new technology?" And so many things are happening, and we did Right to Try. And it wasn't easy, but I was helped by Lindsey and a lot of great people. A lot of great people. All of them helped. Mark helped so much. All of them help. Rick. We have had a tremendous success. We had so many people wanting to help, but it was complicated believe it not because the country didn't want the liability. I said, "You know what you do? You draw up an agreement taking away liability." They said, "That's a good idea." The insurance companies and the drug companies were very unsure. This has been going on for many years. I got it done. The results have been unbelievable. Right to Try. Things that we've never even talked about we're getting done. Maybe one of the biggest things is within about a month, we'll have close to 180 federal judges, including the public division judges. Including two great new Supreme Court Justices. Justice Neil Gorsuch, and Justice Brett Cavanaugh, who they put through hell. We passed something that they've wanted to do for half a century. We passed VA Choice. So when your great and honored veterans are waiting in line for three weeks, four weeks, five days, 10 days, two months, they go to a private doctor, we pay for the bill, and they get themselves taken care of, instead of dying, which was happening. And we also passed VA Accountability on behalf of our great veterans. That means when they treat our veterans, and they wouldn't have done it in primetime I can tell you, but when they treat our sick and trouble veterans badly we can say, "You're fired. Get the heck out." It's called VA Accountability. That's another one we've been trying, and in all fairness the unions made it very tough. Civil service made it almost impossible. Everyone said, "You're never going to get it done." We got it done. We want to thank the Republican Senate. I want to thank some incredible people in the House of Representatives, and Kevin I want to thank you… … people in the House of Representatives. And Kevin, I want to thank you because that was a great job you did on that one. That was a great job, thank you, Kevin McCarthy. We've received record funding for the US military, 700 billion last year, 716 billion dollars this year, 738 billion dollars … And you know, know I'm a big believer in budgets but we have no choice. We had to rebuild our military with all that's going on today with China, with Russia, with radical Islam, with everything that's happening, we had to do something. And you know, budgets are fine, I love budgets and we will get to that, don't worry about it. But we had to rebuild, our military was totally depleted, it was totally depleted. We have beautiful new F-35's, F-18's, new ships, new missiles, new rockets, we have new everything. I came back with Admiral Brown, the United States Coast Guard and some of the other folks, and they were saying that the new Coast Guard cutters … How good a job has the Coast Guard done during these hurricanes? And I said, "Admiral, how good are the new Coast Guard cutters?" He said, "They're the finest in the world, sir." And they had old broken equipment that they had to keep going on a shoestring. They have brand new Coast Guard cutters. We had to do it, we had to do it. There's always time for the other but we had to do it. We've rebuilt our military, we've taken care of the great people that work in our military. We gave them a raise, a beautiful raise they were so entitled to. And I also got other NATO members to pay an additional 100 billion dollars over the last year and a half that they weren't paying, they were delinquent. We're supposed to protect them and they don't pay, I say you can't do that. You can't do that, you got to pay, NATO. Now we're finally making immensely wealthy countries pay the cost of their defense, we're negotiating with a lot of them. Think of it, we have these immensely wealthy countries and they're paying for a fraction of our cost to defend them. How did that happen? And do you know what the biggest excuse is when I go to them and I'll say, "King, you got to pay," or, "Mr. Prime minister, you got to pay," or, "Mr. President, you've got to pay," you know? It's costing us billions of dollars to protect these wealthy. You know what their biggest thing is? Because I can't understand how we did this for so many years, decades, decades … "You have been defending all of …" I won't mention names because I don't want to embarrass anybody. I don't want to, forget it, some of the wealthiest countries in the world. And when I say, "King, President, Prime Minister, Queen," no matter what I say, you know what they say? "But nobody's ever asked us to do that before," that's the only excuse. Because I say to them, "Why would we do this? Why are we defending you? You're immensely wealthy, you compete with us on trade." We have lousy trade deals that we are renegotiating many of them and ultimately all of them. "Why are we protecting you, Mr. President?" "Well, I don't know, I don't know." But you know what their answer is? "Because you've always done it." That's not a great answer. So we're taking in billions and billions but I've got 100 billion dollars and the Secretary General of NATO, Stoltenberg, is my biggest fan. He said, "Until President Trump, you had to see the data across the spending was going like this." And ours was going like this, we were defending many countries that treat us very badly on trade and very unfairly. We were defending them and now it's changing, around 100 billion dollars, they're not happy. And then I read where Obama is more popular in Germany than Trump. He's got to be, I'm making people pay their bills, he's got to be. You know, the day that I'm more popular than him, I'm not doing my job. The big story, they like him more in Europe than they like Trump. I think they should. 100 billion dollars more they're paying. To protect America's security, I withdrew the United States from the horrible one-sided Iran Nuclear Deal. We paid them 150 billion dollars for that piece of work. I withdrew it and we put sanctions all over the place and they're a much different country and let's see what happens. But I can tell you they'd like to get back to business because they're not doing very well. When I came into office, Iran was a real terror. 18 sites of confliction, they were behind every one of them in the Middle East. And who knows, could have been elsewhere. And I said we're not going to do it, 150 billion dollars President Obama paid and 1.8 billion in cash. Whoever saw a million dollars piled up as a promotion? In hundred dollar bills, it's a lot. Now take a million dollars and make it 1.8 billion dollars in cash. I'm actually more impressed with that number than 150 billion dollars, you want to know the truth. 1.8 billion dollars in cash and we got taken to the cleaners so I terminated the deal. And I recognized Israel's true capital and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem which every president said they would do. And I also approved for Israel the Golan Heights and if you really think about it, I said to people, "What's more important, the Golan Heights or the capital of Jerusalem by moving our embassy there?" He said, "Neither, sir. What you've done in Iran is more important than both of them." I said, "You know, I guess you're right when you think about it." So we've done a good job, all of us together, as a movement we've done a great job for Israel. For years, you watched as your politicians apologized for America. Now you have a president who is standing up for america and we are standing up for the people of North Carolina. You must never forget that the 2020 election is about one thing thing, you. It's true, it's not about me, it's about you. It's about your family, your future and the fate of your country. That's what we did in 2016, they came from the hills and valleys, they came from the cities, they came from all over the place and people were saying, these fakers back there, they were saying, "What the hell is happening?" But I knew it was going to happen because we go out and we see these rallies, the likes of which no one has ever seen before ever, ever, ever in politics, ever in politics. A vote for any Democrat in 2020 and a vote for any Democrat tomorrow in North Carolina is a vote for the rise of radical socialism and a destruction of the American dream. We are entering this campaign with the best record, the best results, the best agenda and the only positive vision for the people of North Carolina. And I've said it and I say it loudly and proudly, I don't believe there's been any president or any administration that has done more in 2.5 years then we have as a group in America. When you add it all up, nobody's done what we have. Our first task is a giant victory. Tomorrow, right here in the great state of North Carolina with your support, tomorrow we take the first steps to firing Speaker Pelosi and winning back the House in 2020. We need everybody to get your friends, get your family, get your neighbors and get out and vote for Dan Bishop and get out and vote for Greg Murphy, you got to get out tomorrow and vote. Together we will lift millions more from our horrible, horrible situations that have developed over the years. Look at what's happening to Democrat-run cities, every single one of them. We are going to lift millions more of our citizens from welfare to work, dependence to independence, and poverty to prosperity. With your help, we will elect for Republicans to Congress to create a safe, modern, fair and lawful system of immigration. We will enact great deals that result in more products probably stamped with the four beautiful words made in the USA, made in the USA. You want made in America, I don't care, what do you like better? Made in america or made in the USA? Go ahead. Wait, ready? You want made in America then made in the USA. What do you like better, made in America, made in the USA? Okay, I think we know that answer. So in 2016 we had in my opinion the greatest phrase in the history of politics, make America great again. Now we are within moments hopefully of having, despite what you heard a few weeks ago, where we were heading. And they're going, "Please, please let there be a recession, please." They're willing to give up their results because they think it will help them win the election. They're not going to win the election. Don't forget, we are doing this and still fighting the unfairness of China and other countries on trade. What happens when that gets fixed and other things get fixed? We're setting new records and we're fighting trade deals and we're fighting military deals that are unfair to our country. Think what happens when it all gets fixed, We have ourselves a country that's going to be so strong. But we had a phrase, make what? Make America great again, the best. I think it was maybe the greatest, 2016, but we've done a lot and now they're very close to setting a new … I think it's the 118th time that we will have set a new record with the stock market, right? Many, many times, many, many times. I can't be certain that many but it's a lot, okay? I always have to preface it because there'll be headlines, Trump didn't tell the truth. So I've always got to be extremely cautious. We had the greatest phrase of all time and even the fake news media would agree, make America great again, MAGA country, make America great again. Now we still have a year and a half, little bit less, can you believe it? Can you believe it? I stood in the White House with the first lady that first night and I said, "Wow, look at this. That's the bedroom of Abraham Lincoln," you have to see this. It's so perfectly done, it's so the way it was. We announced it in front of the press and in 2026. And I said, "Well, wait a minute, under the normal rules I will be out in 2024 so we may have to go for an extra term." Oh, they're going crazy. Tomorrow, you will see headlines, Trump wants an extra term, I told you, I told you. He wants an extra term, ladies and gentlemen. We told you, we told you he's a dictator, we told you. No, no, I'm only kidding, I'm only kidding. But we actually have the World Cup, it's the biggest sporting event in the world and we got it. And that's where we're working it also with Mexico and Canada to give them some of the games. We've got a great relationship with the World Cup, it's a big deal. Bob Kraft helped me with the New England Patriots people. Tom Brady had a pretty good game the other night, right? They have a good a coach, whether you like it or not, and I know you, North Carolina. But how good a coach, in all fairness here, is Coach Belichick? How good is he? I know you want to be cool but he's pretty good. We have to appreciate genius, we all like genius. But we are going to achieve new breakthroughs in science, medicine, finding new cures for childhood cancer and ending within 10 years the AIDS epidemic in America. That's shocking to hear that but we can do it, we're going to do it, definitely. Incredible, the strides that we have made. We will defeat the Democrats to drive up the cost of houses, cars, healthcare and education by liberating Americans from their analysts' push for a job killing, soul crushing Washington regulations. As an example, we're trying to get the car companies, going to give them a little bit of extra energy and they will be able to build a car that consumers can buy which will be better than the car they make today. And you'll save 3,500 dollars, think of that. It will be safer, it will be better, you can save 3,500 dollars, it will be less costly. And we're going to try to get that done. And then they were forcing you to buy light bulbs that cost a fortune, so I signed something a couple days ago that gives you the right to continue to use the incandescent light bulbs, I don't know about you, much less expensive lights that are beaming down over us. But you know, somebody told me that as you know, they're much more expensive bulbs than for what you save. But they said that if the bulb break, it's considered almost like the waste site. It's very big, the bulbs, the new bulbs, they're very dangerous with all of the gases. And I said, "What's the point?" Well, then he said, "Well, I'm saying if we continue that production, they can buy whatever they want to buy but it can really save a tremendous amount of money and even have a light that's better." And there is a big danger, in fact they have labels, don't break this bulb. What do you do, you're going to throw it away? I promise I won't break it, all the new ones. So you can hopefully buy the new ones but you can buy the old ones too and you can save a lot of money and you could even look better. We will defend privacy, free speech, free assembly, religious liberty and the right to keep and bear arms. Above all, we will never stop fighting for the values that bind us together as one America, we'll be one united nation. We'll support, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States. We stand with the incredible heroes of law enforcement, thank you, law enforcement. We believe in the dignity of work and the sanctity of life. We believe that faith and family, not government and bureaucracy, are the true American way like you. We believe that children should be taught to love our country, honor our history, and to always respect our great American flag. And we will live by the words of our national motto, in God we trust, it'll stay there. We stand on the shoulders of American patriots who crossed the ocean, settled the continent, tamed the wilderness, revolutionized industry, pioneered science, won two world wars wars, defeated fascism and communism, put a man on the moon and built the most exceptional country in the history of the world. We are great Americans and the future belongs to us. The future belongs to you. With your help, your devotion and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we are going to keep on fighting and I'd like to fight a little less with these people but they just don't stop. They just keep coming at you in waves. They are unfortunately not the best people. And we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning, we're going to keep on winning. We are one movement, one people, one family and one glorious nation under God. America is thriving like never before, we may have right now the greatest economy in the history of our nation. And ladies and gentlemen of North Carolina, the best is yet to come. Together we will make America wealthy again. We will make America strong again, we will. We will make America safe again. And we will make America great again. Thank you, everybody. Thank you, North Carolina. Thank you.What a crowd, what a crowd. Get those people over here. See me. Let them come over. What is a big crowd, it's always big. We want to win. We got to win. We want to save our country from the radical left, the radical left crazies. Thank you very much. And hello, North Carolina, hello, North Carolina. We love you, North Carolina. I'm thrilled to be in Fayetteville with thousands of loyal, hard working American patriots. And you know what's going to happen in 45 days from now, and you're watching those polls. They go up, up, up up. 45 days from now, we're going to win North Carolina. We're going to win four more years in the White House. As we meet tonight, our nation mourns the loss of a legal giant Supreme Court Justice, Ruth Bader Ginsburg. Her landmark rulings, fierce devotion to justice and her courageous battle against cancer inspire all Americans. You may agree. You may not disagree with her, but she was an inspiration to a tremendous number of people. I say, all Americans Justice Ginsburg's close relationship with a friend of ours, a friend of mine, Justice Scalia, is also a powerful reminder that we can disagree on fundamental issues while treating each other with decency, dignity, and respect. Our thoughts and prayers are with her family. Thank you very much. So Article II of our constitution says the president shall nominate justices of the Supreme Court. I don't think it can be any more clear, can it? I don't think so. I don't think so. What do you think, Thom? Thom Tillis, I don't think it can be any more clear. This can only happen in North Carolina. I hope you hear that back home. Look at all that press. That's a lot of press. That's a lot of fake news. Well, I hope they hear. So the chant, this is a new one. Fill that seat. This is the chant. This can only happen to me. Fill that seat. Now it says the president is supposed to fill the seat, right? And that's what we're going to do. We're going to fill the seat. With a great hat. I want to try one of those hats. I love that. No, think of it. 29 times, every single time nobody said, "Oh, let's not fill the seat." We won the election. Now then we have some senators that, forget it. Think of it, I won't say it. I won't say it, Susan. I won't say it, Susan. But Thom Tillis is with us. I can tell you that. Great. We have great Republican senators. We have great people and we have a great country. That's really, we have a great country. And we're going to keep it that way. So we win an election and those are the consequences. It's called fill that seat and that's what we're doing. The Supreme Court was a very central issue in both the 2016 presidential election and then the 2018 midterm elections where, by the way, I didn't run. We had a lot of people, a lot of people said, "Oh, he really took a little bit of a shellacking." Not nearly as bad as others. In fact, we gained seats in the Senate, but they never talk about that. They don't talk about that. We gained two seats. Nobody talked about it. But we didn't run. And I had a lot of people that, "Sir, we'll never vote in 2018." I said, "No, no vote, everybody vote. They just didn't. I think we were like 9 million people decided they wanted to wait and they've waited and you see what's going on. You see what's happening. You see the enthusiasm that we have. Which, by the way, we set a record in 2016. The bad news for the Democrats is we are more enthusiastic now. Not even close, than we were in 2016. We are getting crowds and this is pandemic and we're rounding the turn. We're rounding the corner of the pandemic. But we're having them outside. And we shouldn't say this is some kind of a rally from now on. It's called a protest. We are protesters. We're going to call on our rallies that because you see a lot of these, let's call them blue states, we want to be nice. We're going to call it a protest against stupidity. So we are going to have protests against stupidity. And Pennsylvania. Look what they're doing in Pennsylvania. A great state, that's actually something very special is going to happen here, in Pennsylvania. That's a commonwealth. We always have to remember Pennsylvania, commonwealth. Got two of them and you better remember you get in trouble. But we love Pennsylvania. And it's a shut down. The governor's got it just shut down nice and tight. And you know what? On November 4th, it's going to be opened up. Because they're trying to hurt our numbers. But our economic numbers are so good. They're staggering. They're the best we've ever had. Jobs, retail, stock, market, everything. And this is with a lot of shutdowns by Democrats. That's all they're doing. On November 4th, they'll announce, "We've decided to open up." One of the teachers groups said, actually, one of the unions and one of the politicians in California said, "No, we're not going to do it. We need to do it. We should be open by November 4th." That was not a good thing for them to say. That person I think was fired, I think was fired. In both the 2016 and the 2018 elections, the American people chose a president and a Senate majority united in their commitment to selecting nominees who believe in applying the Constitution as written. Both the White House and the Senate majority have a moral duty to fulfill the promises they made to the voters. And that is exactly what we're going to do. We said that if for any reason, we have a vacancy on the United States Supreme Court, we will fill that vacancy. We're not going to say, and by the way, we have plenty of time. There's a lot of time. You're talking about January 20th. So we will uphold equal justice under the law for citizens of every race, color, religion, and creed. I won't be putting forth a nominee next week. It will be a woman. It will be a woman unless, wait, okay, let's do a poll. Oh, there they are. How many of these have you come to? Speaking of women, how many of, what is this number one? Like 90, they're great. North Carolina, though. I see them all over the place, they're great. Anyway, I hope your husbands are okay with it. Are they okay? They're okay. You have good husbands. But we're going to do a vote. So I said, I love these free polls because pollsters and most of the pollsters are corrupt as far as I'm concerned. If we believed in pollsters we wouldn't be here right now. But we're actually getting very good. We just had a 53 from Rasmussen, which is very good. Considering we won four years ago with a lot lower than 53. History has shown that when you're at 53 you can't lose an election. Has anyone ever lost an election with a 53? The answer is yes, when the other side cheats. That could happen, that could happen. That could happen. You saw what happened in Pennsylvania. Some state supreme court justice just ruled that they can take as long as they want to count the ballots. That means I'll be leading and winning Pennsylvania like we did last time. Yeah, yeah. We'll be leading, we'll be winning Pennsylvania. We're going to win it easy. We're going to win your state easily. And Deb, what a great, she's doing such a good job. But Mark, just a few months ago, I've been trying to get him for three years to leave and we have a great person running as you know. Really, I mean really great. Does everyone know Madison? Yes? You're going to vote for Madison? He's great. He's a great guy. But Mark had a beautiful head of black hair and I just noticed that hair's turning white very fast. But we're doing a job. We're very close to a great deal with TikTok, TikTok but nobody cares about that anymore. All they care about is fill that seat, right? Until about 24 hours ago, that's all they talked about is TikTok, TikTok. We have a deal worked out, I think with Walmart is going to buy it along with Oracle. Larry Ellison, it's going to be an incredible combination. And I said, "Do me a favor. Could you put up $5 billion into a fund for education so we can educate people as to real history of our country, the real history, not the fake history." Because we're getting very close to that deal. And all of the technology will be maintained here. They're going to move probably to the great state of Texas. Sorry, we got you a lot of business when it came… but they're going to move into the United States, which is what's important. They're moving to the United States, unbelievable company. They're going to have 25,000 jobs. If it all goes, I gave them the preliminary approval. But they're putting up $5 billion. And my only problem is they did it so fast. I should have asked for more. What happened is when I suggested they should put up a lot of money everybody said, senators, congressmen, women, everybody. They said, "You can't do that. That's never been done." That's the problem, nothing's ever been done. And we had other companies, a lot of people wanted it. And I said, "You got to put up $5 million either to the Treasury of the United States maybe or into some education fund or do something." And they were sort of agreeing with me. They thought it was okay. And then I went to the legal legals here and I said, "They're going to put up $5 million, give it to the United States." "Sir.,You can't do that. There's no provision." I said, "How the hell can there be no provision. We're making the deal possible. Why can't they give us $5 billion dollars?" That's b, that's a lot of money. Now, watch the crazy Democrats. They'll go, "They should have gotten more money." It's never been done before. They should have, no matter what you do. They should have gotten more. Schumer and Nancy Pelosi, crazy Nancy. But I'll tell you. And I said it last night, we had a great rally. Last night, you saw that in a place that we're going to win. We're going to win Minnesota. Hasn't been won since 1972. And they're all saying, "Well, we did give them back the big iron ore range." It was, Obama took it away with the stroke of a pen. He put everybody out of work. We gave it back. But I'll tell you what, we're going to have a victory on November 3rd, the likes of which you've never seen. Now we're counting on the federal court system to make it so that we can actually have an evening where we know who wins. Not where the votes are going to be counted a week later or two weeks later. But in just three and a half years under my administration, we've secured America's borders rebuilt the awesome power of the U.S military, think of that. And I shouldn't say this and the fake news keeps going, "Oh, he's given away classified information." No I'm not. We are building and we have built weapons the likes of which this world has never seen before. And I said that a week ago and it was a headline and one of these fake newspapers where, "He's giving away confidential information," these people are crazy. No, no. I'm just telling you that- Crazy. No, no. I'm just telling you that President Putin and President Xi of China, Russia, China, North Korea, everybody. They are so envious of what we're doing. They can't even believe it. If they know, they perhaps don't know. Under Obama, they knew immediately, okay. Under us, but we are building weapons, all made in the USA. The likes of which no country has ever seen before. And hope to God, we never have to use them. That's the key, I don't ever want to use them. Remember, I was supposed to be a guy that was going to get us into a war in the first week. Remember that? Where's the war? We're taking them out of Afghanistan. We're almost finished with that. Working along well. We're taking them out of Syria, other than I left some behind for the oil, we kept the oil, is it okay that we kept the oil? Is it okay we kept the oil? Let's go back to my poll. Ready? So we're putting, I think it should be a woman, because I actually like women much more than I like men, I have to say. No, I do. I do, I like women more. So I have to make a decision, to fill the seat, as we say, we should have a new campaign. Let's make a t-shirt, fill the seat. Okay? My people are so good, tomorrow, it'll be all over the place. That's a good idea. That's a good idea. Fill the seat. Okay watch this, so good tomorrow you'll see them all over the place, fill the seat. I don't know how the hell they do it, but they get it done fast. You remember I said, where's Hunter? Where's Hunter? The next day, it was like one of the biggest selling t- shirts where is Hunter? What the hell ever happened? He took the money and he ran I think. Where's Hunter? He took the money, he went to China, he took 1.5 billion. He had no experience. He didn't have a job until this guy became vice president. Then he went to China, he got $1.5 billion. I asked the head of a great company, Blackstone. One of the biggest in the world. I said, "Steve, let me ask you a question. Is that possible?" "No, that's never done." China doesn't do that. Well, how did a guy with no experience do this? He said, "Very simple. His father's vice president." Is that what you want? And then Ukraine, $183,000 a month, and a $3 million upfront payment for him and his friends, think of this, with no experience and no job, and they said, do you know energy? It's an energy company that paid it. Do you know energy? No, I don't. I've not familiar with the subject. Our great Congressman. Right? How the hell does this happen? I think it will be brought up into debate. I think it will be brought up in the debate, I think. Where is Hunter? Where is Hunter? You know where Hunter is? He's probably on the Riviera having a very good time. He's giving some great energy advice. He's learning. He's taking a night class on energy for 180 grand. Where is Hunter? They're corrupt. Remember Joe with a prosecutor? $ 1 billion, I'm not giving it to them until they get those prosecutors away from my son or whatever the hell he said, that crazy company over in Ukraine. $1 billion. I'm not giving it. You get them out. And guess what? They got them out. Here's your billion dollars. Now that's called quid pro quo. Right? That's the real deal. With us, there was none. They made it up. Remember when Shift made the phony speech? Eight times he said the same thing, except that's not what happened. Fortunately, we had those wonderful people that write every perfect word, every word. I'm glad we had them because we're dealing with a bunch of thieving bad people. So women and men, ready? Would you rather have a woman on the Supreme Court or would you rather have a man? Ready? A woman or a man. So, would you rather have me choose, this is a very scientific poll. Actually, it's a lot more accurate than these polls that interview like 97 people have been interviewed, then they charge you a million dollars and they probably don't interview the people. They sit behind their desk. Would you rather have a woman on the Supreme Court? Yes, woman. Yes? Tom tiller says yes. Or would you rather have a man on the Supreme Court? What's going on? Let's give it one more quick chance. This is a free poll. And this is a lot of people. This is tens of thousands of people. This is a lot of people. You know, the fake news, they'll say, "He had a smattering of people." If Bernie Sanders had a crowd. Oh, he had a massive crowd. It was so big. With me, my crowds are five times bigger than Bernie's. And they'll say, "He had a smattering of people." They were in the middle of an airport that nobody ever heard of. Thousands. If those people, come on, bring them over. What the hell, at this point, might as well, let them come on over. Come on over. You got thousands of people behind these people. I would imagine the sight lines aren't too good. You have stands in front. Okay. So one more time. Who would rather have a man on the Supreme Court? Who would have a woman on the Supreme. Now tomorrow, like fake news, CNN, he was playing games with the United States. It is a terrible thing he's done. No, I'm just taking a poll, please. And by the way, that's a very accurate poll, because that's the way I feel. It will be a woman, a very talented, very brilliant woman. Who I haven't chosen yet, but we have numerous women on the list. I built this incredible list of brilliant people. And we're asking for Biden's list. He can't give it. You know why? Because if he ever gave a list, he'd either put somebody in the left middle, which would be okay. You could get votes, or he'd put one, somebody, which is what he's going to choose, so far left, now, if he did the left middle, he loses his entire left coast. Right? And if he loses the left coast, that's the end of his election. And last time, remember how many people I got from Bernie, because of trade. A lot of the Bernie people vote for us because Bernie is right about one thing, trade. But Bernie took a bad defeat, didn't he? It was a bad loss. He's one of the most gracious losers I've ever seen, he is. All Elizabeth Warren, Pocahontas had to do is leave. If she left before Super Tuesday, Bernie would have won every one of those States, but they split up that vote. That's too bad, but we have Sleepy Joe, we'll see how that works out. I think it's working out pretty good. We were winning so much, we didn't even have, we could have called off the election. We were winning by so much, and then the plane came in from China. And in many ways, I had to go back to work, but I had to go back to work on this one too. And now we're going up and up and up and we're winning and we're winning all over the place. Because I happen to think, I just say what I want. And you know, they make up a lot of false stories. They will make up a lie. Like what I said about military. Can you imagine? No animal would say that. They make it up and then they put it in ads. So once they did that, the only good thing is I can say, I said, "Now I can say anything." He is the worst candidate, the dumbest of all candidates, but he was dumb in prime time, as told to me by a Senator from long ago, he said, "Who's the dumbest in the Senate, who's the smartest in the Senate?" The smartest is, I won't tell you. But the dumbest is Joe. I said, "Who's Joe." He said, "Joe Biden." That was 25 years ago. That was in prime time. He is the worst candidate in the history of presidential politics. If I lose to him, I don't know what I'm going to do. I will never speak to you again. You'll never see me again. No, how do you lose? He is honestly, I go up and these guys are grilling me all the time. Stephanopoulos grill, grill. Okay. It's all right. It's okay. I think it came out very, well it's always, it comes out well. You have to be able to answer. They're very weak compared to some of the foreign people that we deal with from foreign countries, leaders of foreign countries. But I say he's always using a teleprompter. I don't care if he uses a teleprompter, you know what bothers me? That means the fake news is giving him the questions. So that's what really… they never gave me the questions. If I ever said, in fact, I'm going to say it now. I want from now on you to give me the questions before you ask me. And I'm going to read the questions off the teleprompter, and the questions are so easy. Did you see Anderson Cooper? He's a nice guy. He's interviewed me over the years, a lot, but he's a tough interviewer. Did you see those softballs? What do you think Donald Trump is a very bad human being. Do you agree with that? Yes, I do, Anderson. I've never seen softballs, and actually they're getting hit by it. They're getting hit by it. It's just a terrible thing. I mean, this is a guy, I used to call him 1% Joe, because he ran numerous times and he could only get 1%. In fact, he actually had 1% with an arrow pointing left. That means less than one. Now he's shot, he's got half of his head left, and he's out, think of it. He's totally shot. And he ends up getting the nomination. He couldn't get it in prime time. What the hell is going on with the world today? What's going on? What's going on with the world, Mark Meadows? Unbelievable Meadows, oh boy. He's a smart guy, Meadows, great, great guy, North Carolina, in just three and a half years, we obliterated the ISIS caliphate. Remember when I had it down to 99%, they said, "You got to finish it." I said, "Let somebody else finish it." And we went, and we finished it. We fixed our disastrous trade deals, which we have. China's now paying us billions and billions of dollars. But you know, I view it differently now, I view China much differently now, after the plague came in, I view it differently. And we brought your jobs back home to North Carolina and our contract. In three years of President Trump, real median household income rose by almost $7,000. Now think of that, three years, three years, right? Achieving the highest median income in the history of our country. This is in three years. Under 16 years of presidents, Barack Hussein Obama, ladies and gentlemen, is President Barack Hussein Obama, or as Rush Limbaugh, the great, how great is Rush? Do we love Rush? As Rush Limbaugh would say, Barack Hussein Obama. You ever hear Rush? Barack Hussein Obama. Rush is great. He's doing well too. He's great. He's a tough guy. We love Rush. We love you Rush. He watches every one of these rallies. You know, he supported me when I came down with our great first lady, I came down the escalator. I made a speech. I didn't even have a speech writer, I had to wing it. The winging speeches are the best ones like last night. But Rush said, "I like that guy. I'd never heard that before. I'd never heard we're going to build a wall." We're going to have secure borders. We're going to make new trade deals that are like sane. We're going to do all the things we're going to rebuild our military. We're going to have a strong country again. We did so many things, and Rush heard this. I didn't know Rush. I mean, maybe I met him once, twice, for two seconds. And he became an instant fan of Trump. And he was for a long time before I even got to know him. And he's been so important, he's the King, 39 million listeners. There's nobody like him. Try sitting down for what is it? Three hours? And talking, just talking with everyone. 39 million people, often. Try sitting. We love Rush. I love Rush. But listen, try sitting down with a radio show with millions and millions of people listening, and talk for three hours without phone calls. Phone calls are easy. Hey, what do you think of this? What do you think. Just talk. Talk. And everybody finds it fascinating. And it is fascinating. I wish I had time to listen more often. It's a little tough as president, but everybody finds it fascinating. And we gave Rush, because he's such an important person and done such an incredible job the Presidential Medal of Freedom. And Catherine, his wife is great. What a couple. But Rush has been unbelievable. He's so on our side. And he was from literally day one, right from the beginning. And we don't have to mention Sean, and Laura, and so many others. We don't have to mention Lou, the great Lou Dobbs, right? I mean, Lou Dobbs said, Lou started years ago, and he liked us from the beginning. He said, "Donald Trump is going to be a very good president." Okay. That was the first little time. Then he went, "Donald Trump. I love Donald Trump, but he's the best since Ronald Reagan." Then he went, "Donald Trump is an even better president than Ronald Reagan." So that was about a year and a half into it. Then the great Lou Dobbs said, "Donald Trump may be the greatest of all time. Greatest of all time." And then somebody said, "Can I ask you Lou, when you say the greatest, does that include Abraham Lincoln and George Washington?" He said, "Absolutely. He's now the greatest of all time." So we love Lou Dobbs. Lou Dobbs is great. Go out and buy his book. His book is great. But we have great support. We have great support. Tucker's been very good lately, I have to tell you. Tucker has been very good. Tucker Carlson, he's come a long way, actually the whole thing with faking around with our whole history. He's very strong in that, we took care of that very powerfully, very powerfully. We signed an executive order. We fired a lot of people that were talking about cancel culture and a lot of fake stuff, that were getting paid a lot of money that we're here for a long time. Under 16 years of presidents Obama and Bush, the median income only rose $2,900. Now think of that. So three years, it went up $7,000, 16 years, it went up less than $3,000. I'd say that's a big difference. And that's not including energy, because look what you're paying for your gasoline now. Right? Remember those days? Remember those days of $5, you said, "Let's get rid of that big truck." Now you're all buying bigger trucks than they ever thought possible. You know why? Because gasoline is so damn cheap, right? Remember the $5 days? Now you're below $2 a lot, right? Below two. I mean, they're seeing numbers that nobody believes. It's all good stuff. And we're energy independent. So many things have happened. If you add four or $5,000, so you're talking about by $11,000, you got to add the energy. I said to my people, "Put the energy in." "Well, I don't know if it's right." I said, "Do me a favor, just put it in." In my first three years, we lifted 6.6 million people out of poverty, the largest poverty reduction of any president in American history. We built the greatest economy in the history of the world. And now we're doing it again, and we're doing it very rapidly. This is a super V. They said, "Oh, I don't know, V is going to be very hard." No, this is a super V. We will deliver a safe and effective vaccine this year. It's already in very good shape. Very, very good shape. In a matter of weeks. We will end the pandemic from China. We will end our plague from China. Next year will be one of the greatest years in the history of our country, it's heading that way. If you take a look, automobile manufacturing, housing, retailing, they're all setting records, they're through the roof, hard to believe, actually, during the rounding the corner, when I say rounding the corner, they go crazy. They want to keep it going as long as possible. If you say anything positive, they say, "He's not telling the truth to the American public." I am actually telling the truth. You know these people, they talked about, because I said, "Well, Winston Churchill was a great leader." They said the other night, "You said Winston Churchill was a great leader, but he didn't lie." Because this guy, Woodward. He writes a book. He's had it. He's another one shot. I compare him sort of to Biden. He's sharper than Biden, I have to say that, but he's shot. He's tired. He's exhausted. I never saw a guy be able to do so much television, try doing a book on somebody else. See how much television time they give you, like none. But they said the other night, and it was amazing. Winston Churchill. They said, "He didn't lie to the people, to Britain. He didn't lie." I said, "Well, let me ask you this. He stood on buildings when the Nazis, Hitler, were bombing London." That's pretty brave, because he may have been doing a little drinking, but he was known for that, right? He's got a right to, but it's true. He stood in the buildings in London, as they were bombing London, and made speeches, and made statements, and had everything. And he'd sometimes have press conferences. And the fake news wouldn't show up. He was standing there, nobody was in front of him. But he would stand there, and he would say, "You are safe. You are safe. Everything is okay. You are safe." Well, that's a lie, I guess, right? So I said, "Oh, I never thought of it that way. I guess he lied." No, he's a great leader, and he was leading, and he was a great, great prime minister. He did a fantastic job. Not lying. No. We love our country, we want to lead our country, and we can't let a thing like this, this is a horrible, horrible thing that happened to the world it happened, should have been stopped in China. They stopped it from going into the rest of China, should have been stopped in China. To defeat the China virus, we launched the largest industrial mobilization since World War II. Somebody said, "What grade would you give yourself?" I said, "A+." But I would give myself a D, I would say I would give myself, and my whole group, because Mike Pence is great, Mike Pence really was. He worked so hard. And it's unfair, he worked so hard. The ventilators, the vaccines, the therapeutics now we have, look at what's happening. When somebody gets very sick, look how we bring them back so often, compared to what it was originally. I mean, the work that's been done, and wait until you see what happens over the next few weeks with what's going on. But the Democrats don't want the vaccine. They don't want it. At first, they wanted a vaccine, because they didn't think it could happen. Now that we have it, they're going like, "Well, we don't want it." It's the craziest thing. Think of it, you want to get a vaccine, and they're willing to hurt people, let people die for political reasons. Think of it. I think, honestly, I think it's a disgrace. But we surged rapid testing kits. We have more testing than all other, I mean, practically everybody. You look at number two is India. They have 1.5 billion people. We are up 50 million tests more than India. In fact, we're about to crack 100 million tests. And when you test, then you have, does this make sense? Then you have cases. So we do all this testing, and I come home and I turn on NBC News. It is so bad. I think NBC, that's not only MSDNC. I think NBC with Lester Holt. There's another beauty. Hi Lester. How do you feel big in second place Lester? He surged from first place to second place. But NBC News is so, I mean, it's just terrible. They use free airwaves, and then they give you fake news. Free airwaves. They should pay a lot of money for this. This is not right. NBC. It's owned by a company called Concast, C-O-N, Concast, they're con, they're con men. It's a disgrace. They spend fortunes on public relations and then I get up and make a speech like this with television blazing all over the world, I guess. Yeah, the world, it's all over the world. And I say Concast, and immediately, there goes their public, how's your public relations doing NBC? Not too good. But they're just… they don't tell the truth. Our country would be so much better off if we had honest media, really. Really would. And do you see what their approval rating has gone to? I think it's one of my greatest achievements. Hey look- It's a Saturday night. We have all night. This happened last night in Minnesota. I have these teleprompter people, they're great, they're genius. And I was about 45 minutes into the speech, and I realized I was only on line two. And he was like, "What do I do?" But we have more fun. Hey, you now have a president that doesn't have to use a teleprompter, isn't that nice? And I said last night, I said, and yeah, your friends were there. The Congressmen. By the way, is the media now, and I'm pretty sure it's getting close. I think they have a lower approval rating than Congress. Congratulations. No, but it's hard. When you're sitting there, you're in businesses, you're in construction, you drive trucks, you do a lot of things. You're in offices. You don't realize, because you don't know what's happening. I know exactly a true story. And then it's written to totally bend the truth, to make a good thing into a bad thing. Like, can you believe it, in one week they nominated me, not for one, but for two Nobel prizes. No, but think of it. No but think. And they didn't cover the story. Now Obama got his the first week. Very liberal group, and nobody knew what the hell he got it for, and he didn't know. Why did you get it? I don't know. Remember? I don't know. I have no idea. But you know, you have a president, you love your president, and your president gets honored, because I'm not being honored, you're being honored with the Nobel Peace Prize, for Israel, what we did with Israel. I went home and I said to the First Lady, "Darling," she's very popular. She made a great speech, right? And Ivanka made a great speech, right? But I went home. I said, "Darling, I have big news tonight. Let's turn on the television." You know, we don't use wind. We use actually, we actually use petroleum. We use Petro. Because we like it to be on like a lot. We don't like to have lots of open gaps when the wind's not blowing. We can't watch President Trump. I go home. I say, "First Lady, a great thing happened today. I was honored, Nobel Peace Prize, nominated. This is a big thing First Lady." And then I went home two days later. I said, "First Lady, you're not going to believe it. I was honored again. Nobel Prize, that's Kosovo." Israel, Kosovo. I said, "First Lady, this is great news. Let's turn on the television. This is going to be big. This is going to be big tonight. We just got honored, this is big." Nobel Peace, can you imagine? You grow up in Brooklyn, Queens, and now you're getting the… "First Lady, let's turn on the television. Let's turn onto that fake NBC news." And I see we have a storm. "Okay, First Lady, don't worry about it. The storm is big. We have it taken care of, FEMA's down there, Florida, Alabama, Georgia. We got FEMA down there. It's being taken care of. We always take care of it. We take good care of it." Texas, Louisiana. We took good care of him two weeks ago. "All right First Lady, don't worry about it. It's the next story, I'm sure, it's the Nobel Prize for peace." We're stopping mass killings between Kosovo and Serbia. They've been killing each other for so many, they're going to stop killing. I said, fellas, let's get together. They'd been doing it for hundreds of years, frankly, under different names. I said, that's great. And with Israel, UAE and Bahrain signed a deal with Israel. Everybody said it couldn't be done. I said, "All right, First Lady, that's the first story on NBC, but don't worry. That's a big story. The floods are big. I see it." And then there was a second story about something. And then their third story is about something with me, I don't know, something bad they found out. Then there was a fourth and a fifth and a sixth. I said, "First Lady, I'm a little embarrassed. I thought we'd do a little better." And then they looked at the screen, and said, "Good night." And I wasn't covered. I got the Nobel Peace Prize nomination, a Peace Prize, Nobel nomination. And they didn't cover it. And then the following day I watched a certain show that does like us, and they said, "Would you believe, that they covered, and they mentioned like five subjects that were nothing. That was 18 minutes. And the Peace Prize Nobel version, zero time for President Trump. Thank you very much fake news media, we appreciate it. And when Obama got it, here are the headlines. President Obama gets the Nobel Prize. We need an honest media. The free airwaves, they lie over the free airwaves. They use them and they lie. I don't know. We're going to have to look at it. They're a bunch of scoundrels. They hate it when I say it, but you know, honestly, they are the enemy of the people. When they lie, they are the enemy of the people. You are the enemy of the people. Oh, damn it. The red lights just went off. One, two, three, there's one back there, there's one back there, probably, oh it's OAN, thank you OAN. Every time I get on this subject, they cover me not because they want to, but we get great ratings. We get ratings. These little deals that we have here, come on in folks, come on in. Look at these people. But you know what? I'll tell you what, it's true. They cover it because… But anytime I start talking about the fake news media, you see them getting a little tentative. The camera starts to shake a little bit, and you know, there's another thing. Look at this crowd. It's as far as the eye can see, it's a big crowd, right? They never cover it. I said to my wife last night, we had this incredible crowd. A lot of people, thousands and thousands. I mean like 25, 30,000, many people outside couldn't get it. It was like a sea of people. My wife said, "Was it a large crowd?" I said, "Did you watch?" "Yes. But they only show your face." And I saw people they never show. And that includes Fox, which has changed a lot, changed a lot, sad. Somebody said, "What's the biggest difference between 2016 and now?" You know what I said, "Fox." Biggest difference. Biggest difference. I don't know what's going on with them. But we have some great ones too on Fox. We surged rapid testing kits to every nursing home in America. We learned a lot, through pioneering therapies, we reduced the fatality rate by 85% since April. Think of that? 85%. We've come up with things. They're waiting to see what's coming over the next few months in terms of therapeutics, which to me is even more important than the vaccine. You go into the hospital, you make people better. You give them a shot, you do a transfusion. You make people better. They walk out, that's to me even better, but ultimately long-term, those vaccines are going to be great, and they're really working out well and it's going to be really soon. The people in certain groups are trying to hold them up as long as possible, as long as possible. They're going to try and give Sleepy Joe the credit. He doesn't even know what a… It's possible. They're going to try and get Sleepy Joe the credit. He doesn't even know what a vaccine is. Europe is almost 30% higher excess mortality than the United States. Does anyone know that? they don't report that, right? Europe? Europe's had a hard time. I'm not looking to hurt them, but they have 30% higher. Our bold and early action saved millions of lives and our decisive economic response saved tens of millions of jobs, including 1.3 million jobs, and a wonderful place called North Carolina, right? When I banned travel from China in January, Sleepy Joe Biden called it, "That's hysterical. That's xenophobic." What does that mean? Tell me what xenophobic means, Sleepy Joe. Who said that? I mean, you're my friend. Who said it? All right, what a voice. Have you ever tried opera? What a voice, did everybody hear that? That's true. I wouldn't say it. She said, "He has no idea where he is." But I would never say it. I won't say it. I won't say it. I refuse this. No, but don't underestimate him. Look, he's been doing this for 47 years, and I got a debate coming up with this guy. No, it's true. You never know, you never know. They give him a big fat shot in the ass, and he comes out, and for two hours, he's better than ever before. Problem is what happens after the … No, we're going to ask for a drug test, we are. I'd like to have a drug test. Both of us. I'll take it, he'll take. Because I watched him into debates with all those people, those Democrats. The one who treated him worst was Kamala. Actually, also, she was the one that treated, you know that, she was the one that treated him so badly. And she treated Kavanaugh very badly too. Nobody was ever ruder, nobody ever suffered, like Justice Kavanaugh suffered in the hands and the mouths of those horrible people. The way he was tortured was disgraced. And they had nothing. Those women, that was all made up. Most of them have already admitted, it was all made up lies, false accusations, and they made him suffer. And the leader of the pack I would say was, Kamala was the worst, and Pocahontas was a close second. How's Pocahontas doing, since she destroyed Bloomberg? How about Bloomberg? Did he get killed? Now he's trying to come back. He's trying to buy his way back into the Democratic Party. "I'm going to put up $100 million in Florida, we're going to go," he wants to be back so badly. Here's a guy who spent $2 billion, it's almost two billion now, they're finding out. He had some of the dumbest advisers, people I know, some of the dumbest people. If he would have just kept spending a couple of hundred million dollars a week on ads, he could have won. He could have won. Unfortunately, he said, "No, I want to debate." He went and sued to get into the debates. That was not a good lawsuit. They settled by saying, "We'll let you in the debate." The first question, he was destroyed. You would think that, the way the Democrats treated him, he would really come to me, and he'd say, "I want you," but his hatred and jealousy … He wanted to be President, but he doesn't have the capability of being President. But he's going down now to Florida, he's going to spend $100 million. How good … I have to say this, I'm not a fan of Elizabeth Warren. I gave her the name Pocahontas, I thought that was the end. Remember what I used to say about her? She has … Oh, well, you know it. You know. I would just, look, I said, "This is not an Indian." She said, "I'm an Indian." You remember what I said? "I have more Indian blood than me, I have more in me than she has, and I have none." Unfortunately, I'd like to have some. I would like to have some. I think it could help, it might make me better, but I have none. And I said, "I have more than she does." And then she went out to, and she choked, remember that? She went out, and she took a test. And it found out that about 700 years ago, there was a possible event, 1,024th, right? Wasn't that it? Good memory, very good memory. Trump has a good memory. Good moment. Not for that, but for a lot of things. Now, 1024th, which meant many, many, many centuries ago, there could have been a hookup somewhere along the line. But she choked. We forced her into a choke. She went down like a rock, and then she started coming up, up, up, up, up. Then she totally destroyed Mike Bloomberg. We call him Mini Mike. Remember? Mini Mikey wants that platform. "I want a platform, damn it." I don't mind. Oh, boy, he was pathetic, but now he's going to try and buy his way back into the Democrat party. You remember that guy? Great environmentalist. Except he made his money with coal, which is okay, I think coal is good. Clean coal, I like clean coal. If we had listened to Joe Biden, hundreds of thousands more Americans would have died. You know that. He was way behind. This was months later. And then I watch him last night, reading something saying that, I opened, I closed it up, one week later, one week. Two months later, he was talking about the fact that I shouldn't be doing that to China. I shouldn't be banning China because I was xenophobic. And it's just unbelievable. And now they will say anything. It's called disinformation. They will make up a lie, they will make up a story, and they go with it, it makes no difference whether or not it's show, and they'll take ads. It's the worst group of people. He's surrounded by bad people, dishonest people, but they're very smart. He's not smart. They keep him from talking. It's actually, if he wins, it's the single most brilliant campaign in the history of the world. Because they took a man who's got nothing. He didn't have it, but he's got nothing, and I will give them credit. The single greatest campaign in history, if he wins, but you know what? If he wins, North Carolina is screwed, and so is every place else. And you can forget your tobacco industry, you can forget your farmers. I gave the farmers $28 billion. Thank you very much, Presidency. $28 billion. Because you were targeted, right? You were targeted by China. And I said, "How much were the farmers," Iowa, Nebraska, you, all of them? You were targeted. I said, "How much?" Sonny Perdue, I said, "How much, Secretary?" 12 billion, then 16 billion, you were targeted. I took it out of the tariffs we charge. We never took 25 cents in from China, now we're getting billions and billions and billions of dollars. Sleepy Joe, that never gave, never took anything, or Trump, misjudging him? So Mexico, we're driving them a little crazy. They don't like Trump too much. But now Biden is recklessly campaigning against his vaccine. His campaign campaign's really reckless. And all it is is for political reasons. It's political reasons. Biden, his whole deal is catastrophic shutdown. We're getting better, we're really coming along, and he's talking about shutting down. We're not doing any shutdowns. We don't need shutdowns. Maybe a little area, if it's such a spike, we understand, we have to take care of our senior citizens. This guy talked, he said, "Well, I'll do whatever my medical people want. I believe in science." He doesn't know what science is. "I believe in science." No, we're not doing any shutdowns. We don't need, we're rounding the turn. Without the vaccine, we're rounding the turn. With the vaccine, it'll just speed it up. That's another one that will be controversial. They'll say, "He's saying that it's happened." Yeah, without the care, without the vaccine, it's going along. With a vaccine, even better. It'll be faster. Biden's own chief of staff said, when they manage the H1N1 that he calls the N1H1, right? He goes, "the N1H1," and that's an easy one, because H comes before, but he always gets it wrong. It's like, seven times, "It's great to be with the great people of Iowa." They'll say, "Sir, you're in Idaho." "Oh." I've never made that mistake so far. But I always say, "If you do, just leave the stage, because you can never recover." You can speak as well as, I mentioned, Winston Churchill, even though he was a great speaker, he was a stutterer, and he became one of the greatest speakers ever. You could be Winston Churchill, if you make that mistake, just leave the stage. You can't recover. But he's made it oftentimes, right, in New Hampshire, and it was Vermont. The worst, I think, I think there was one, he was in Ohio, and he said he was in Florida, right? But he couldn't find any palm trees. We just got a poll from Ohio. Through the roof. Great state of Ohio, good Governor, great state of Ohio. But when they managed the H1N1 swine flu, this was from his top person that ran it. "We did every possible thing wrong. 60 million Americans got H1N1 in that period of time. And it was just a total disaster." He basically said, "We didn't know what the hell we were doing." And this is the guy that's going to tell us what to do with something that's much more lethal, much more lethal. This is much more lethal than the swine flu. If H1N1 had the same fatality rate as the China virus, over two million people would have already perished. They didn't know what the hell they were doing. And the guy admitted it. That guy can not be very popular in Democrat politics right there. But just to remember, and he's telling us how to do things. We're building ventilators, we're the ventilator capital of the world now, think of it. We're sending them to other countries, we have so many. And we have made a lot of Governors look very good. And they all admit it, until the press comes in front, where they say, "Oh, he was okay," but we took care of them. We took care of Governors, we took care of the states. On November 3rd, North Carolina will decide whether we will quickly return to record prosperity, or whether we allow Joe Biden to impose a $4 trillion tax hike, ban American energy, confiscate your guns. These are all things that he said. Shut down our economy, destroy the suburbs. They were saying that women in the suburbs, they're not sure if they like me. They're starting to like me a lot lately, because it's law and order. They want law and order. Thank you. A suburbanite, thank you, thank you. No, it's true. I don't know. But I heard the same thing four years ago, remember? " Women will not vote for him." Then we win the election, it's like, they're all in shock. Well, what took place? "Well, he did very well with women," what the hell was that all about, right? Did very well. Women were great. Now, if it holds true … There a lot of jobs, a lot of jobs, a lot of great thinking, but he wants to give free healthcare to illegal aliens. Now, what that's going to do is destroy our country, because two things happen. Number one, we can't afford it. Number two, everybody is going to come pouring into our country if you do that. Right now, they're saying, wherever they are, when you say, "We're going to give you free education, we're going to give you free healthcare. We're going to take care of you. Everything's going to be perfect. We're going to give you, every single family," now watch, they'll print this. "We've checked it out, and he lied about this." Every single family is going to be given a brand new Silver Cloud Rolls Royce. Now, I said that, and CNN went, "He lied about the fact that they're not getting a Rolls Royce." Remember what I said? " Russia, if you're listening," in front of this message, "Russia, if you're listening, find out where her e-mails," or whatever. And then, everybody laughed, I laughed. Well, they actually play it all the time. "When he spoke to Russia." Do you ever see it? And they cut it off before the end, they don't see any, I said, "Russia, if you're listening …" Oh, these people are sick. He wants to erase your borders. Yeah, that was supposed to be a joke, right? It was a joke. It was a joke, everybody was laughing, but they refused to go that extra quarter of a second. He wants to indoctrinate your children with poisonous anti-American lies in education. To combat the toxic left wing propaganda in our schools, I am launching a new pro-American lesson plan for students called, 1776 Commission. It's already done. That's good. And it's true, your kids come home, and they tell you things. How many of you, the kids come home, and they tell you things. It's a disgrace, what they're teaching them, it's a disgrace. We're ending it. In fact, we're taking school funds away from these crazy schools that are teaching horrible things, bad things, actually. We will teach our children the truth about America, that we are the most exceptional nation on the face of the earth. And we are getting better every single day. And no party can lead America, that will not teach our children to love America. No party can do that. The sleepy campaign has joined forces with those trying to tear down America and our way of life. We have a great way of life, and getting better all the time. Look at what we've done. Biden's running mate urged supporters to help bail rioters out of jail, including one who attempted murder. That's right. One who attempted to murder a police officer, and a man accused of sexually assaulting an eight-year-old girl, 13 members of Biden's staff donated to the same fund. Look, that's where they're coming from, just so you know. He's trying to go a little bit more right, like the fracking. "Oh, well of course, we're going to have …" For six months, he's saying, there'll be no fracking, which I don't think the people in Pennsylvania thrilled with, do you agree, considering that your taxes could quadruple. I tell it all the time, Texas, right? Texas, they like oil. They like guns, right, in Texas. Right? And they like God. So he comes out with a platform, no oil. We don't want oil. This is during the Democrat deal. There'll be no oil, there'll be no God, there'll be no guns. This is not a good campaign. And then the fake news says, "Donald Trump is tied in Texas." I'm tied. Last time I was tied in Texas until the day of the vote. Then they announced, the second they called it, "The polls in Texas have closed. Donald Trump has won the state of Texas." Think of it. He's against oil. He's against guns. They're going to confiscate your guns, Second Amendment's going to be destroyed. I am holding up your Second Amendment. If it's not me, look what I've done. You think it's been easy? They want to get rid of the Second Amendment. They're going to get rid of the guns, right? And religion. So, look what they're doing to religion. These states, everything's closed, except, you're allowed to protest. That's why I say everything we do is a protest. Look at all those people back there, look at that. Look it, they just form. Wow. Turn the cameras around, please. They never do it. Turn the cameras around, please. Wow. Thank you. That's a lot of people. We're proud of you. That's a lot of people. You ever notice, they never do it, though. I say, "Turn the camera." Right from the beginning, they never did. They don't want to give us the credit for these big crowds, because you know what? When you see crowds like this, or in Wisconsin, that I had a few nights ago, or last night was so incredible. What we had last night was just incredible, in Minnesota. We're going to win it, 1972, we're going to win it. 1972, it hasn't … That's a long time ago. Remember? I think Reagan won every state except for Minnesota. We're going to win Minnesota. What we've done for them, we've opened up their livelihood again. Maine. How about Maine? I opened up 5,000 square miles of ocean. Obama closed it. They said, "Why? He had no idea." Right off their shore, no fishing, no nothing. They called it a monument, right? Right off their shore. Maine, I mean, if I don't win Maine … Maine traditionally is not really very Republican, but I won Maine too last time, actually. Because I love Maine, too. I love Maine, too. But think of what I did. I opened the waters up for fishermen and for lobster men and women. Now they go lobster fishing and fishing. But 5, 000, I said, "Why did they close it?" Nobody was able to tell me, but I opened it up, an executive order. I totally opened it up. I did many other things. Then I got the tariffs. They couldn't do business in European Union, they couldn't do business in China, because they were charging tariffs to Maine. So Canada would take our fish and lobster. We'd sell it to Canada for nothing, and they'd sell it to China and Europe, because they didn't have to pay tariffs. Not only did I get the 5,000 … Think of what, 5,000 square miles. So you take one mile, square mile, multiply times 5,000. That's a big area, even in an ocean, right? It's massive. And it was the best area, the best. I got rid of the tariffs. I told them, "If you tariff our Maine lobster people, and fishermen and women, if you want a tariff on them, that's okay, but we're going to tariff your cars, okay?" Which is a much bigger deal. It was amazing how quickly those tariffs were taken off. I did that off of Maine, I did that in two weeks, okay? Took me two weeks. Once I found out about it, it's hard to believe it ever happened. So I did that for Maine. And somebody said, I'm down in Maine. How the hell can I be down in Maine, after what I did? I'll tell you what if I do that from Maine, and if Maine doesn't vote for Trump. I don't think I'm going back, okay? I can tell you one thing. Their Senator never did it for them. Joe Biden and the Democrats want to gut police departments nationwide. You know that, right? Here in North Carolina, nearly 50 Democrat State House members and candidates have signed a pledge to slash police funding, endangering your families. I was recently honored to be endorsed by 54 sheriffs throughout this state, and we're joined by many of them tonight. Where are they? Thank you, Sheriff. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you, folks. Thank you. Thank you. You got to take care of our law enforcement. We got to take care, nobody can do the job like them. We have to let them do their job. We've got to stop this nonsense, this child's play, we've got to stop, they're great. You know, I was endorsed by, think of this, New York's finest. It's very tough. You know, de Blasio's your mayor, he doesn't have a clue what's happening, either. I think Sleepy Joe's worse, do you want to know the truth? Because this other guy has just an ideology that's just terrible. But de Blasio is there, and New York's finest, first time they've ever endorsed a Presidential candidate, they endorsed me, three weeks ago. That takes courage. Think of it. Chicago, the police in Chicago, they could do their job. We don't even have to bring in the National Guard. Whenever we do, it takes about 30 minutes, it's over, right? Like we did in Minneapolis, 30 minutes. Remember that beautiful scene? They lined up, they went down, there was no social distancing in between these great, tough guys. There was no social distancing, Tom Tillis. They went down and they had $250,000 outfits. They had more crap on that helmet with night goggles. And these guys were sort of wise guys, right? They were shouting at them, screaming at them. They were screaming at the wrong people. They went down, they never had to stop. It was just forward. It all ended. It all ended in Minneapolis. It took, you also had, what? A half an hour? Remember, they hit the CNN reporter in the knee? He went down, Ali Velshi. He said, "This is a friendly protest. It's wonderful to see such a …" Behind him, it was all fire for a block. It looked like Berlin during the war. "This is a friendly …" What are they doing? How does that help to be like that? How does that help? We're joined tonight by some really great friends of mine and some warriors that have been a fantastic help to me. One man who, especially over the last year, he has been so great, he couldn't be better. And I think he's doing very well. I'm looking at some numbers, and you're doing very well. And I think your opponent has some very big problems. Senator Tom Tillis. Thank you, Tom. Thank you. He's been great, smart guy. And he's got a couple of bills that he's putting in, one in particular, I love it. You got to do it. That if a sanctuary city causes problems, you can sue the sanctuary city, you can sue. Will you get, we got to get that one moving, right? That's moving along, right? That's a great one. A man who, I just did a phone call for the other night, and the people love him. He's in a rough district, but he's now leading. I see you're up in the polls, Congressman Richard Hudson, great guy. Where's Richard? Great guy. He's a warrior. And two people I really liked, because we fought like hell for them a year ago, right? And they had guts, and they had what it takes. They didn't choke. You know, a lot of people choke. They choke, they gag, they can't breathe. Greg Murphy and Dan Bishop, they didn't choke, they're fantastic. They are fantastic people. Thank you. Look, they're friends. We're friends. Those two guys were incredible. Thank you very much, great job. Really great job. And a man that should be your Governor, I don't know, he's doing well, but Lieutenant Governor, Dan Forest, everybody. Thank you very much, great job. Handsome guy, handsome. Looks like Cary Grant. I hear you're doing really well. Look, I mean, this guy's got this state totally closed down. It's ridiculous. It's, when are they going to open? When are they going to open? Dan, this would have been opened up a long time ago. And you would have done even better. I mean, you would have done better. And North Carolina Republican Party Chair, Michael Whatley. Michael? Thank you, Michael. Great job, Michael. How are we doing, Michael? How's it going? Are we up? I mean, if I lose North Carolina, I'm getting out of here. This is not … Look at that. This is not, just so you know, the crowd of a man that's coming in second. I say it all the time. I said it when I left Michigan. 2016, the night of the election, we had 32,000 people. Hillary was there, just before me, in a prime location. She had about 400 people. I got there at 12 in the evening, I started speaking at one in the morning, it's now Election Day, and I left. 32,000 people, we had 32,000 people. So it's now Election Day. I start speaking, I started speaking, think of it, one o'clock in the morning, we had 30, you never saw anything like it. I left. I said, "That doesn't look like we're going to lose Michigan." And guess what? We didn't. We won Michigan, first time in decades. And you know what we've done? Many, many car plants are now opening up. A great gentleman, who's just retiring, Prime Minister Abe, of Japan. I said, "Shinzo, please do me a favor. We need more car companies. You're selling cars into our country, please. We want to build here, not in Japan, please." He said, "But we cannot do that. This is a free enterprise system." I said, "I know, Shinzo, please. I need some car companies. Please do it." "I can't do it." I said, "Shinzo, you have to do it." Next day, it was a story, "Five car companies to open up in Michigan," right? So much for free enterprise, but he's a great guy, he's a friend of mine. He's great. They're lucky he's a friend of mine. I would have been much tougher. It's hard. When a guy is a friend, it's hard, but they did a lot. They did a lot. They helped it a lot. And what they've done here, by the way, Japan, and what they've done in Michigan, Ohio, what they've done? By the way, we all love South Carolina, right, right? I think we love it. Now, South Carolina, we're winning here, but South Carolina, I hate to say this to you, I don't want to make you upset. We're winning by about 400 points. I spoke to a great person in South Carolina who said, "Sir, you don't have to come here. This thing's up by a lot." What the hell is the difference, right? I mean, we are up, and we're up good, but I'd love you to tie South Carolina. What do we have to do? But a lot of activity in South Carolina also, they're doing great. You had the best year you've ever had. They've had the best year they ever had. And you're going to go to a better year, we are going to have a better year. We're also deeply honored to be joined by a military spouse, Amy Williams, who was reunited with her husband, Sergeant First Class Townsend Williams, at my State of the Union address. Everybody remembers that. Everybody remembers was there. Good, you're looking well. Thank you very much. Say hello to the whole family. Thank you. Thanks to the incredible sacrifices of our warriors, and they are warriors. We're pursuing peace in Afghanistan, it's very close. We're down to, we will soon be down to 4,000 soldiers. We're taking them out. They're serving as policemen. They're serving as police, and they've done a great job. We could win everything, but I'm not looking to kill three million people to win, what? To win what? We should have never been in the Middle East, and we're bringing them back. We're bringing them back, just so you know, we're bringing them back from Iraq. We're down to 2,000 soldiers in Iraq. And in Syria, we're all back, we're all finished, except for one thing. If it's okay with you. I decided to keep the oil. We took the oil, we kept it. And we'll always support America's incredible military families. So thank you very much. Thank you, darling. Really good. Okay. In everything we do, we're putting America first, unlike other administrations, and not just Obama and Biden. This has gone on for many years. We put America first, and that's what we're doing. And you know what? Other countries, for the first time in decades, respect us again. Remember that. They respect us again. You know all about data, 28 countries. We had six countries that were current, and the amount of current is too low, okay? Six countries. I went in, and I said, "You got to pay. Sorry, you're delinquent." They said, "Really?" "Yeah," I said. "You're delinquent. You got to pay." Obama would go, and make a speech and leave, that would be it. We were paying for it. We're protecting Europe, and they're screwing us on trade. So we protect them, and they're screwing us on trade. No good, no good. Can't do it. I said, "It's unfair." And the Secretary General, Stoltenberg, of NATO, said, "I've never seen," and the fake news can call him up and check. He said, "He's the greatest that we've ever seen." For 20 years, the spending at NATO went like this, right? And America, we pick it up. Every time it goes down, they didn't pay. And I said, "We're supposed to protect you. You're going to be attacked by Russia or somebody, we're supposed to protect you. And yet you're delinquent. You don't pay your bills." And that includes Germany. They're paying 1%, they're supposed to pay two, and 2% is way too low. 2% military spending. So we got, listen to this. It never gets reported by these fakers. We got $130 million more, more, not total, more, going to, over three years, $400 billion. So we're going from 130 billion, with a B, not million, to $400 billion. And they said to me, they said … And they said to me, they said to me, very nice guy, head of one of the countries, at a table. I can't believe it never got released, but now we can talk about it, because it's three years ago. But they said, "Sir … " And this was a big private meeting of all of the nations, "Does that mean if we don't … " Because I said, "You got to pay your bills. We're protecting you. You're not paying your bills." Some did, like Poland and some others, but most didn't. Six to eight were current, and we were paying much more than we should have been paying, much more. I mean, it's Europe. We got to defend ourself, and there was no guarantee that they'd help us if we ever had a problem. Right? We're never going to have a problem. We got so much stuff now. We were depleted. Now we have great … But they said to me, "Does this mean … " And I had to give this answer. I can't believe it didn't get leaked by some sleazebag. We have leakers all over this place, but a lot of it didn't leak. A lot of it is just made up by the newspapers. They make up phony stories. They say, "Donald Trump woke up today. He was in a very bad mood, according to sources." There is no source. They just made it up. Hey, I woke up, and I was in a bad mood. True. I've actually had a … I've been in a good mood, because we're doing so much for our country. We've done so much for our country. But at the NATO meeting, one of the presidents of one of the good countries, all good, they said, "Sir, does this mean that if we don't pay, does this mean that you're going to leave, and you're not going to protect us?" I said, "Yes. That's what it means. I'm sorry." It was an amazing effect, because other presidents said, "No. We will always protect you. We will always protect you, even if you don't pay, even if our taxpayer is paying for everything, even though you take advantage of us on trade, you don't let our cars in, you don't let our stuff in, but you sell us like crazy, even though you tariff our product, even though you do everything, and then you take advantage of us with the military." They said, "We will always protect you." So they didn't pay. Why the hell would they pay? They said, "Boy, these guys are stupid." So they asked me the question, "Does this mean, sir, that you will not protect us anymore if we don't pay?" I said, "I'm sorry to say, it does." That's a big story. Three years ago, it's a big story. It was amazing how the money came in. So we took in 130 billion a year, going over a three-year period, to 400, just because I asked. Right? Just because I asked. True. They don't report that story. Then we got lightweights that I fired, and they write books about me, that I'm a bad guy, "Oh, he's a terrible guy. He treats our allies so badly." No. Our allies treat us badly. Our allies in many ways treat us worse than our enemies. I must be honest with you. They take advantage of us. Everyone takes advantage of your country, and we don't put up with it. And you know what the funny thing? We get along better now, because they respect us again. Before, they thought we were stupid. They respect us again. They do. I mean, look at Israel, look what we did. I saw Kerry this other day. Is this guy the worst negotiator? Gave Iran 150 billion, plus 1.8 billion in cash. He never walked. Sometimes in a negotiation, when you've given everything, and you can't give anymore, and then they want more, you get up ane walk. Remember the bicycle accident? That was the only time he had to ride his bicycle in a race. 73 years old. "I promise," I said, "I will never ever … I promise to you, ride a bicycle in a race, or any other time frankly." I will never ride a bicycle during a negotiation. And he broke his leg, and his arm, and he was all screwed up. And that was actually a good thing, because it delayed the signing of that horrible deal, which I terminated. Nah, we had some terrible negotiators, and they all said, I saw them the other day, this was him like a year ago, "Mark my words, you will never ever sign deals with Arab countries, with Israel. It can't be done." Well, we just signed the two great ones, and we got about seven more that want to come in. What a bunch, what a bunch. And then they say bad things about your president. They don't like my foreign policy. I like my foreign policy. You like it. No, we were taken advantage of by the whole world. They're so stupid, so stupid. We've spent the last four years reversing the damage that Biden and his crew inflicted on us over a 47-year period. Joe Biden is weak. He's supported every globalist sellout of North Carolina, the workers, what he's done. And when I say, "him", it's him and people in his little group that … You've achieved so much over a period of time. He sold it out. Look at NAFTA. How bad was NAFTA? China's entry into the World Trade Organization. TPP would have destroyed our car industry. And of course, he joined and wanted to join the Paris Climate Accord. That's another beauty. That would have cost you trillions and trillions of dollars. That was actually, I think, designed to put us out of business, literally. Biden has repeatedly surrendered your jobs to China and other countries. This state lost 43% of all manufacturing jobs after the NAFTA and China disasters. You know that. You lost 43%, but I think the real number is 61%, by the way. Biden says that this an election between Scranton and Park Avenue. By the way, he left Scranton. He likes to say, "I was born in Pennsylvania." But he doesn't say he left. His father left. Not his fault, but they make it like he's … No, he went to Delaware. He doesn't leave Delaware, that I can tell you. Every time I see this guy … Wilmington, Delaware. Does he ever leave? I'm in Los Angeles. I'm trying to work on the fires. They ought to do some forest management a little bit maybe. Ridiculous. The floors of the forest, it's got 20 years of leaves and trees that are dry as a bone, matchsticks. Forest management. Naturally, this is an election, not between Scranton or wherever it is. It's really between Scranton and China, you know that, Scranton and China. I'm with America. Biden is with China. If Biden wins, China wins. If we win, America wins, North Carolina wins, Pennsylvania wins, and the American workers win in every single state. To save our auto industry, I withdrew from this horrible, horrible deal, Trans-Pacific Partnership. Earlier this year, I kept my promise to North Carolina when I ended the NAFTA nightmare. You got hit so hard. All those empty buildings all over the place, but a lot of them now are filled up because of us. They filled up. When did they fill up? Over the last three-and-a-half years. I proudly signed a brand new US-Mexico-Canada agreement into law, which will bring hundreds of thousands of high paying jobs back to the United States, and it's already doing. We invested $2.5 trillion in the US military. Defense spending in North Carolina has soared by more than $1 billion a year. Congratulations, good job. We launched the first new branch of the US Armed Forces. This by itself would be a big achievement. This is one of so many different things, Right to Try, the military, the vets, everything. We've done so much, but we … 75 years, right? Last one was the Air Force. The Army, the Navy, the Air Force, the Marines, the Coast Guard, they're so good. We have another one now, for 75 years, Space Force. We need it. I never even promised that. Right? One of them said recently that, "He's actually done more than he promised in the campaign." That means I'm probably the only politician in history. They will tell you, these incredible women up here from North Carolina. Stand up. Will you, please? These are most incredible people. Thank you. Stand up. Turn around for the cameras, so they can see how incredible you are. Thank you. Man, oh, man. What a life. But we took care of the VA with Veterans Choice. You saw that. What Obama was nothing. It wasn't working, the MISSION Act. That's amazing. And accountability, where we can fire people in the VA that aren't taking great care of our vets, okay? "You're fired. Get out. You're fired. Out." We killed the founder and leader of ISIS, al-Baghdad. We took out the worlds number-one terrorist and the mass murder of American troops and many others, Qasem Soleimani. He's dead. He's dead. I withdrew from last administration's disastrous Iran nuclear deal. I kept my promise, recognized the true capitol of Israel and opened the American embassy in Jerusalem. And we got it built. I was signing a sheet of paper, you've heard this story, $1.1 billion. I said, "What's this for?" They said, "Sir, now that you've moved, we're going to build an embassy in Israel, in Jerusalem." I say, "How much is it?" "1.1 billion." You got some friends of mine here, they're builders. You don't spend 1.1 billion on a one-story building. I don't know what's going on. So I said, "So, does it have to cost so much?" "Yes, sir. We're buying land" So I called David Friedman. He's our ambassador, he's one of the most successful lawyers in New York. He's a brilliant guy. He loves Israel. Right? Love Israel. I call him. He's the ambassador, he's there. I said, "David, they want to spend 1.1 billion on a damn one-story embassy. It's crazy." I said, "Would you take a look? Maybe we own some land." We own a lot of land. We've been there a long time. Calls me back. He said, "Let me take a look at it, sir." He calls me the next day. "Sir, we have a great piece of land, a much better location that we were going to way overpay for, a much bigger piece. We have a setback building that we can renovate and make it great." I said, "That's fantastic, David. How much will it cost to renovate the building?" "I think we can do it for $190,000." So I said, "David," it's the first time I've ever done it. I said, "David, it's too cheap. You got to spend more than that." So a friend of mine, Ron Baron, he's got an office building, and he's got Jerusalem stone facing the elevators in this high-rise building, Jerusalem stone. And every time I go in, he goes, "Oh, you got to see Jerusalem stone." And he paid a fortune for it. He's so proud of it. He doesn't talk about anything but his Jerusalem stone. I said, "David, do me a favor. You're I Jerusalem. Right?" "Yes." "Do they have Jerusalem stone?" "They got so much, we don't know what to do with it." I said, "Use all Jerusalem stone when you're rebuilding the building, when you do your renovation. Everything, wrap it in Jerusalem stone." So I think we ended up spending, to fix up the building, like $500,000. Can you believe it? We were going to spend 1.1 billion, and by the way, it would never get built. It wouldn't be built in 20 years from now. And they like it so much, they gave up the plan. They think this is better. It's a better location, it's probably a better building. But I could tell you stories like that all night long, the aircraft carriers that cost 10 times more than they should cost, and then they use the electric catapults. You've heard that. Right? They don't want to use steam. Why? Because it's too simple, because it works, because it's better. So they go to electric catapults that they're working on for years now. Elevators that are operated my magnets instead of hydraulic. Magnets. It sounds good. Trust me, it doesn't work. One little glass of water. We're in the ocean. One little glass of water, boom, those magnets are gone. I could have told them that. I actually asked the architect, " Have you ever built a ship before?" It's unbelievable. You heard the story last night about Air Force One. It saved a lot of money. I said to Boeing, "No. It's got to have a three in front of it." They were going to buy Air Force One, 5.7 billion. It's a lot of money, but look, it's a helluva a deal. It's a helluva a plane. What can I tell you. I said, "How much is the new plane?" It was signed by Obama. "5.7 billion, sir." I said, "That's a lot of money." It's actually two planes. Air Force One is two planes. I'll give you a little. They're going to say, "That's classified information." Well, they've been flying around with two planes for 30 years, so I assume somebody knows. And our Air Force One is 31 years old. Right? So, look, it's time. A lot of the Arab sheiks come in. I see their plane. They have a brand new one. I say, "What do we have?" 31 years, and we're protecting them. Why the hell don't we have a new one? So they finally had, at 31 years old. The new one is totally different, 747. It's much longer, bigger wingspan, much more beautiful. It's modern, it's beautiful. 5.7 billion. So I said to the head of Boeing, nice guy, Dennis, this was before they had their difficulty, which is terrible what happened to them, but I said to him, "Dennis, I'm not going to spend $5.7 billion on a plane. I'm not going to do it. I won't do it. It's too much." I said last night, I told this story, first time, I said, "It's got to have a three on it." He said, "We can't do it. No." He called me up the following day, "We'll take 200 million off." Somebody said, "Well, what are you losing?" I said, "Nothing. In fact, we're gaining a generator." And I said, "You got to build an extra generator." He said, "We'll take 200 million off." I said, "Nope." I said to the general in charge, I said, "General, can we break the deal?" "Yes, sir, we can. We have a cancellation clause." "Good. General, execute your cancellation clause. We're not going to buy it. I'm not going to pay $5.7 billion for Air Force One. I'm not doing it." He said, "Yes, sir. I'm very proud of this clause." "Why? Why?" "Because we have the right to cancel." "Well, do we have to pay anything?" "Yes, sir, $250 million." I said, "General, don't cancel it. Take it back. Just tell them we don't like the plane. Okay?" And I couldn't even say, "I'm going to buy it from Europe." The only competitor is Europe. I can't say, "We'll buy it from Europe." No, that doesn't work out to well. So I said, "Don't do it. I don't want to send them a check." 250 million for nothing. Right? We don't want to do it. So I said, "Just tell them, "We don't like it. The price is too high. We're not going to buy it." But don't send anything, don't put it in writing. Please, general." "Yes, sir." "Thank you." So about a week later, the head of Boeing called me up. He said, "Look, we can get it down, but you're asking for too much." I said, "You don't understand. It has to have a three on it, not a four, but three." So another months goes by. I forgot about it. I get a call from Boeing, "Would 3.9 billion be okay?" I said, "Yes, that's okay. It's got a three on it." True. True story. True story, and then somebody said … it's true though, somebody said, "Well, it must be a different plane." Yeah. I said, "Yeah, we have a much nicer paint job." We have a much nicer paint job, you know that, and it actually got an extra generator put on. Okay? So it's actually more. They said, "well, we could use an extra generator." I said, "Is there anything else you need?" They said, "Sir, we could use an extra generator." I said, "We'll get it for you, we'll get it." So I had it included in the price. These people know exactly what I'm talking about. It's called included in the price. But think of it, there's hundreds of deals like that. But you're one person, and that's why I got Mark Meadows involved, because he's from North Carolina. He's from North Carolina, and he's cheap as hell. I need some cheap people. Oh, there's many, hundreds and hundreds of stories. I could tell you so much. It's crazy. The Biden agenda would collapse our economy and destroy your country. It would destroy your Social Security and protections for preexisting conditions, it will. He's going to drain your Medicare by giving away our healthcare to illegal immigrants. And I will tell you this, you're going to have socialized medicine. That's as sure as you're there. And Obama lied 28 times when he said you can keep your doctor, you can keep your plan. It was a lie. Said it 28 times, that we have, but it was a lie. But now you're really losing your doctor. You're going to have socialized medicine. Eliminate private healthcare insurance for 180 million Americans who love their healthcare. They have the best in the world. His running mate sponsored the socialist takeover of healthcare. You saw that. He wants to ban private insurance. You're going to lose … 180 million people are going to lose their healthcare under this Biden character, and he has no clue. They're going to take it away from him. They're going to be running him ragged. "Sign this. Sign this." "Okay. What is it?" "Doesn't matter. Just sign it, President, right now." "I'm getting tired. I'd like to rest, I'd like to let Kamala take over as president." That's no way to get into the office, because we're going to have a woman president someday, but you know what? It can't be Kamala. Kamala. Nobody treated him worse, and he picked her. I'll tell you, I was … brilliant forecast. He could never pick her. She called him a racist. Right? She talked about Me Too-ing him. He was going to be Me Too-ed. Right? Me-Too-ed. A lot of bad things. There was nobody. Think of it, even Pocahontas treated him better. She knocked the hell out of Bloomberg, but she left him sort of alone. I think she felt sorry for him. I heard she felt sorry for him. I don't want people to feel sorry for our president. I want other people, really, to feel sorry for themselves, because we have somebody that knows what they're doing. We can't have it. We can joke, we can play games, we can have fun. You can't have this guy as your president. You can't have him. Maybe I'll sign an executive order. You cannot have him as your president. No, but you know this. Everybody knows this. And you know what? People are going to vote for him because they feel sorry for him. I feel sorry for him too. I feel sorry for him. And maybe he'll show up for an hour-and-a-half at a debate. Who the hell knows? I don't know. But you know. You see the condition he's in. You can't have him as your president. And you know what? You can't have her as your vice president, potentially going to be president. And that's why they're pushing so hard, because they know he's going to be out very soon, and she's going to take over. And she is the furthest left person of anybody. She is rated, not by me, she is rated further left than even Bernie Sanders. Okay? He's second, she's first. We will hire more police. Thank you, sheriffs. Thank you, sheriffs. I love the sheriffs. We got the endorsement from all the sheriffs in Florida, everybody up in Ohio and Texas. We have the stuff, nobody's ever seen anything like it, the endorsements from law enforcement. We're going to increase penalties for assaults on law enforcement. We will ban deadly sanctuary cities. We will defeat everybody that we have to, including the virus, but we will defend the dignity of work, and we will defend the sanctity of life. We will uphold religious liberty, free speech and the right to keep and bear arms. We will strike down terrorists who threaten our citizens, and we will keep … You know this, right? It's okay, right? We will keep America out of these ridiculous foreign wars. We will maintain American's unrivaled military might, and we will ensure peace through strength. It's about time. We will end surprise medical bills, require price transparency, and further reduce health insurance premiums and the cost of prescription drugs, which we're doing an unbelievable job on, other than the fact that the drug companies are spending a fortune, because they don't like me much. You will see drug prices, prescription drugs, dropping 50, 60, 70% in a very short period of time. Favored nations clauses. We will strongly protect Medicare and Social Security, and we will always protect patients with preexisting conditions. America will land the first woman on the moon, and the United States will be the first nation to land an astronaut on Mars. You have to see what we've done with NASA. We'll be the first one on Mars, I hope. We will stop the radical indoctrination of our students and restore patriot education to our schools, patriotic education. We will teach our children to love our country, honor our history and always respect our great American flag. And we will live by the timeless words of our national motto, and we will never change it, by the way. We will never change it. They took the word, "God", out of the Pledge of Allegiance twice. I said, "Did they make a mistake." Did they make a mistake. They didn't for them. They made a mistake for us. We're not going to put up with it. But we will keep, "In God we trust." For years, you had a president who apologized for America. Now you have a president who is standing up for America and standing up for the great people of North Carolina. This is the most important election we've ever had. Remember it. We're going to be a socialist country. We're going to be a communist country. These people are further … they're much further left than socialism. These people are sick. So get your friends, get your family, get your neighbors, get your coworkers, and get out and vote. Get out and vote. And watch to make sure they're not cheating, which they will be. Early voting has already begun. Don't wait. Get out and vote. We got to win this. If we win this state, we're going to win the whole thing. This is a very important state. If we win North Carolina, we're going to win the whole thing, because we're doing well everywhere, from Wilmington to Charlotte, from Concord to Raleigh, and from Greensboro to right here in Fayetteville. We inherit the legacy of generations of North Carolina patriots, who gave their blood, sweat and tears for this beloved nation. Proud citizens like you, helped build this country. And together, we are taking back our country. We are returning power to you, the American people. With your help, with your devotion and your drive, we are going to keep on working, we are going to keep on fighting, and we are going to keep on winning, winning, winning. You hear that, General? We are one movement, one people, one family, and one glorious nation under God. And together, with the incredible people of North Carolina, we will make America wealthy again, we will America strong again, we will make America proud again. We will America safe again, and we will make America great again. Thank you very much. Get out and vote, vote, vote, vote.